QB Bryce Young Alabama 94
info: 3,325 yards 32 TD 5 INT 64.5% 91.3 PASS 66.5 RUN. 5'10 204 with 9 3/4 hands. Young was a top 25 recruit of all time coming out of the power house HS Mater Dei where he lit up the competition leading to an offer from nearly ever power 5 team. Young Committed to Bama where he served as the backup to Mac Jones. After Mac left and was drafted in the first round Young picked up where he left off and dominated leading the Crimson Tide to an SEC championship vs the wildly talented Georgia team. He was awarded the Heisman trophy for the dominating season where he threw for 4,860 yards and 47 TDs and 7 INTs.
pros: Has the pedigree of a top level player, 5 star QB of Alabama and exceeded expectations for him. Keeps the ball out of harms way, only 2% TWP rate and 12 INTs in 931 attempts as well as 1 TWP when not pressured. Nothing looks much better than when he throws it on time and in rhythm, it’s poetry in motion. Has incredible arm talent, can make accurate throws on the run using not technique. Can throw at many different arm angles to get around defenders. Has enough athleticism to make plays on the run. Short quick release that is dangerous in the quick game. Many full field reads on his tape where he finds the 3rd receiver open. Moves well in the pocket, slips away from the defenders and finds open spaces in the pocket. He’s him, when he has the ball late and you need a score he gets it. Solid accuracy everywhere on the field.
cons: He’s very small, 5’10 sub 200 would make him a one of a kind QB at that size. Drifts way too much in the pocket, too many plays where he scrambles backwards that wont end well in the NFL. Would love to see more plays that he sets his feet and delivers a good ball with a follow through, too many just arm throws. Under pressure he never makes a good strong throw where he takes the contact and throws it normal. Doesn’t have a cannon that you want out of a top pick, not truly impressive arm strength.
take: Young is like Zach Wilson if Wilson had the pedigree and makeup of a top pick. Young has great arm talent and the intangibles that you look for in franchise QB. Sometimes you draft a guy for talent other times you draft him because he plays at a higher level than every one else, that’s exactly why you draft Young. He can be a franchise guy and lead a team to wins nearly all by himself.
EDGE Will Anderson Alabama 92
info: 65 pressures 14 sacks 23 tackles 86.7 RDEF 85.8 PRSH. 6'4 253 with 33 7/8 arms. Anderson was a 5-star recruit with offers to every major program coming out of Dutchtown HA in GA. He stepped onto campus ready to play earning a starting spot immediately and was a Freshman All-American. He put up 60 pressures with 8 sacks that year and graded out as a 79.1 as a true freshman in the SEC. He one upped himself his true sophomore year by leading the nation in pressures with 81 and 15 sacks grading out at an 89.9 and leading the Bama defense to the national championship game. He was a 1st team All-American and won the Bronko Nagurski Trophy for his outstanding season. He came back his junior year and picked up where he left off. He’s was a stud racking up 14 sacks and being named an All American again.
pros: Excellent run defender, packs a punch on initial impact. Powerful hands, can stun blockers and rip through like nothing. High level athlete, can get off the ball unbelievably well and can time up snaps well. High motor player, good ant working in stunts and cleaning up in the run game.
cons: His length is sub-par for a top level edge, he doesn’t stick out on the field just looking at him. Overall size isn’t what you would want at 6’4 243.
take: Anderson is a superb athlete with the strength and athleticism to dominate tackles with speed and power. He’s a great run defender as well so he can do it all, he even lined up a 3 tech in a bear front. If he was a tad longer he would be the first pick no doubt but he’s an amazing player that wont get out of the top 5.
QB Anthony Richardson Florida 90
info: 2,553 yards 17 TD 9 INT 53% 70.5 PASS 84.8 RUN. 6'4 244 with 10 1/2 hands. Richardson was a 4 star recruit out of Gainesville FL and decided to commit to his hometown Gators.  After Penn State and Georgia offered him he opened his recruitment back up but stayed with Florida. He barely played his true freshman year behind Trask and Emory Jones but by his second year he got some reps after Jones disappointed. He came into the 2022 season as the starter for the Gators where he flashed while throwing for 2,500 yards and 17 TDs with 9 INTs while only throwing for 53%.
pros: Doesn’t take many sacks, under a 9.2 pressure to sack rate. Has elite arm strength and can put serious velocity on a ball when needed. Has arm talent to make off platform throws down the field. Has great size and athleticism for the Position, at 6’4 240 and the running skills to be a low-end RB he is a playmaker at QB. Moves around the pocket and avoids defenders very well.
cons: Takes forever to throw the ball, 3.18 average time to throw. Only completed 53% of his passes. Has some funky mechanics when throwing, his feet need a lot of work to settle down and be on platform. Not accurate now, has issues putting the ball where he wants it and it needs to be. Not helped by the garbage gators offense but never made great reads and focused more on the one target he had in mind. Not great in a west coast scheme, he’s not a game manager that will execute an offense well now.
take: Richardson is the closest thing to Josh Allen in a while and if he succeeds it will be a similar path. He has serious accuracy concerns which can be attributed to bad technique that is fixable, if he puts the work in he has the ability to be the next great QB in the NFL.
WR Jaxon Smith-Njigba Ohio St 90
info: Smith-Njigba was a 5 star coming out of Rockwall HS in TX where he put up absurd numbers and leaving the state of Texas to join Olave and Wilson in Ohio at OSU. in 2020 his true freshman season he played sparingly thanks to 3 top 15 picks but Jameson Williams left for Alabama the next year and he stepped into the slot role. His 2021 season was great, he caught 95 balls for 1,600 yards and 9 TDs with a 91.7 pff grade. Nothing was more impressive than what he did when he was the lone target in their bowl game where he put up 336 yards and 3 TDs. He let down OSU his senior year after he got hurt and only played 40 total snaps in 2022 and missed the CFP.
pros: Didn't have many contested catch snaps but he went 9/10 when he got them. Really good and natural hands, makes tough catches look simple. Really good out of breaks, sets up defenders well and accelerates out of the break. Great body control, can twist and readjust to any ball to make the catch.
cons: Missed so many games in 2022, he only had one season of actually playing. Played slot only with stars on the outside, a very easy situation. Doesn't have the best speed, wont run away from anyone. Never really had to deal with press.
take: Smith-Njigba would be a top 10 pick easily if he repeated hos 2021 performance, but he missed his senior season. He's got the Keenan Allen skill of getting open and making plays on the ball but is just lacking that top end speed. The ability to be a great number 1 receiver is there, but with the lack of pysical tools it is more of a risk than you would like.
CB Christian Gonzalez Oregon 89
info: 4 INTS 6 PBU 45 tackles 83 TACK 81.4 COV.
pros: True junior that got better every year he played. 4 INTs in 2022 with 6 pass breakups, good ball production. Great size at 6’2 201. Long and fluid athlete that is great on the boundary covering go routes and stop routes at the sticks. Can flip his hips well and accelerate to full speed fast. Solid tackler, gets wide and low to wrap up ball carriers in open space. Good press coverage snaps, shows a variety of different techniques.
cons: Not the most twitched up corner, can get beat by quick moves and breaks. Not an overly physical corner, he won’t be throwing his body around in the box to stop run plays any time soon. Can get beat on double moves by looking into the backfield too much.
take: Gonazalez has it all, he’s a long corner with excellent movement skills and the ability to play press, zone and any coverage you ask of him. He showed the ability to play the ball in 2022 by getting 4 INTs and didn’t do much wrong all year. If he became a more physically imposing player he would be right there with Carter and Anderson, but he’s a great CB that should translate well to the league.
CB Devon Witherspoon Illinois 88
info: 3 INTS 14 PBU 32 tackles 72.9 TACK 92.5 COV.
pros: A true shut down corner, 206 yards on 35% completion percentage and 0 TDs. 3 INTs and 14 PBUs, good ball production. Top graded CB and an All American. First play of the year he killed a WR screen. Very twitched up, explosive and aggressive athlete. He has that dawg in him, he wants to hit and wants to win every rep.
cons: Had the one great year, didn’t show out until 2022. 6 foot 180, on the skinnier side of corners. Didn’t play the greatest receivers, wasn’t truly challenged. No much press man to man where he is locking up a WR.
take: Witherspoon is a CB you want on your team. He’s a firery competitor that will attack in the run and screen game and can lock down in the pass game. He’s on the smaller side and isn’t the smoothest press man corner but he will be a good NFL player.
DL Jalen Carter Georgia 88
info: 32 pressures 3 sacks 21 tackles 91.2 RDEF 89.1 PRSH. 6'3 314 with 33 1/2 arms. Carter was a 5 star recruit coming out of Apopka FL where he was compared to former Apopka resident Warren Sapp. The star DL was between some Florida and SEC schools and decided to go join the power house Georgia. As a true freshman he played in all 10 games and even caught a TD from Stetson against Tennessee. In 2021 he broke out in a loaded DL with Jordan Davis and Devante Wyatt forming probably the best interior DL in CFB history. He was 2nd team All SEC and helped the Dogs win the national championship over Alabama with 6 pressures in that game. He continued to show how dominate he was in 2022, continuing to improve in the run game and dominate guards in the pass game. He was named an All American and helped Georgia win another national championship.
pros: True junior that was a 5 star coming out of high school and has improved every year. Arguably the most dominated defender on a defense that produced 5 1st round picks. Back to back 89+ pass rush grades with a 24% win rate on true pass sets. Back to back national champion, he has had much success in his career. Great power, he walked Florida’s guard back easily. Plays with great leverage off the ball, he’s so quick and low off the ball he gets the upper hand on OL. Uses hand swipes well in the pass game and extends in the run game to shed blockers. Strong upper body, can toss OL off balance easily.
cons: He’s not the biggest DL, could struggle to hold up in the run game if quickness doesn’t work. Has not played over 400 snaps in a year. Probably not the best 2 gap players, way better at shooting gaps. Likes his go to outside move on the guard with a swim too much maybe, not many counters off of that.
take: Carter was the most dominate player in college football last year. He really doesn’t have weaknesses, the only things are he didn’t play a bunch of snaps and he probably needs to add more pass rush moves. He’s physically on another level with his explosiveness and it showed every play he was out there. He will be an All Pro at some point and the best player on his DL.
OT Peter Skoronski Northwestern 88
info: Skoronski was a solid 4 star recruit coming out of Park Ridge IL and was heavily recruited by Notre Dame but committed to Northwestern as an interior OL. He followed in his grandfather’s footsteps though, he played OT for the Packers and is in the Green Bay Packers hall of fame so he started as a true freshman at LT. He immediately played well earning a true Freshman All-American spot and a 2nd team all big 10. His sophomore year he continued his domination and was named to the first team all big 10 while grading at 83.8 and only allowing 97.4% allowed pressure rate. In 2022 his final year he came back with one goal in mind, dominate. That’s exactly what he did, he gave up on 6 total pressures all year with a 99.2% allowed pressure rate which is the best in the nation. He was named 2nd team All American and was the best pass protector in college football.
pros: One of the best college pass protectors, only gave up 6 total pressures on 474 pass blocking snaps. Amazing in pass pro, everything about it is nearly perfect. Feet are great, always balanced and always keeps his feet moving in the run game. Great hands, the placement is nearly perfect every time and his hands in pass pro are awesome. Good at picking up stunts and blitzes, keeps his eyes up and understands defensive stunts.
cons: Not the longest limbed tackle, gets pushed away by longer edge players. Doesn't have that next level athleticism, pop in run game is average and not a great mover in space.
take: Skoronski is one of the best pass protectors to come out of college recently, he does it with great technique and solid athleticism and strength. He's reminds me a lot of his former teammate Rashawn Slater, a great OL that lacks the power and length to be a top 5 pick. He's a great offensive lineman though who could immediately step in and start for any team in the NFL.
QB Will Levis Kentucky 88
info: 2,416 yards 19 TD 10 INT 65% 65.8 PASS 64.8 RUN. 6'4 229 with 10 5/8 hands. Levis was an impressive recruit coming out of Xavier HS in Connecticut. He was the number 2 player coming out of Connecticut with a 4.0 GPA and offers to nearly every ACC and MAC school. He chose to go to the Big 10 and played for Penn State in 2018. He redshirted his first season and only got 2 starts over the next 2 years against Rutgers and Iowa. He decided to transfer because he didn’t want to sit behind Sean Clifford so he went to the SEC and chose Kentucky. He had a very good season both passing and rushing being one of Kentucky’s team captains. He put up 2,827 yards on a 66 completion percentage and 24 TDs 13 INTs along with 516 rushing yards. His Senior year was a bit of a disappointment, his stats dropped off a bit from his junior year but he went from a 90 to 68 PFF grade.
pros: Well built QB, 6’3 232 pounds, he clearly puts in the work in the weight room. Not a cookie cutter QB, has a funny personality behind him (see his bio and tik toks). Good runner, adds to the offenses run game. Has the NFL arm and accuracy, he’s not great but he’s NFL caliber. Can make some really nice throws on the run, good athlete that can play out of structure. Solid arm strength, ball comes off the hand easy and can launch it with little effort. Great at hitting a stationary target, can get screens out and run a quick hitting offense.
cons: Will be 24 by the time he starts a game in the NFL. Half of his production are just screen passes and designed sweeps by the offense. Inconsistent with finding open receivers over the middle, looks to the perimeter a lot and can get stuck on one player. Struggles with pressure, passing grade drops to 51 under pressure and 65 when blitzed (2021). Doesn’t make many of the wow throws down the field and over the top of defenses. When he leaves the pocket, he will leave to the wrong side or just not execute a scramble well. Not very accurate, throws it high to open receivers and doesn’t throw on platform.
take: Levis has everything physically you are looking for in an NFL QB, he’s 6’3 230 of very good weight and has the arm to play in the NFL. He is a good runner who can make the throws need from him, but he’s not a fully developed QB by any means. He was protected a little by the Kentucky offense and needs to be more consistent with his ball placement and decision making.
EDGE Lukas Van-Ness Iowa 87
info: 46 pressures 9 sacks 15 tackles 80.9 RDEF 74.3 PRSH. 6'5 272 with 34 arms.
pros: Solid size, 6’5 269, he looks the part. 33.9 win rate on true pass sets. Very good hands, placement in the run game is good and uses them in pass rush moves well. Has a solid bull rush in his game. Can rush from both the edge and interior. Great motor, a student of the game.
cons: Not a great athlete, wont blow by tackles with speed, has to win with a good move. For some unknown reason he never started, was just a heavily used sub.
take: Van Ness doesn’t have many weaknesses, you would like to see him be a better athlete and play more but that’s it. He’s a strong solid pass rusher that can overpower tackles and use his hands well in both the run and pass game. He’s got some serious potential considering he wasn’t a starter and played 2 years at Iowa so he may end up being the steal of the draft.
QB CJ Stroud Ohio St 87
info: 3,684 yards 41 TD 6 INT 65.9% 89 PASS 57.7 RUN. 6'3 214 with 10 hands. Stroud was a solid recruit coming out of Rancho Cucamonga CA where he was getting some looks before the Elite 11. After dominating at the Elite 11 his stock skyrocketed up to a high 4 star recruit and committed to Ohio State to back up 1st round pick Justin Fields. He didn't play in 2020 but in 2021 and 2022 he lead the Buckeyes to the CFP as well as being named a Heisman trophy finalist. In the OSU offense he put up amazing stats throwing to 1st round picks everywhere. Over the 2 years he threw for 7,760 yards 81 TDs and 12 INTs with a 92.2 and 84.1 PFF grade.
pros: Picked apart the middle of the field all year. Has the speed to be a running threat although he doesn’t use it. People around him say he has impressive character and is a great guy. Can really push the ball down the field, strong arm and good technique. Great down the field accuracy, puts the ball in very good spots. Works at a very high level in the pocket, looks like teaching tape on how to play QB.
cons: The Ohio State offense really helped out, open 1st round pick receivers everywhere. Awful under pressure, had a 34 PFF grade which is a massive drop from normal. Non rushing threat, he has broken one tackle in his entire career. Almost nothing to like out of structure, never makes a great play like that.
take: Stroud is very very reminiscent of the OSU QBs of the past. He looks great because all the open receivers and talented receivers. There’s no out of structure plays to fall back on but him in the pocket operating the OSU offense looks fantastic. He’s got the size, arm strength and production to be a great NFL QB but we need to see if it will translate.
EDGE Nolan Smith Georgia 86
info: 28 pressures 7 sacks 32 tackles 90.6 RDEF 79.1 PSRH. 6'2 238 with 32 5/8 arms. Smith was another 5 star recruit (Top 20 all time) coming out of IMG academy where he was recruited by everyone and went to the best defense in CFB Georgia. As a freshman he was a co winner of the Defensive newcomer of the year for Georgia after a 5 sack season. He didn’t play much in the 2020 season but came back in 2021 and graded at a 85 with 7 sacks during the national championship run for the Bulldogs. He came back his senior year to be a leader of that defense but he tore his pec 8 games
pros: Former 5 star recruit that played well in college, good potential. Majoring in Math, not just a typical football player. Amazing athlete, OL can’t keep up with his speed and agility. Swipes hands well and can bend the edge, easily wins to the outside. Surprising power and can explode into OL and drive them back.
cons: On the smaller side at 6’3 235, not the size of a typical edge. Between injuries and playing time he wasn’t an every down player. Not sure about him setting an edge in the run game, more of a disruptive gap shooter.
take: If smith had prototypical size he would be a top 5 pick. His top recruiting ranking was no joke, he’s a freak athletically, he’s got the speed, bend and agility to make plays in the backfield. He doesn’t have the strength and length a traditional edge has, but he can still pass rush at a high level. He has a shot to be an all pro type player if he can hold up to NFL physicality.
CB Deonte Banks Maryland 85
info: 1 INT 8 PBU 26/50 258 yards 89.2 TACK 74.3 COV. 6'0 197 with 31 3/8.
pros: Solid size, 6’0 197. Only missed one tackle in 2022. Good in press, looks fluid defending go routes and playing physical. Good technique in press, gets hands on well. Great athlete, showed his speed and explosiveness at the combine. Good in zone, see’s route concepts and communicates.
cons: Missed 2021 do to a shoulder injury. Change of direction is not as good as his other athletic abilities. Doesn’t throttle down well to make plays in man.
take: Banks is a solid boundary corner with the size and length to play right now. He has the elite athleticism to play in the league he just needs to learn how to throttle down and break on routes to be a threat.
EDGE Tyree Wilson Texas Tech 85
info: 50 pressures 8 sacks 37 tackles 72.8 RDEF 79.9 PRSH. 6'6 271 with 35 5/8 arms. Wilson was a 3 star recruit out of Henderson TX where he was his districts defensive MVP. He initially chose Texas A&M where he played his freshman year before transferring to Texas Tech. He played well over the next 3 years developing into the teams best DL and capped his senior year off with 8 sacks and All American honors.
pros: Great size and length, at 6’6 280 with 35+ inch arms he is a great edge build. Steady improvement every year. Don’t try to block him with a TE, he will dominate him physically. Has a nice long arm and an inside swim.
cons: Never was a star pass rusher, maxing out at 8 sacks. Not a great athlete, not much explosion off the ball or natural power. Can’t win around the edge, the speed and bend isn’t there.
take: Wilson is an impressive looking edge defender that plays with good strength and effort. He’s missing the athleticism you look for in a edge defender, he wont threaten the edge on NFL tackles and will have to really lean on his length. He should be able to start immediately but his ceiling isn’t as high as you would like.
EDGE Myles Murphy Clemson 85
info: 34 pressures 6 sacks 22 tackles 72.8 RDEF 78.5 PRSH. 6'5 268 with 33 3/4 arms. Murphy was a 5 star recruit out of Marietta GA where he had offers from everywhere. After a dominated HS career he joined DJ and Bresee enrolling at Clemson to join the power house up and coming program. He showed out his freshman year getting 5 sacks and being named a freshman All American. He followed his amazing freshman season up with back to back All ACC selections and getting 15 sacks over those 2 years.
pros: The perfect edge build, an athletic 6’5 275. Graded 79 and above all 3 years of college, never even played average. 5 star recruit true junior, he has potential. Great burst off the line, can get up field in a hurry. Shows good bend, can rip and get to the edge with his athleticism. Has good power to his game, devastating long arm and can walk guys back with his length and strength.
cons: His grade dropped every year instead of showing improvement. ND LT ate his lunch, his hand fighting is under developed and will get beat by good technique every time. Can get beat when it's time to make the play because of lack of agility, needs to be a finisher.
take: Murphy is a lot like Walker from last year, he’s the prototypical edge player but is lacking development. Murphy has all the athletic traits you look for, the size, length, strength and athleticism to be a top DE in the league. He just needs to get in his bag and learn pass rush moves and the little things about playing DE and he will be an All Pro player.
OT Paris Johnson Ohio St 85
info: Johnson was the top OT in the class of 2020 along side Georgias Broderick Washington. Johnson stayed local going from his HS in Cincinnati to Ohio State where he served as a backup his entire freshman season. His Sophomore season he got the starting job and was very impressive as Ohio States RG grading out at a 79 PFF grade. He became the LT for the Buckeyes in his final season as he improved his grade to an 83.1 and only allowed 2 sacks and 12 Hurries.
pros: Always graded well for PFF never being below a 79. Improved every year while moving positions. True junior who was a 5 star recruit and the top of his class. Prototypical OT size at 6’6 315. Very good athlete, moves very fluid for a big man and can play in space. Good zone blocker, can reach guys very well with his athleticism.
cons: One year of starting at Tackle where he will be in the NFL. Technique needs work, likes to shoot hands wide and allow guys into his chest. Not a powerful lineman, not moving people in a gap scheme and his anchor is average. Plays off balance too often, feet stop too often and he is left lunging. Loses to the inside far too often, needs to play half the man better.
take: Johnson is a highly thought of prospect but he needs some serious work. He’s the type of player you draw up to play the position but he is lacking the technique and play strength as of now. He has the tools to be a top LT in the league but he’s a far way from it currently.
RB Bijan Robinson Texas 84
info: Robinson was a HS All American where he won the Ed Doherty award (Top Arizona HS player) two years in a row. He had 114 TDs in high school which is a state record and those accolades lead to a high 5 star label with offers from many top programs. He chose Texas over all of them and immediately made an impact running for 700 yards with 8.1 YPC. His second year he took over the full time starting spot and ran for 1,127 yards with a 91.1 PFF run grade and 79 MTF. If that wasn't good enough he came back better than ever, He ran 1,575 yards 18 TDs with 4.17 yards after contact and 1004 MTF. All of that lead to a 96 run grade and a Doak walker award.
pros: Unreal short area quickness, could actually make a defender miss in a phone booth. Very good athlete, can run away in the open field and hit home runs. Good size and strength, can muscle his way through a defender when he needs to and always go forward. Great contact balance, very strong lower half that allows him to eat contact and keep going. Has great instincts when he has the ball, knows where defenders are and the best way to make them miss. Solid hands, shown the ability to make non trivial catches.
cons: Doesn’t have the best vision for and ability to set defenders up to be blocked. Only ok in pass pro, nothing special. Dances a little too much that can cause 4 yard gains to be 0.
take: Robinson is one of the most talented backs ever to enter the draft. There aren’t many flaws in his game, if anything he needs to learn how to slow down and be more decisive. He will immediately become a teams star RB and play very well from day 1 in the NFL
S Brian Branch Alabama 84
info: 74 tackles 2 INT 90.7 RDEF 91.8 TACK 86.4 COV.
pros: True junior that played all 3 years for Alabama. Only missed 4 tackles in his career. Got better every year and had a 89.5 grade in 2022. Great burst, when he see’s something he goes from 0 to 100 real quick. Great IQ, see’s the game well and is versatile.
cons: On the slimmer side for a safety at under 200 pounds. Didn’t play much deep safety, mostly a box safety. Needs to add strength, strong ball carriers can gain extra yards on him.
take: Branch is a very very good football player that will fit on any team. He’s a smart player that can play in the box at a high level and is very aggressive tackling. He will be an NFL starter immediately and could become a top safety in the league.
WR Jordan Addison USC 84
info: Addison was a slightly built 4 star recruit out of Frederick MD where he decided to stay closer to home and enroll at Pitt with future 1st round pick Kenny Pickett. He made an immediate impact by catching 60 balls for 662 yards and was named a True Freshman All American. His Sophomore season blew that out of the water though, he caught 100 balls for 1,593 yards a 17 TDs which was enough to win him the Biletnikoff award. That season made him a hot commodity in the transfer portal where he teamed up with Caleb Williams to lead USC to a comeback season for the Trojans. He caught 59 balls for 875 yards and 8 TDs and was named 1st team All-PAC 12.
pros: Production alone is great, 3,130 career yards and a Biletnikoff award. Good speed, can burn DBs down the field. Fixed drop concerns in 2022, only dropped 2 balls and made a lot of nice catches. Quick in his routes, with the ball and off the line. Good balance, can get knocked around and stay on his feet. Good ball skills down the field, can track the ball well.
cons: Slim frame, at 180 pounds he can get pushed around with physicality and mess up timing. Would have liked to see more production in 2022 with Caleb Williams.
take: Addison is pretty close to Garrett Wilson coming out, both are undersized but so quick and good at the position it didn’t derail them. He can clearly produce while being the teams number 1 and I expect that to continue in the NFL.
OT Anton Harrison Oklahoma 83
info: 1,866 career snaps 72.6 RBLK 83.3 PBLK 9 pressure.
pros: True junior that played every year and started the last 2. Always graded well in pass pro in a pass heavy offense. Solid size and strength, 6’5 310. Very Smooth mover, looks very balanced as solid in pass pro. Great at mirroring DE’s always keeps a good relationship between him  the defender and the QB. Holds his own in the run game, gives great effort.
cons: Would like to see him gain some strength to really start moving people in the run game and anchor better. Played in a unique spread offense where the box was never loaded. Needs to clean up hand placement, still needs to develop that aspect.
take: Harrison is a young good pass protector that impressed all year. He has the issues that young tackles have, he needs more strength and to continue to work on technique but he has shown plenty of good play throughout his career.
CB Cam Smith South Carolina 82
info: 1 INT 6 PBU 20 tackles 64.8 TACK 64.5 COV.
pros: 2021 had an 88.4 PFF grade. Great IQ and instincts, see’s plays develop and can blow up plays. Shifty corner that can cut and accelerate on a dime. Good ball skill, made some great plays on the ball over his career.
cons: Had a down year in 2022 compared to 2021. In 2022 moved to slot and didn’t perform as well as he did at outside. Not a big or very fast athlete, he’s pretty slim and not a 4.4 guy.
take: Smith’s comp is a slightly worse Devon Witherspoon. He’s on the lean side but he plays hard and see’s the game well. He doesn’t look like your prototypical CB but he’s a quick athlete that plays the position at a high level.
OT Broderick Jones Georgia 82
info: Jones was the 1b to Paris Johnsons 1a in the 2020 recruiting class. Similarly, to Johnson, Jones decided to stay local and go to his home state Georgia Bulldogs. He didn’t play much his freshman year but in the championship run in 2021 he got significant playing time getting 438 snaps. He came in to 2022 as the starting LT playing every game and only letting up 9 pressures on 470 pass blocks.
pros: True junior and a high 5 star recruit. Solid power and athleticism, has plays where he over powers LBs and runs to block in space. Wants to finish his blocks, has the dog in him to end the play with the defender on the ground. Reps where he wins the hand fighting game.
cons: 6’4 and not the longest tackle, routinely has issues with longer defenders getting in his pads. Stops his feet too often allowing a secondary rush to beat him. Off balance too often, lunges and loses leverage.
take: Jones is another talented 5 star recruit where you wish he could have played better. He needs to become more of a technician if he wants to win at the NFL level. If he learns how to play with more balance and keep defenders off his chest he can be a great tackle.
OT Dawand Jones Ohio St 81
info: 1,723 career snaps 85 RBLK grade 79.5 PBLK grade 5 pressures.
pros: 2 year starter where he graded above 82 both times. Massive tackle at 6’8 360, dwarfs many defenders he sees. The best physical measurements I've ever seen. 0 sacks and 5 pressure his senior year. Solid run blocking grades, 90 and 85. Great punch timing and placements. Has long arms to keep pass rushers away from him. Can move people in the run game with power.
cons: Slow feet that makes it harder for him to mirror speed rushers. Can get off balance because of his limited athleticism.
take: Jones is ready to step into tackle and play day 1, he’s got the frame that makes OL coaches happy. He’s super long and has solid strength, if he could just get quicker feet he would be an All Pro player at some point in his career.
TE Dalton Kincaid Utah 81
info: 70 receptions 890 yards 8 TDs.
pros: 91.7 PFF receiving grade in 2022, top TE in the country. 1.6% drop percentage, great hands. Good athlete that can use his speed and strength after the catch. Great ball skills, very natural and strong hands. Good routes, knows how to sit in zone and create separation.
cons: More of a slot TE than an inline blocking TE, he can get tossed around while blocking. Was a 5th year player and still not a good blocker.
take: Kincaid is an interesting evaluation; he didn’t start playing football until 2017 but is a natural at it. He has the ability to be one of the best receiving TE’s in the league with his solid athleticism and great hands. He’s not your old school TE that can block inline but if he can work on that and continue to develop, he will be a top 5 TE in the NFL.
WR Quentin Johnston TCU 81
info: Johnston was a high 4 star recruit coming out of Temple HS in TX where he originally committed to Texas. He ultimately decided to go to TCU as one of the highest WR recruits they ever got. His first season there he showed off some impressive deep ball skills racking up 487 yards and 22.1 YPC. In 2021 as a true sophomore he showed his big play ability again with spectacular catches and 604 receiving yards. He really broke out in 2022 where he got 1,067 receiving yards and was named 1st team big 12 and lead TCU to the national championship game.
pros: Great size at 6’4 215 and is 21 as a true junior. He is a walking big play, averaged 18.8 YPC over his career. Great with the ball in his hands, he broke 19 tackles in 2022. Physical freak, can fly at his size, runs past CBs easily. Strong with the ball, can stick a foot in the ground and shake off defenders.
cons: May be the next Kevin White, game may not translate. For a guy his size he only was at a 40% career contested catch rate. Had a 10% drop rate which for a top receiver is a little high. Not impressive out of breaks, will not be creating separation at the stem. Agility and twitch are not apart of his game, he moves a little slow when trying to make people miss
take: null
CB Joey Porter Penn St 80
info: 0 INT 9 PBU 24 tackles 57.7 TACK 77.4 COV.
pros: Good size at 6’2 198. Has the prototypical outside corner build, good speed long arms and good size. Physical at the line, he wont be bullied in press.
cons: Not a twitched up athlete, his change of direction and acceleration are only ok. Only one INT in 4 years, needs to play the ball better. Has to be grabby because his feet are not quick.
take: Porter is a big press corner that has played pretty well for Penn State over his career. He has all the tools to be a starting corner in the league but he’s not there yet. He’s feet are not good enough so he gets very grabby or beat badly.
DL Calijah Kancey Pitt 80
info: 47 pressures 8 sacks 19 tackles 80.9 RDEF 92.4 PRSH. 6'1 281 with 30 5/8 arms. 47 pressures 8 sacks 19 tackles 80.9 RDEF 92.4 PRSH.
pros: Great athlete for the position, so quick off of the ball. Played all 3 years at a high level. ACC player of the year and an all American. Can swim and sidestep then bend around guards like nothing, they can’t handle his speed. Actually held up to double teams really well. Great leverage, gets under OL and can bull them back.
cons: Wildly undersized at 6 foot 280. If a good OL gets hands on the rep is over, he’s small.
take: Kancey is the closest thing to Aaron Donald I’ve seen, he’s just a weaker and smaller Donald. That’s not a slight though, he’s still plenty strong and consistently abused OL. As long as a team doesn’t ask him to sit and occupy a gap or 2 gap he’s going to be an impact player.
EDGE Will Mcdonald Iowa St 80
info: 25 pressures 6 sacks 27 tackles 70.7 RDEF 84.1 PRSH. 6'4 245 with 34 7/8 arms.
pros: Great length, at 6’3 he has 35 inch arms. 4 straight years of 6+ sacks, great production. Had a 13 sack year in 2021, he has the pass rush pedigree. Lead the nation in pass rush win rate in true pass set situations. Great athlete for the position, can explode off the line and change direction well.
cons:  A tad undersized at 6’3 240, ideally he would put on 10 more pounds. Not very strong, can get pushed around in the run game.
take: Mcdonald is a very good pass rusher that has the production to back that up. He’s a long armed and good athlete that can give tackles trouble in the pass game. He seems to be a pass rush only kind of player though, he has a slim build and never wows you with power.
LB Jack Campbell Iowa 80
info: 83 tackles 85.6 RDEF 81.3 TACK 65.3 PRSH 92.9 COV. 6'5 250 with 32 inch arms.
pros: 2022 Butkus Award winner and an All American as well as a team captain. Made a massive jump in 2022 to become the nations top LB. Had back to back 80+ tackle seasons. Had a 92.9 coverage grade with 2 INTs, he’s a smart player that understands the game. 6’5 246, perfect MLB size. Good IQ, identifies run plays quickly to fill his gap and does a good job in the pass game finding receivers behind him. Good at meeting blockers in the hole and getting off the block to make a play.
cons: He lacks the aggressiveness in his game to make huge plays, doesn’t fly through the line to meet the RB in the backfield. Not a top end athlete, he is a little slow accelerating which hurts when he is guarding the slot.
take: Campbell is your prototypical MLB, with the great size and production you love to see at the college level. He’s missing the top end athleticism that will get you drafted in the first round but he is a good football player and should be an immediate starter.
OT Darnell Wright Tennessee 80
info: 2,746 career snaps 65 RBLK 80.2 PBLK 8 pressures.
pros: Started at both left and right tackle. Good size at 6’6 335. Pretty good hands, the placement is good and has a strong grip. Strong overall player, can move guys and anchor well in pass pro.
cons: Not an athlete, is very mediocre in space and has trouble working to the 2nd level. Waist bender, doesn’t move his feet well and leans on guys.
take: Wright is your classic big guy that can handle power but speed can get him. He’s not athletic enough to be one of the top tackles in the NFL but he can certainly start for a team.
TE Michael Mayer Notre Dame 80
info: Mayer was the number 2 TE recruit and the Gatorade Kentucky player of the year. He had all the schools offering him so he decided to go to the TE factory ND. He immediately flashed as a top TE along side Tommy Tremble. His first year he caught 42 balls for 450 yards and solidified himself as NDs next great TE. He backed it up the next 2 years catching over 65 balls and 800 yards each year with a PFF grade of 92.5 in 2022 where he was named an All American.
pros: True junior at 6’4 250 with a 90+ PFF grade and an All American. Great run blocker, very willing and strong at the point of attack. Strong hands, can catch a ball while being hit by an LB.
cons: Not the modern day 4.4 blazing fast TE that can play WR as well.
take: Mayer will be at least a solid starting TE for an NFL team that is his floor. He’s a big strong TE that has great hands and an ability to get open. If he can just get a little more athleticism he can be a top TE in the NFL.
WR Josh Downs North Carolina 80
info: Downs was a 4 star recruit out of Suwanee GA where he was an All State player as well as a triple jump and long jump star. He committed to North Carolina to play with Sam Howell and learn behind Dyamni Brown. After Brown went to the NFL Downs stepped up and became the teams number 1 catching 101 balls for 1,335 yards and solidified himself as one of the nations top WRs. He came back in 2022 and caught 94 yards for 1,029 yards and 11 TDs which was good enough to be an All American.
pros: Back to back 1,000 yard seasons with 195 receptions over the 2 years. Fixed drop issue in 2022 only dropping 3% of his targets. Top tier ball skills, can rise up over defenders to make a play. Good athlete, has great speed and can make plays with the ball in his hands.
cons: 5’10 175, a very small build for a receiver. Not the quick and twitch elite level you want for a guy his size. Almost exclusively worked from the slot.
take: Downs is going to be helped out by how well Jahan Dotson played in 2022. They have similar skill sets with solid hands good speed and being undersized. He should be able to step into a teams slot receiver role and play immediately.
DL Bryan Bresee Clemson 79
info: 24 pressures 3 sacks 9 tackles 63.4 RDEF 82 PRSH. 6'5 305 with 32 1/2 arms. Breese was the number 1 overall recruit playing at Damascus HS in MD. He had 35 sacks in HS with 134 career tackles and capped off his career with a state championship. After being named the Gatorade player of the year he committed to Clemson over every other power 5 school where he would play as a true freshman. He racked up 4 sacks and was named the ACC defensive freshman of the year and was an All ACC player. He only played in 4 games in 2021 after sufferring an injury to his knee and missed the rest of the season. He came back in 2022 and looked a lot like his freshman year and delt with a lot of adversity. He had a kidney inffection as well as dealt with the trauma of his sister having brain cancer. He battled through the season and finished the season with 3 sacks and an ACC championship.
pros: Former number 1 recruit over Jalen Carter that played well as a true freshman. 6’5 300 and a great athlete, has the physical tools. Good athlete for his size and can be a problem on stunts and free rushes. Shows plays where he flashes good pass rush moves.
cons: Under 1,000 career snaps, missed most of 2021. A lot of stunts from the Clemson D that isn’t how he will play much in the NFL. Shorter arms than you would like, can let OL into his pads and dictate the block. Pad level is too high, plays upright. He has been hurt every season, injuries are a concern. Not your every down solid player way too flashy.
take: Bresee had a somewhat disappointing career, he flashed as a freshman but didn’t really build on that. He’s a talented DL with the size and strength but he’s missing consistency. He can come in and be a rotational piece on the DL but if he develops he could be a good starter.
WR Zay Flowers Boston College 79
info: 78 receptions 1,077 yards 12 TDs.
pros: Put up 3,000 career yards and 29 TDs. Makes some nice plays on the ball down the field, can adjust well. Shifty and fast, with space he can be electric.
cons: 5’10 170, he’s a very small receiver. Drops are an issue at 10.8% career drop rate. Haven’t seen him beat press too much, may be a slot only.
take: Flowers is another small explosive receiver that has good athleticism but the size may limit him. He’s very good with the ball in his hands and can make plays down the field so that should make him a viable receiver in the NFL. Its to be determined if he has the ability to translate to the NFL but with his athleticism its worth a shot.
C John Michael-Schmitz Minnesota 78
info: 2,495 career snaps 92.4 RBLK 81 PBLK 8 pressures.
pros: Remington award winner and the top graded center at 92.3.4 seasons of over 400 snaps with over 80 PFF grades. Good center size at 6’4 320, not a typical undersized lineman. Solid strength for a center, can anchor well against bull rushes. Great zone blocker, runs his feet well and gives high effort. Good IQ in pass pro and uses his hands well.
cons: Older prospect, going to be 24 in the NFL. Plays high leaving him vulnerable to be out leveraged. Would like to see more power in the run game by vertically moving people off the ball.
take: Michael Schmitz is ready to step in and play center in the NFL, he was fairly dominate in college which should allow him to be a serviceable starting center. The upside isn’t really there, he isn’t a special athlete but he’s solid and that’s whats needed in the center position.
CB Emmanuel Forbes Mississippi St 78
info: 6 INT 7 PBU 42 tackles 67.9 TACK 89.3 COV.
pros: Allowed 3 completions in man coverage, that’s also how many INTs he had. 14 INTs in 3 years and is a true junior. Great ball skills, locates the ball and makes plays on it. Long frame and loves to be physical, will get hands on and try to be physical. Has some great high IQ plays that can turn the tide in a game.
cons: Lean frame, another 6 foot 180 pound corner. Again he’s a twig. Not going to be a good run support player, needs to add strength. He’s a gambler, can get beat by losing his assignment.
take: Forbes looks like Devonta Smith with the lack of size on him. He’s not a very strong corner so he will struggle with that in the NFL but he plays hard and covered SEC receivers really well. He is a boom or bust corner though, he’s a gambler like Marcus Peters. If he’s right more than he is wrong he could have a great NFL career.
DL Adetomiwa Adebawore Northwestern 78
info: 31 pressures 6 sacks 28 tackles 68.3 RDEF 80.3 PRSH. 6’2 284 with 34 arms.
pros: Solid stout build at 6’2 with long arms. Good athlete, gets off the ball quick and can shoot gaps. Good hands in the run game, can keep guards away from him and toss them off to make the play. Good hustle player, chases QBs with effort and makes tackles down the field. Versatile player, can play edge on run downs then the interior in the pass game.
cons: On the slimmer side at sub 290, he is a tweener. Has trouble holding up to power, can get bullied a bit in the run game. Won’t be able to rush off the edge, tackles are too good for him to beat. No pass rush plan, just tries to win with pure athleticism. No bend on the edge, can’t beat any NFL tackle to the outside.
take: Adebawore was the best DL on Northwestern for the last few years, he’s a long high motor player that makes plays in the backfield. He’s got good quickness and athleticism to his game for an interior DL but he’s a tweener, playing both edge and DL. His skillset makes him a chess piece for a DC, he can play the run great on early downs and be moved inside to rush on pass downs to maximize his ability.
DL Keeanu Benton Wisconsin 78
info: 28 pressures 6 sacks 25 tackles 65.2 RDEF 83.5 PRSH. 6’3 312 with 33 ¾ arms.
pros: Great build, good size with solid length. Great power on initial contact, has an innate ability to create movement. Flashes dominate quick reps where he beats people badly on the snap. Big guy that can hold his ground and make a play in the run game.
cons: Looks like he doesn’t have a plan out there, just goes full speed at a lineman. Not a great athlete, could struggle to chase down QBs. Inconsistent, not sure if usage or him but he stands at the line a lot.
take: Benton has some stupid power, he can absolutely toss OL and make plays in the backfield. He’s got some quicks to his game as well making him dangerous in the pass game. He’s just got to play like his highlight reel consistently to be a serious star in the NFL because he has that kind of talent.
EDGE Felix Anudike-Uzomah Kansas St 78
info: 46 pressures 8 sacks 34 tackles 74.6 RDEF 73 PRSH. 6'3 255 with 33 1/2 arms.
pros: True junior, played at a very high level as a true sophomore. Has the size, speed and strength to play edge in the NFL. Has won around the edge and has won with power rushes.
cons: Didn’t improve or follow up on a great 2021 season. Not a great athlete, lacks the bust you would like to see out of an edge. Good tackles get their hands on him easily and the rep is over.
take: Anuike-Uzomah looks like an NFL edge, he would not be out of place on an NFL field. I struggle to see his upside though, better competition can shut down his pass rush and he’s lacking the top end traits. He could be a solid starter in the NFL but that is probably his ceiling.
LB Daiyan Henley Washington St 78
info: 74 tackles 68.7 RDEF 90.3 TACK 75.1 PRSH 68.6 COV. 6'2 225 with 33 arms.
pros: Only missed 5 tackles in 2022. Originally was a WR so he has some real athleticism and ball skills, he had 4 INTs in 2021. Very good in man, good athlete that can cover TE’s easily. Willing to come up and hit OL and run through ball carriers. Shows the ability to slip right past blockers in the run and pass game to make plays in the backfield. Moves great for an inside LB, has great burst and good bend.
cons: 5th year senior with only one year at the FBS level. A little shoer for the position at just under 6’1, but he has decent length. Not a refined LB, can tell he’s not processing the game at the highest level yet, he’s more of an attack player.
take: Henley is an interesting prospect, he started at WR before putting some muscle on and moving the LB. He has great athleticism for the position and can immediately find a role in the NFL on pass downs for sure. If he continues to learn more and more about LB and become more instinctive he will be a great NFL LB.
OT Matthew Bergeron Syracuse 78
info: 2,539 career snaps 69 RBLK 80.9 PBLK 12 pressures.
pros: Improved over his 4 year career at Syracuse while getting a lot of experience. Has NFL size at 6’5 322 with 33.5 inch arms. Solid in pass pro because he’s got solid size and decent athleticism. Good at picking up stunts and games from the DL.
cons: Loves to hold, a lot of missed holding calls on his tape. Inconsistent technique, oversets too much and doesn’t play with a strong posture leading him to lose balance. Not a mauler in the run game. Wasted motion with his punches, loads up hands and exposes his chest.
take: Bergeron has the size and movement skills you look for in an OT. Like most college OT’s there’s a lot he needs to work on technique wise but he’s a smart player that already has played solid. In a few years he could be a starting OT if he continues to develop.
RB Jahmyr Gibbs Alabama 78
info: Gibbs was a 3 star coming out of Dalton GA initially before leading the state in rushing with 2,554 rushing yards an 40 TDs as a senior. He got bumped up to a 4 start and got offers from the SEC power houses but stayed commited to Georgia Tech. For some reason he was a rotation piece for GT in his first 2 years rushing for a combined 1,200 yards and 8 TDS before transfering to Bama where he was their lead back.  He iwas an impact player for Bama and ran for over 920 yards and 7 TDs as a true junior with 0 fumbles to go with it.
pros: Home run hitter at RB, with a 6.2 YPC and 52.5% of his yards coming on break away runs he is dangerous to take any carry to the house.  He's a solid receiver, with an 82.3 receiving grade and only 2 career drops he can be dangerous out of the backfield. Runs crisp routes, is a problem when he has an option route against a LB. Elite athlete at RB, great speed to go along with being twitchy. Breaks 1 on 1 open field tackles easily.
cons: Struggled in pass pro at bama receiving a 24 PFF grade in 2022. Doesn’t have the best running style, a lot of big plays or a short gain. Isn’t patient and not decisive, he doesn’t set up blockers well and hit holes with conviction. Likes to bounce to the outside too often.
take: null
S Jartavius Martin Illinois 78
info: 55 tackles 3 INT 91 RDEF 90.1 TACK 66 COV. 5’11 194 with 31 1/8.
pros: Elite athlete, 44 inch vertical with 4.46 40. Very good range, covers a lot of ground in a little time. Good tackler, 5% missed tackle rate in the last 2 years. Moves like he a madden 13 player, looks so easy for him. Versatile, can play CB and safety.
cons: Not the biggest DB, he’s undersized a little in every way. Doesn’t look that instinctive, other safeties are quicker to see things.
take: NA
C Joe Tippmann Wisconsin 77
info: 1,456 career snaps 78 RBLK 79.2 PBLK 5 pressures.
pros: Wisconsin lineman that is 21 6’6 315 and has played good football every year. He has a sick mullet, he looks the part. Really good athlete for his size, can pull and play in space. Solid in pass pro, locks on defenders and keeps them infront of him. Solid strength, he can anchor well and shows plays in the run game where he can move the LOS
cons: At 6’6 he’s a high cut center, going to struggle to out leverage NTs. Not consistent with his use of power because of leverage. Can get off balance from bending at the waist too much because of height.
take: Weird to say but if Tippmann was about 2-3 inches shorter he may be an early day 2 pick. Many of his weaknesses are due to a lack of leverage but he’s a good athlete that’s young and has shown some power. He should be able to be a low end early on starter and develop into a solid center.
CB Kelee Ringo Georgia 77
info: 2 INT 5 PBU 40 tackles 69.4 TACK 70.3 COV.
pros: Physical specimen, he has the most impressive physical traits in the corner back group. Great speed to pursue plays. Good reps where he runs the route for the defenders. Played on 2 national championship teams and played well each year.
cons: Not the best change of direction, shifty receivers can gain separation too easily. Doesn’t use his hands enough at the line, likes to mirror WRs but that’s not his game.
take: Ringo is the player you create in madden at CB. He’ a big strong fast boundary corner that played solid in the SEC and won 2 national championships. Like many big corners he struggle sticking to shiftier WRs because he’s a little tight but he’s a good corner that can play immediately.
CB Clark Phillips Utah 77
info: 4 INT 6 PBU 22 tackles 37 TACK 86.3 COV.
pros: PAC 12 defensive player of the year. Very good athlete, moves very well. Instinctive and smart, see’s plays happening very fast to make breaks on the ball. Very aggressive corner, willing to throw his body around and make a play.
cons: A smaller corner at 5’10 183. Missed an absurd 28% of his tackles in 2022. Wish he was longer so he could play press man better.
take: If Clark Phillips was 2 inches taller and a tad bigger he’d be a top 10 pick. He plays the game at such a high level, but he really struggles with his biggest weakness. He’s small and misses too many tackles, for all the good anticipation he has he still needs to make the play. Phillips may be one of the top CBs in the league if he become a more physical player and can bring down NFL ball carriers.
CB Julius Brents Kansas St 77
info: 4 INT 3 PBU 24/52 374 yards 40 tackles 75.5 COV. 6’3 198 with 34 arms.
pros: Perfect build, long arms and good size. Good athlete jumped 41 inches and had great agility work. Moves very well for a tall corner, can open his hips and go. Good wrap up tackler with his length. Good in zone at scanning the routes and QB.
cons: Had to leave Iowa to get playing time. Struggled against Johnston with his speed and ability deep. Gets crossed over way to much, needs to be more patient. Long speed is surprisingly lacking.
take: NA
DL Keion White Georgia Tech 77
info: 41 pressures 7 sacks 33 tackles 78.7 RDEF 75.6 PRSH. 6'5 285 with 34 arms.
pros: Solid size, at 6’5 280 he a big edge that can handle the edge.  Played well for GT, he was a physical player with a high motor. Good power for an edge, has a bull rush and strong hands. Could play interior and be a solid rusher from there. Freaky athlete at his size, is very strong and surprisingly athletic.
cons: Already 24 years old. A bit of a tweener, he’s not a good enough athlete to win on the edge. Wasn’t dominate even at 24 and 280, he has a bull but its not special. Not long enough to win on the edge with his long arm.
take: White is all potential at this point, he is raw in the pass game and only had one year of power 5 play. He is a physical freak at 280 with the strength to play interior and just enough to play edge. He isn’t a starter day 1 and needs a lot of work but he could end up being a very good DL.
DL Mazi Smith Michigan 77
info: 25 pressures 1 sack 38 tackles 81 RDEF 68 PRSH. 6'3 323 with 33 3/4 arms.
pros: Freaky athlete, was Feldmans number 1 payer at 337 he did 22 reps of 325 and has a sub 7 3 cone. Over 600 snaps in 2022, he can play a lot of snaps every game. Unreal play strength, just tosses OL around.
cons: 2 career sacks even though he is a freaky athlete. No pass rush to speak of, barely uses hands and doesn’t try to bull the OL often. Terrible get off, just kind of stands straight up.
take: For a 4th year senior he is so underdeveloped. He’s a physical freak, god only made so many people as strong as he is but he doesn’t use it well. He’s got no pass rush, barely gets off the ball and no hand technique. If he would develop he could be unstoppable.
EDGE Derick Hall Auburn 77
info: 47 pressures 8 sacks 43 tackles 61 RDEF 82.2 PRSH. 6'3 254 with 34 1/2 arms.
pros: Great length, 6’3 252 with 34.5 inch arms. 3 straight years of 80+ PFF pass rush grades. The best long arm in the class, can do either hand and walk tackles back. Good motor and is always trying to get to the QB. Has a solid get off and can get to the edge because of it.
cons: Not much of a run defender, too many plays where he needs to be more physical and make a play. One trick pony, he has a long arm and that is it.
take: Hall is a powerful long edge defender that uses his strengths well. He has a lethal long arm move and can get off the block to finish the play on the QB. He’s only average in the run game though where he can lose the runner too easy and not make the play on them. He’s a sure fire NFL edge player, how good he can be is up to the continued development to set up his long arm even better.
EDGE Zach Harrison Ohio St 77
info: 33 pressures 6 sacks 18 tackles 78.4 RDEF 85.2 PRSH. 6'5 274 with 36 1/4 arms.
pros: Great size at 6’6 272 as well as a 5 star recruit. Never graded poorly and had 3 straight 85+ PRSH grades. 91.1 PRSH grade on true pass sets with a 27.7 win rate. 35.75 inch arms, he’s freaky long. Strong in the run game, can keep tackles off him and set an edge.
cons: Tight hips and can’t bend an edge well. Not consistent firing off the ball, if he doesn’t jump the snap he’s a tad slow off the ball. Not much of a pass rush plan, he only uses power and a swim.
take: Harrison is made in a lab physically to play edge, the 6’6 270 pound defender. He has the strength, long arms and violent hands to be a starter in the league. He may not be quick enough or have enough bend to be a top tier edge but he certainly can start in the league.
EDGE BJ Ojulari LSU 77
info: 49 pressures 9 sacks 35 tackles 70.9 RDEF 81.5 PRSH. 6'2 248 with 34 1/4 arms.
pros: Brother of Azeez who was a second-round pick for the Giants. True junior, will just turn 21 before the draft and already as near 2,000 SEC snaps. Wore number 18 at LSU representing a high character player. Great burst off the edge, he is a serious threat to beat tackles up the field. Quick and violent hands, can swim past a tackle easily. Very good athlete that plays with a high motor to chase down plays. Has nice counters to moves already and is relentless when he’s rushing. Has good rush technique, whether that be a dip and rip or an swim/spin.
cons: May not have the ideal size, he looks a little slim on tape, at 6’3 250 would like to be a tad bigger. Needs to win with speed but his bend isn’t at the elite level you would like to see. Power in the run game will be an issue especially early on.
take: Ojulari will open his career as a pass rush specialist. He’s a great athlete that already has the moves to get to the QB and the motor to chase down plays. He’s on the smaller side which will limit him on early/run downs but the pass rushing upside it there.
LB Trenton Simpson Clemson 77
info: 51 tackles 70.3 RDEF 72.1 TACK 66 PRSH 63.6 COV. 6'2 235 with 32 3/8 arms.
pros: Dad was in the military so he has a great attitude. 5 star athlete that is a true junior. 6’3 235 and a great athlete, he is the prototypical LB. Moves very well on the field, makes quick movements and has the agility to bend and change direction. Top level testing numbers, as good an athlete you will get at LB. When he recognizes a play he bursts to it and can finish any play.
cons: Didn’t live up to the 5 star and physical attributes. Didn’t play much true LB where he would fill gaps and play coverage from the box instead of way out in the slot. A lot of reps on the edge but he isn’t long enough or refined enough to play there. Can get toasted in man coverage, good routes beat him easily.
take: Simpson has all the talent in the world and not reason he shouldn’t be the best player on the field. Unfortunately he has never played well in a traditional linebacker mold, he’s not great in coverage and he doesn’t read plays that well. He could be a solid starter for a team but in a Devin White or Patrick Queen role, don’t ask him to play LB, make him blitz and make plays that require a top level athlete.
LB Drew Sanders Arkansas 77
info: 63 tackles 70.8 RDEF 57.2 TACK 75.3 PRSH 74.3 COV. 6'4 235 with 32 1/8 arms.
pros: 6’5 232, he’s a good MLB size. Former 5 star recruit that switched positions and graded as a 77.8 in his lone year starting in the SEC. Had 11 sacks as a LB can be a hybrid edge. Long rangy LB that can make plays sideline to sideline. Very good recognition and an aggressive LB that will blow up run plays.
cons: One year starter that couldn’t find the field at Alabama. Missed nearly 20% of his tackles in 2022. Not the best in coverage, still needs to learn route concepts so he can cover them. Not a very strong backer, a little slim so he can get moved in the run game.
take: Sanders is an interesting prospect, he has one year at off ball LB and he showed out. He’s a long fluid athlete that showed great effort and good recognition in the run game. He’s got the versatility to line up at edge as well making him a threat. If he learns more about playing off ball LB in coverage and adds some mass he can be special.
OG O’Cyrus Torrence Florida 77
info: 3,065 career snaps 89.9 RBLK 76.1 PBLK 8 pressures.
pros: Big guard at 6’5 347 and has played both sides. A lot of experience and all of it has been good play. Showed that he was as good at Florida in the SEC as he was at LA Lafayette. 0 carrier sacks allowed, has a very strong anchor and is tough to bull rush. Good power in the run game, can be a real people mover.
cons: Has very little laterally agility to his game, can struggle with quick rushers. Jalen Carter beat him pretty bad on most plays, can’t handle quickness.
take: Torrence is a massive man that plays power football at a high level. He has issues in pass protection with speed and his lack of quickness but he has the potential to clean that up. He should be able to step in immediately and play guard.
OT Cody Mauch North Dakota St 77
info: 2,461 career snaps 90.1 RBLK 81.7 PBLK 9 pressures.
pros: My man looks like a lineman, 2 missing teeth and long hair. Graded very well for PFF, 90.8 overall grade in 2022 with only 9 pressures. Improved every year getting stronger and better. Got that dawg in him, wants to finish ever block with the defender on the ground. Some impressive run blocking reps that make you belive he has the power to play in the NFL.
cons: Definitely undersized, at just 303 pounds and short arms (32 inches) it will be tough to handle NFL power. 5th year player that already had to add so much size on his frame. Very sloppy feet in pass pro, the base gets way too narrow and his sets are not the best. Plays very high, need to sink his hips more to get better leverage.
take: Mauch is a solid athlete even after putting on so much weight in his college career. He’s a tenacious run blocker that has upside, but his technique and power are just huge question marks. He’s a solid developmental tackle to have, once he cleans up his technique he could be a starter.
RB Zach Charbonnet UCLA 77
info: Charbonnet was a top 50 recruit coming out of Oaks Christian in Westlake Village CA. He committed to Michigan where he flashed before leaving when Blake Corum came into town with Hassan Haskins. He transferred to UCLA where he was their number one back and ran for over 1000 yards back to back years and 90 PFF grades. He finished his career as a first team all Big 12 RB and a top RB in the nation.
pros: Breaks tackles at a high level forcing 121 missed tackles in his 2 years as a starter. Prototypical back, he's 6'1 220 and is a good athlete that can play on all 3 downs. 2 fumbles in 566 career attempts. Production is outstanding, in 2021 he ran for 1,358 Yards 7.0 YPC and 14 TDs. Surprising wiggle for a big back like himself, can shake DBs in the open field. He has a good feel for breaking tackles in every way. Strong at the point of contact, willing to get north south for the extra yardage. Solid in pass pro, can get hands on and stun defenders.
cons: Had to transfer to the PAC-12 to become a star. Not fluid out of the backfield, doesn’t scare any defense. Doesn’t have the athleticism that you look for in a top back.
take: Charbonnet is the prototypical work horse back, he doesn’t need to come off the field because he does it all. He’s a big back that can play on 3rd down, make the right reads and break tackles. The only thing he’s missing is the next level athleticism.
S Sydney Brown Illinois 77
info: 56 tackles 6 INT 67.8 RDEF 58.9 TACK 89.4 COV. 5’10 211 with 31 ½ arms.
pros: Top level athlete at the safety position, jumps and 40 were great. Great movement skills, can be sticky in man coverage. Jacked, shredded and all muscle.
cons: Career 17.8% missed tackle rate, needs to be better. Smaller safety that may have an issue at the catch point.
take: NA
TE Darnell Washington Georgia 77
info: 28 receptions 454 yards 2 TDs.
pros: He sticks out on a field of SEC players by towering over everyone, he’s 6’7 270. True junior who player all 3 years with above a 68 PFF grade. Almost like having an extra OL, 81 run block grade. Solid as a check down receiver, wont just be an extra OL.
cons: Never was a volume TE receiver, 45 career receptions. Will never be a receiving threat, he’s just a guy as a receiver.
take: Washington has his clear strength and that’s run blocking, he’s a massive TE with the ability to contribute to the pass game. He’s not going to be an impact receiving threat ever but he should be able to easily contribute to a team.
WR Rashee Rice SMU 77
info: 96 receptions 1,344 yards 10 TDs.
pros: 6’3 205, has a good build for the position. Amazing at adjusting to the ball mid air and winning 50/50. Good speed for his size, can run away from defenders. Good with the ball in his hands, can make defenders miss easily. Was the number one guy his final year and got better every year.
cons: Played at SMU so not the best competition he went against. Didn’t see many advanced routes or technique, usually won on simple go’s or hitches and him being more physical.
take: Rice developed into a star for SMU in 2022, doubling his production from the previous year. He played against weaker competition that you would have liked to see but he’s such a physically gifted receiver that he will not be out of place in the NFL. If he can continue to progress he will be a star in the NFL.
WR Michael Wilson Stanford 77
info: 27 receptions 421 yards 4 TD 72 RECV.
pros: Good size at 6’2 216 and 9 7/8 inch hands. 62% contested catch rate, has good body control and hands. Good routes and releases, uses tempo well as well as physical ability to separate. Can add value after the catch with is size and athleticism.
cons: Extensive injury history, missed time nearly every year. Played 5 years and never had a great PFF grade.
take: Wilson only has 2 negatives and neither have to do with his ability. He wasn’t very productive and he has some big time injury concerns. Other than that he has the size, ball skills and athleticism as well as route running ability to play in the league. He should step in and immediately be a starting NFL receiver.
WR Marvin Mims Oklahoma 77
info: 54 receptions 1,082 yards 6 TDs.
pros: 19.5 Yards per catch, he’s a solid deep threat. 89 PFF receiving grade as a true freshman. Good athlete, very fluid in space and can punt return. Good with the ball, slippery to tackle, guys slide right off him even at 185. Great ball skills, made some unreal catches. True junior that produced every year at OK.
cons: 5’11 184, would like to see him add size. Played in a system where there is nothing but space to deal with, which is where he excels.
take: Mims was a stud recruit breaking Texas state records in high school and immediately made an impact in college. He has the athleticism and ball skills that are going to translate to the next level. He’s on the smaller side though which may limit him as a number 2 option, but he has the ability to be a good NFL WR.
WR Jonathan Mingo Ole Miss 77
info: 51 receptions 861 yards 5 TD 77.7 RECV.
pros: Very good size, 6’1 226 and 32 inch arms with 10 inch hands. Good athlete, his acceleration and agility are good. Good strength and run after the catch.
cons: Hands are average at best, 10.3 career drop percentage and 43.9% contested catch. Not a good route runner, doesn’t create separation by himself.
take: Mingo is a raw receiver with great upside. The physical part of the position he has down, he’s big fast and strong. He’s lacking the technical parts of the position though, his hands are all right and his routes are not good. The Ole Miss offense didn’t give him a shot to show it off but if he develops his game he can be a steal.
C Rickey Stromberg Arkansas 76
info: 3,121 career snaps 83.7 RBLK 77.1 PBLK 11 pressures.
pros: Solid size at 6’4 315 with 33 inch arms and 22 years old. 4 year starter that improved every year of his career. Good strength in the run game, can turn DL as well as drive LBs back. Has a solid anchor and a good feel for blitzes and stunts in pass pro.
cons: In the games where he played NFL talent you can see him struggle more than you would like. Leans a little too much in pass pro, needs to sink and play lower. Not high level athlete, wont wow anyone with blocks in space.
take: Stromberg is an impressive center, he can be dominate in the run game and he’s solid in pass pro. He checks all the boxes you want in a center and should be able to start as a rookie.
CB Eli Ricks Alabama 76
info: 0 INT 5 PBU 6/19 77 yards 62.1 TACK 72.9 COV. 6’2 188 with 32 3/8 arms.
pros: Young player that has starts at 2 major programs with 4 INTs as a true freshman. Former 5 star recruit in 2020. Solid in press, uses his hands at the line and mirrors well. Very good at playing the ball, multiple pick 6’s and plays through receivers.
cons: Needs to put on mass, he will struggle tackling and with physicality. May have an issue with double moves, he plays routes aggressively. Agility is only average, not a quick corner.
take: NA
CB DJ Turner Michigan 76
info: 1 INT 7 PBU 33/71 408 yards 31 tackles 76.2 COV. 5’11 178 with 30 ¾ arms.
pros: Elite athlete, 4.26 40 with great jumps. Fluid athlete that plays with solid technique. Willing to put his body on the line to make a tackle.
cons: Not a big corner, shorter arms and light. Marvin Harrison Jr exposed him a bit. Has a tough time staying stuck on receivers, a lot of making up ground. Tackling may be an issue, not great form and he’s not strong. Doesn’t play the ball well.
take: NA
CB Garrett Williams Syracuse 76
info: 1 INT 1 PBU 14/21 253 yards 27 tackles 72.1 COV. 5’10 192 with 31 arms. Williams was a lightly recruited corner out of Hickory Ridge in Harrisburg NC. He committed to Syracuse where he played on special teams his 2019 season. He then took over across from Melifwanu to form a top tier secondary and was named to the Freshman All American team by the Athletic. He had a “down” 2nd season where he was an All-ACC HM allowing 33 receptions and 380 yards.
pros: Solid size, 6 foot 190 and looks the part. Breaks on screens and flat routes well. No penalties in the last 2 years. Very good quickness, breaks on routes and accelerates well. See’s the game well, very good in cover 2.
cons: Tore his ACL in 2022. Smaller corner, 5’10 with 31 inch arms he doesn’t have the ideal size. Long speed and length limit his ability to cover go routes.
take: NA
CB Cory Trice Purdue 76
info: 2 INT 9 PBU 21/44 220 yards 87 TACK 73.9 COV. 6’3 206 with 32 3/8 arms.
pros: Great size and length. Pretty good athlete. Good transitions, can flip his hips well and break on balls. Good in zone at breaking off his route to play the ball.
cons: Not a strong corner, wont jam guys off the line well. A little to handsy and grabs too much.
take: NA
DL Siaki Ika Baylor 76
info: 18 pressures 0 sacks 20 tackles 69.1 RDEF 76.2 PRSH. 6'4 358 with 32 3/8 arms.
pros: Great size at 6’4 358, he can easily play the nose. Rare combo of size and quickness, can move like he’s 300 pounds not 350. Fires off the ball low and plays with a strong base.
cons: A nose tackle only most likely which is going to drive his stock down. Can get moved against double teams, doesn’t brace for the second OL well.
take: Ika is the prototypical NT with his large frame and strong base he can hold down the middle of a defense. He’s also a lot quicker than you would think at that size, he can pull out a spin move or a quick swim as well. He should be able to step in and play NT in the NFL and only get better from here.
DL Zacch Pickens South Carolina 76
info: 19 pressures 3 sacks 31 tackles 60.7 RDEF 75 PRSH. 6’4 300 with 34 1/8 arms.
pros: 5 star DL recruit that played all 4 years in college. Good size and length. Plays his gap very well, stout in the run game and engages OL very well with good hands. Strong hands and have a very nice quick swim.
cons: Gets surprised with pull blocks sometimes, doesn’t anticipate the down block. Not the best athlete, not going to chase any play down. Not much off a pass rusher right now, bulls into a guy and then will try to rip away. Inconsistent dominate reps, they come far and few between.
take: Pickens flashes the ability to be a good NFL starter on the DL. He’s long with a powerful punch and quick hands to beat OL very quick off the snap. He’s just had a sort of disappointing career after being a 5 star recruit you would like to see him be more consistent. He will easily be a good rotational DL to start his career with the upside of a good starting DT.
DL Moro Ojomo Texas 76
info: 26 pressures 5 sacks 19 tackles 91.4 RDEF 84.1 PRSH. 6’2 293 with 34 3/8 arms.
pros: Good length, he has good leverage at 6’2 with over 34 inch arms. Broke out in 2022, jumped to a 90 PFF grade. Very good against the run and pass. Good effort, fights through blocks to try to make the play. Uses hands decently, strong hands that can throw lineman off him.
cons: Not the thickest build, sub 300 pounds. Will struggle against double teams with his mass.
take: Ojomo is being slept on this draft, he had a great 2022 season and has the body type you look for. He’s a little undersized so he needs to continue to add mass to hold up in the run game but his effort makes up for it. He has great length, strong hands and good quickness to be a disruptive player.
EDGE Isaiah Foskey Notre Dame 76
info: 33 pressures 12 sacks 26 tackles 67.8 RDEF 73.1 PRSH. 6'5 264 with 34 arms.
pros: Team captain for Notre Dame. Solid size at 6’5 262 and 33.75 inch arms. Good athlete, can get around the edge and bend to make a play. Solid hands, will swipe hands off him and try to re fit to get good leverage.
cons: Plays with poor balance, on the ground too often. Not a very powerful edge player, won’t bull many tackles and may get pushed in the run game.
take: Foskey has the makeup of a good edge rusher. He’s a 6’5 260 pound team captain with multiple 10 sack seasons. He’s missing the top level ability that is what you look for in high ceiling players, but he’s got good ability and should be an impact NFL player.
EDGE Tuli Tuipulotu USC 76
info: 56 pressures 13 sacks 25 tackles 75.9 RDEF 81.2 PRSH. 6'3 266 with 32 1/4 arms.
pros: True junior with back to back 82 PFF grades. Has some nice pass rush moves from both the edge an interior, has a nice jump swipe and wins to the outside. Violent hands in the pass game, can swim and throw guys well. Good blend of athleticism and size, can’t teach that.
cons: A little bit of a tweener, 6’4 270 he played a lot of edge in college. Won’t hold up to the run well in the interior. Wont threaten NFL tackles with speed.
take: Tuipulotu is a bit of a tweener, he’s too small to hold up well in the interior and not a good enough athlete for edge only. That being said a team can work to get him in a more defined role and he already has the ability to play both.
LB Owen Pappoe Auburn 76
info: 75 tackles 59.5 RDEF 83.2 TACK 69 PRSH 77.2 COV. 6’0 225 with 31 ¾ arms.
pros: Unreal athlete, ran a 4.30 with 29 bench reps and 36 inch vert. Played 2,236 snaps in the SEC. Tackle machine in 2022, very solid tackler. Sifts through traffic well, sees the game develop and attacks. Hits hard in the open field, flys around.
cons: On the smaller side, only 6 foot 225. Not the best feel in zone coverage, doesn’t anticipate the route concepts. Can’t stack an OL, they eat him up in the run game.
take: NA
OG Steve Avila TCU 76
info: 2,297 career snaps 66.6 RBLK 83.6 PBLK 11 pressures.
pros: Great size, 6’4 330 is what you would draw a guard up as. Good power in the run game, can move people vertically. Good hands in pass pro, tight punches and good extension.
cons: Slow feet and slow to react to stunts because of it. Some head scratching missed assignments possibly. Not a athlete, more of just a big body for gap schemes.
take: Avila is a big strong lineman that can play in a phone booth. He’s not very quick and he has some mental lapses but he’s got the size and strength you can’t teach.
OT Tyler Steen Alabama 76
info: 3,057 snaps 64.7 RBLK 74.4 PBLK 23 pressures.
pros: 6’5 315 and played at Bama, has the makeup of a solid tackle prospect. Played a lot of SEC football and was solid as a freshman and from both RT and LT. Shows the ability to have perfect pass sets with very good hands. Good IQ recognizing blitzes and DL stunts.
cons: Revery speed isn’t the best, can get his feet tangled at times. Power is lacking, can get pushed back too easily and doesn’t create much movement in the run game.
take: Steen is probably one of the most NFL ready tackles in this class. He’s very experienced and it seems Bama’s coaching has paid off with him showing great reps in pass pro. He’s missing the high end physical traits to be a dominating tackle but he certainly can play at the next level.
QB Tanner Mckee Stanford 76
info: 2,949 yards 13 TD 8 INT 61.2% 75.2 PASS 55.7 RUN. 6'6 231 with 9 3/8 hands. Mckee was a 4 star recruit coming out of Centennial CA but before enrolling at Stanford he took a 2 year LDS mission in Brazil. He didn't play over Davis Mills in 2020 but he got the stating spot in 2021 and played solid with a 69 PFF grade and 2,325 yards and 15 TDs with 7 INTs.  His 2022 was similar but he did improve his grade to a 75 with 3,000 yards and 13 TDs and 8 INTs as well as being a team captain.
pros: Keeps the ball out of harms way well, only a 1.5% TWP. Good height, 6’6 can easily see over the line. Makes some great NFL throws with touch down the sideline. Solid arm strength and accuracy, probably would dominate at OSU. Had to deal with a terrible team around him, played well for circumstances.
cons: Production was meh, under 3000 yards and only 13 TDs. Takes a lot of sacks, a little uncoordinated looking. Long release, takes a little to long for the ball to come out of the hand. Plays with a narrow base a lot, he needs to be able to quickly release the ball with all the sacks he takes. Doesn’t extend plays well and make them by himself.
take: Mckee is an intriguing prospect, he is a big strong armed accurate QB with good arm strength. He’s a little like Daniel Jones which isn’t the prototype QB you look for anymore.
QB Hendon Hooker Tennessee 76
info: 3,135 yards 27 TD 2 INT 69.2% 85.3 PASS 83.7 RUN. 6'3 217 with 10 1/2 hands. Hooker was a 4 star recruit coming out of the DMV area with offers to nearly all the schools in area. He chose to go to the best of the schools Virginia Tech where he redshirted and then took over the staring spot a few weeks into his freshman season. He transferred to Tennessee in 2021 and took the starting spot from highly thought of QB Joe Milton and was great for the Vols. His 2021 season was fantastic and that continued into his senior year where he was in the Heisman running until his ACL non-contact injury week 12 against South Carolina. He finished his Tennessee career with 6,000 yard 58 TDs with only 5 INTs and a win over Alabama which was the first if the decade for the Vols.
pros: Doesn’t put the ball in harms way, under 2% Turnover worthy play rate in his final 2 years. Good mobility, can add to the run game as a QB as well as escape the pocket and get yards with his legs. Good quick release with good feet on almost all of his throws. Great short accuracy, screens and quick game throws are nearly perfect all the time. Put up the stats and wins in the SEC.
cons: 24 years old, one of the older prospects you will see. Doesn’t have the top-level arm talent where he can make off platform and deep throws down the sideline as well as a top level QB can. Would like to see more anticipatory throws, likes to see it open more than throw it open. Not the most precise passer when adding extra zip to the ball, can sail on him from time to time.
take: Hooker has the makeup of a top quarterback prospect, he’s a great decision make, a winner and has no big weaknesses to his game. The only issue with him as a prospect is his age and lack of trump card. He’s a good runner and has a solid NFL arm but he doesn’t have the wow plays to go at the top of the draft.
RB Roschon Johnson Texas 76
info: 94 carries 545 yards and 5 TDs
pros: 4 star dual threat QB recruit, made the switch and was immediately a natural runner. Only one fumble in his career and never had a rush grade below 82. PFF had him as the most elusive back in NCAA. Not a fun guy to tackle, caused 46 missed tackles on 94 attempts. Powerful runner, at 6’2 220 he runs through defenders and has a lethal stiff arm. Has more shake in his game then expected, a few hurdles and noce jump cuts on his tape.
cons: Not much of a receiver, 5 drops and 56 reception in his career. Never ran for over 650 yards, he was never the starter. Not a top end athlete that will accelerate out of his cuts like the best do. Missing the top end speed to hit the home runs in space.
take: Johnson has been 2nd fiddle his entire career which is absurd because he may be the 2nd best RB in this class. If it wasn’t for a once in a decade talent like Robinson he would have been the talk of college football. The 6’2 220 pounder has all the makings of a star RB and should be coveted highly in the draft.
S Jordan Battle Alabama 76
info: 42 tackles 1 INT 72.5 RDEF 77.3 TACK 85.2 COV.
pros: 4 year starter at Alabama and is 6’1 205, he looks the part. Graded above 80 for the past 3 years. Seems to always be in a solid position, never blowing coverages.
cons: He’s not the top tier athlete that gets drafted very high. Missed too many tackles in his career. Not a great man cover player, the athleticism is lacking.
take: Battle is an NFL safety, the world has know that for 3 years now. He’s so solid that he’s as high a floor prospect as you can get, he’s smart and has the physical ability to play in the NFL. He will be a starter for many years in the league.
S Antonio Johnson Texas A&M 76
info: 55 tackles 0 INT 83.7 RDEF 70.2 TACK 79.7 COV.
pros: True junior that is 6’3 200. Had an 87.4 grade in 2021 as a true junior. Good in the box figuring out what the offense is doing. Physical player, will bring the hit stick with him.
cons: Only 1 INT in 800 coverage snaps. Awful wrap up tackler, will struggle in the NFL. Not the fluid middle of the field safety. Unknown if he can play the ball well.
take: Johnson is an aggressive box safety that wants to hit. He does a great job finding his way to the ball carrier and putting big hits on them. If he can add good coverage to his game he will be a legit pro bowl safety.
S Jiayir Brown Penn St 76
info: 60 tackles 4 INT 66.5 RDEF 67 TACK 77 COV. 5’11 203 with 31 ¼ arms.
pros: 5 sacks in 2022, he’s a blitz weapon. Good instincts in coverage, see’s the plays develop and breaks on routes. Clear leader and heart of that defense. Always around the ball and made a lot of plays on it.
cons: Average size and testing, not a top level physical player. Not a rangy safety, isn’t going to be the cover 3 center fielder. Not very fluid, would struggle in man coverage.
take: NA
TE Luke Musgrave Oregon St 76
info: 11 receptions 169 yards 1 TD.
pros: 6’6 250, a very good TE build. Good and smooth athlete, can play from the slot. Was on Bruce Feldmans freak list, a versatile athlete with good testing numbers.
cons: Injured his knee after the 2nd game of the season in 2022. Not much of a run blocker. Not many targets but a 16% drop rate. Not great at finding open space and creating separation.
take: Musgrave is very much a developmental TE, he’s got the size and athleticism to be a good TE in the league but we haven’t seen it yet. The early season injury hurt the chances but he’s worth a mid round flyer.
TE Sam Laporta Iowa 76
info: 58 receptions 648 yards 1 TD.
pros: Good with the ball in his hands, 20 missed tackles forced. Good athlete, mover very well for a TE and can run WR routes. Iowa TE, not a stranger to blocking inline.
cons: Drops can be a concern for him. Doesn’t have the strength to be a good run blocker, they had him as a big slot a lot.
take: Laporta probably isn’t the next George Kittle just because he’s an Iowa TE. He’s a good athlete that’s a little undersized which hurts his run blocking. He is similar to Kittle in the fact that he’s good with the ball in his hands but he will need to get stronger to become a good NFL TE.
WR Nathaniel Dell Houston 76
info: 108 receptions 1,399 yards 17 TDs.
pros: Back-to-back 1,300 yard receiving seasons with 30 TDs. Amazing athlete, has the agility and speed you need to play at 165. Great deep threat with the ability to shake defenders deep and be wide open.
cons: Drops the ball more than you would like at 9%. 5’10 165, he’s a very small receiver. Played against lower level of competition than you would like.
take: Dell is Zay flowers but older and played at Houston. He’s way undersized but he’s such a great athlete he made up for it. He can be a teams return man as well as maybe develop into a deep threat out of the slot.
WR Jalin Hyatt Tennessee 76
info: Hyatt was a 4 star recruit out of Dutch Fork HS in SC where he led his team to back to back undefeated seasons while breaking his HS's receiving records .He initially committed to play of the Hokies before flipping his commitment to Tennessee. His Freshman year he got on start and had some use getting 276 receiving yards and 2 TDs. his sophomore year was more of the same but really broke out in 2022 and developed a great connection with Hendon Hooker. In 2022 he won the Biletnikoff and was named to the 1st team All SEC team after racking up 1,267 yards and 15 TDs.
pros: Accolades his senior year where as good as it gets. Great speed, can put on the burners and pull away from people. Solid hands, not just a speed guy who can't catch, he can catch through contact.
cons: One year of being a full time starter. Mostly a slot receiver in college, 87% of his snaps from there. Only got a 77 PFF grade, not whatyou expect from the Biletnikoff winner. Very thin frame, needs to add some size for NFL physicality. Awful out of the break and off the line, not quick just fast.
take: Hyatt can run fast, that's about where the positives end. He's not a polished receiver, he's not good out of breaks and doesn't do well with physicality. His top end outcome is a deep threat only.
WR Charlie Jones Purdue 76
info: 110 receptions 1,361 yards 12 TD 83.8 RECV.
pros: Had a great breakout 2022 season. Has been a top dog on his team, over 100 receptions. Doesn’t drop the ball, 3.9% drop rate. Smart player that knows where the open part of zones are and how to create separation. Great with the ball in the air, can track it and make the play.
cons: 6 foot 188, he’s on the thin side of the position. 1 good year in 5 seasons. Not great with the ball in his hands breaking tackles, not a great athlete.
take: Jones put on a show his final year of college, he was Purdues number 1. He only played well one year but everything he does translates to the league well. He’s got great ball skills and does a good job running his routes which is a good recipe in the league. He isn’t the top tier athlete that you want but he could end up being a great NFL player because his strengths are what you need in the NFL.
WR Cedric Tillman Tennessee 76
info: 37 receptions 417 yards 3 TDs.
pros: Good size, 6’3 215. Good hands and good catch radius, 5% career drop rate. Good body control and making plays on the ball through contact. Good physicality, uses hands well to create separation and run through contact.
cons: Injured for his final season for 6 weeks causing production to drop off. 1 out of 5 years he caught more than 40 balls. Not a good athlete, not quick and the speed is average. A lot of null plays in Tennessee offense where he doesn’t have to do anything.
take: Tillman had a great 4th season where he had over 1,000 yards after a down first 3 years. He came back for his 5th and final year to add on to his production but he got hurt. He’s a big bodied receiver that can make a play on the ball no matter who’s on him but he’s not that good athlete that will create separation.
C Luke Wypler Ohio St 75
info: 1,702 career snaps 80.8 RBLK 84.1 PBLK.
pros: Top 2 center recruit in 2020, he’s still a young player. 2 straight solid years as the starter. Good athlete, moves exceptionally well in space. Works hard to stay on blocks.
cons: Small at 6’3 300. Gets out powered way too often, both in the run and pass.
take: Wypler is the typical college center in the fact that he is small at only 300 pounds. Where he differs is his athleticism, he’s a very toned down Linderbaum. He needs to add strength to his game but he’s young enough that it is a real possibility that he can down the line.
CB Tyrique Stevenson Miami 75
info: 2 INT 5 PBU 24 tackles 46.6 TACK 79.5 COV. 6’0 204 with 32 3/8 arms.
pros: Good size and solid length. Physical corner that loves to get hands on at the line. Solid at playing the ball through a receiver.
cons: Not a good tackler, needs to improve there. Lacking quickness, whiffs on press sometimes and loses leverage. Not a smooth athlete that makes recovering on routes look easy. Zone coverage isn’t his strong suit, more of a man defender.
take: NA.
CB Jakorian Bennett Maryland 75
info: 2 INT 7 PBU 24/54 309 yards 61.6 TACK 70.3 COV. 5’11 188 with 31 7/8 arms.
pros: Amazing athlete, tested great at the combine. Great recovery speed, closes ground very fast. Fluid hips, can flip and go at a high level. Makes plays on the ball better than the size shows.
cons: Not the biggest corner, slightly undersized. Going to have a tough time playing the ball with bigger receivers. Too much makeup and not sticky man coverage.
take: NA
CB Darius Rush South Carolina 75
info: 2 INT 6 PBU 18/31 317 yards 63.8 TACK 80.3 COV. 6’2 198 with 33 3/8 arms.
pros: Good size, long corner with a solid build. Tested very well, has long speed. Good physicality, easily plays the boundry.
cons: Misses way too many tackles. Doesn’t have the quick burst to break on routes. Not fluid at all, tough time trying to guard quick routes.
take: NA
DL Kobie Turner Wake Forest 75
info: 34 pressures 3 sacks 27 tackles 93.1 RDEF 88.8 PRSH. 6’3 290 with 32 arms.
pros: 4 years of high level PFF grading. Good testing, 7.09 3 cone and 31 Bench. Good athlete that can bend well and has good quickness for the interior. Shoots gaps well and reacts to blocks fast.
cons: Played at Richmond for 4 years before wake. Not the biggest or longest DL. May struggle with double teams or power.
take: NA
EDGE Yaya Diaby Louisville 75
info: 36 pressures 10 sacks 16 tackles 69.2 RDEF 73.2 PRSH. 6’3 263 with 33 7/8 arms.
pros: Good size with great athleticism. Amazing chase down ability, he can get home and take down the QB. Solid rip move to get hands off him and up field. Good power on contact to get into the pads of the OL.
cons: Not a refined rusher, he doesn’t have a plan. Played over the tackle which will be an adjustment to the edge. Needs to refine his hand usage in run and pass game.
take: NA
EDGE Andre Carter Army 75
info: 23 pressures 4 sacks 30 tackles 72.2 RDEF 80.8 PRSH. 6'7 256 with 33 3/8 arms.
pros: Great build, 6’6 252 with 34 inch arms. Has a solid get off that threatens tackles vertically. Works hard to get around the edge and make a play on the QB, high motor. Nice counters already in his game without much coaching I’m assuming. Great overall athlete, can change direction, bend and accelerate at a top tier level.
cons: Played at army so wasn’t seeing great competition. Clearly still needs to be coached on the run game, needs to improve to be able to play against NFL comp. Plays high too often, he got away with it but needs to lower his pads.
take: Carter is an interesting prospect, he’s a physical freak that is still pretty raw even though he racked up over 10 sacks in 2021. He can move at an elite level for his size but the strength and level of competition can be concerning. With coaching and continued physical development Carter could be an All Pro edge player.
LB Demarvion Overshown Texas 75
info: 67 tackles 73.8 RDEF 67.7 TACK 73.9 PRSH 66 COV. 6’2 220 with 32 ½ arms.
pros: Safety convert with good athleticism. Great speed, can absolutely fly. Has good bend so he can rush a little bit. Hits hard, he will lay the boom on anyone with the ball. Good IQ, sees the game very well and plays with instincts.
cons: On the lighter side of LB’s only 220. Not many true LB reps, he doesn’t play much in the box and take on blocks. Not a sure tackler, needs to wrap up better.
take: Overshown is the definition of a heat seeking missile, if he see’s something he will fly 100 mph at it. He’s a versatile player that can line up on a lot of position and excel. The biggest problem is his size, he’s not a traditional LB and will definitely need to work on that aspect of his game.
OT Blake Freeland BYU 75
info: 2,690 career snaps 87.9 RBLK 90.7 PBLK 7 pressures.
pros: 91 PFF grade in 2022, he has consistently graded well in PFFs system. Good length, 6’8 with 35 inch arms can keep defenders away from him. Smooth pass protector, can mirror pretty well and get hands on defenders. Smart in pass pro, see’s stunts well and can pass them off.
cons: He’s slim at 6’8 305, he can get out leveraged and bull rushed. A little soft at times, he gets pushed and thrown around a little too much. Weird pass set with his feet, needs to be re worked.
take: Freeland will be interesting to see if he pans out in the NFL. His style worked for him at BYU but the power and length of the NFL may get to him. He has the length and pass blocking ability to give teams hope but he needs to continue to work on his feet and strength.
QB Stetson Bennett Georgia 75
info: 4,132 yards 27 TD 7 INT 68.1% 88.9 PASS 66.1 RUSH. 5'11 192 with 10 hands.
pros: Not a stranger to a big game, he won back to back national championship games. Improved every year and ended up with a 90 PFF grade in 2022. Has solid movement skills, can extend plays and find open receivers on the move. Good accuracy, can put the ball where it needs to be to protect receivers or throw them open. Doesn’t make many bad decisions, careful with the ball. Under rated tough runner, can be effective running. Throws the ball with good touch, can layer the ball in.
cons: Peaked in college, won 2 national championships and no way his luck continues. A small QB at 5’11 190 and he already is 25. Needs to throw from a better base more consistently, can slip or fade too much. The arm is only ok, he doesn’t have the power behind it of a top QB. It was easy a lot at Georgia with that much talent.
take: Bennett is going to be underrated his entire life, after being a walk on at Georgia and fighting for his spot he lead the Bulldogs to 2 national championships. He’s a good athlete with an average arm that just seems to make plays whenever is needed. He showed in 2022 he can make good decisions and deliver the ball with good timing and accuracy. He wont go in the top of the draft because physically he has no calling card but don’t be surprised if he comes in the league gets an opportunity and plays well as a starter.
RB Tank Bigsby Auburn 75
info: Bigsby has never flown under the radar, as a high 4 star recruit, he had offers from everywhere including his first offer from Bama as a Sophomore. He went to school in LaGrange GA where he rushed for over 2,200 yards but didn't go to his hometown Georgia Bulldogs, he committed to Auburn where he immediately saw the field. He rushed for 834 yards and was named the SEC Freshman of the year. He came back as the full-time starter in 2021 where he got 224 carries and rushed for 1,100 yards and 10 TDs. His final year in 2022 was by far the most impressive he ran for 976 yards but a whopping 700 of them came after contact. He forced 60 missed tackles and averaged 4.16 yards after contact.
pros: Stepped up as a junior, forcing 60 missed tackles and had 740 yards after contact he was Auburns rushing attack. All around back that has good speed the ability to change directions well and enough power to fall forward. Has breakaway speed once he’s in the open field he can keep his distance from defenders. Solid contact balance, arm tackles look like they don’t affect him. Shown every year that he can run in the SEC at a high level.
cons: Fumbled 4 times in 2021, he cleaned it up in 2022 but still concerning. Not much receiving experience out of the backfield. Not the best back at setting up defenders to be blocked or taken out of the play. Not elite at any one thing, doesn’t have the elite speed/quickness or strength. Runs high which loses him a lot of power.
take: Bigsby is a very good running back with the track record to prove it. He has all the tools to be a good RB in the NFL he’s just lacking a selling point to get a team really excited. If he can develop his receiving/blocking into a strength he will be a great all around 3 down back.
RB Dewayne Mcbride UAB 75
info: Mcbride was a low 3 star recruit out of Starke FL and had very little interest so he went to UAB. He was a playmaker his true freshman year averaging 0.3 yards per carry on 47 attempts which lead him to be the starter in 2021. He ran for 1,366 and 13 TDs and had 78 forced missed tackles. 2022 blew that out of the water when he ran 1,702 yards 19 TDs and had a 94.1 PFF grade. He was named conference USA player of the year and solidified himself as one of the best backs in college football.
pros: Never had below a 90 PFF run grade in his 3 years. Had a career 7.2 YPC with 4.93 yards after contact and 175 forced missed tackles. Well built back with solid athleticism, he’s 5-11 215 and is a pretty good athlete that will meet all the thresholds. Amazing contact balance, spins out of sure tackles and keeps the feet moving at all times. Very strong, can squat 550 and bench 385.
cons: Fumbling could be an issue, 9 fumbles on 484 carries. Did all his work against a lower level of competition, probably wont be as successful at breaking tackles against higher level competition. Not a twitched up runner, wont shake anyone or accelerate that well.
take: Mcbride was incredible against UAB’s competition, he is a very strong back that can break tackles and do everything else pretty well. He’s not the best athlete at the position though, the speed acceleration and agility are all ok but isn’t something to get excited about. It is very easy to project Mcbride to be a starting RB at the next level given his ability to run between the tackles and make people miss.
RB Zach Evans Ole Miss 75
info: Evans was an absolute star coming out of North Shore in TX where he and Bijan were RBs 1 and 2 coming out of HS. He led his team to back to back 6A division 1 state championships while rushing for over 10 YPC. As a sophomore in HS the offers started to roll in, he got an offer from LSU and many other schools before ultimately deciding to go to TCU. He was a big play waiting to happen at TCU, he wasn't the starter but he was averaging over 7 YPC and forcing missed tackles left and right. He transferred to Ole Miss and became their starter along side Quinshon Judkins and had a solid season with 930 yards 6.5YPC and 9 TDs.
pros: Talented back that was always highly thought of, even when he was at TCU everyone knew he was an RB1 talent. Great speed and power combo, will run you over and then past pursuing defenders. Runs low to the ground, great leverage when driving forward in piles. Loves getting north and south, isn’t afraid to hit the crease and grind for extra yards. Very strong lower half, easily slips arm tackles as well and run through people.
cons: Too many times the ball is on the ground, he dropped 5 out of 30 balls and fumbles 3 times in 2021. Was not a good pass protector grading at a 29.6 PFF grade. Never was the lead back, always sharing the roll and never being the guy. Never did much outside of run it, not many receiving opportunities or pass pro.
take: Evans is a no nonsense RB, usually you think of bigger backs like that but at 6 foot 215 he packs a punch and will run through you. He’s an Zeke Elliot type runner but a big unknown of his game is the pass pro and receiving ability.
RB Tyjae Spears Tulane 75
info: 231 carries 1,586 yards 19 TDs.
pros: 63 forced missed tackles and 4.55 yards after contact. Consistently high PFF grades all 4 years. Solid out of the backfield in his career. Has great agility and athleticism, can take advantage of small windows and create big plays.
cons: Small for the position, 5’11 195 he’s a slim back. All his targets are checkdowns. Didn’t play the highest level competition, could struggle with better physicality at the next level.
take: Spears has shown he is a good back for the last 2 years and solidified his place in the NFL in 2022. He’s a very good athlete with the production to back it up that he should be drafted. He’s on the smaller side though which will limit his draft stock but he could end up making an impact in the NFL.
RB Israel Abanikanda Pitt 75
info: 241 carries 1,426 yards 20 TDs.
pros: Young prospect, only 20 years old. Had an amazing senior season, ran for 1,400 yards and 20 TDs with a 90.6 PFF grade. Great speed, ran away from so many defenders last year. Can break arm tackles and smaller defenders tackles with adequate strength.
cons: Was a non-factor in the pass game, never blocked well and only caught 12 balls. Doesn’t have the great quickness and agility that a speed back would want. Not a great tackle breaker, he’s more of a maximize what you blocked for back.
take: Abanikanda made himself some money this year with a break out 1,400 yard season. He is a back that will show how good your OL is, if the hole is there he will take advantage of it with his speed. But, if you ask him to create by himself that’s not his game and will turn losses into gains.
S Chris Smith Georgia 75
info: 52 tackles 3 INT 85.9 RDEF 65.9 TACK 70.6 COV. 5’11 192 with 31 1/8 arms.
pros: Plays the game at a high level, very aggressive in run support and moves great in underneath coverage. He’s a dawg, not afraid on any ball carrier and can cover anything underneath.
cons: Average size and testing, not a top level physical player. Range as a deep safety isn’t great, has a tough time making up ground.
take: NA
WR Jayden Reed Michigan St 75
info: Reed was not a very coveted recruit out of Naperville IL where he was an All-Illinois first team receiver. He went to Western Michigan where he was a FWAA Freshman All American before transferring to Michigan St to play in the power 5. In 2021 he really broke out, as well as being the team’s best return man he also had 1000 yards receiving and 10 TDs. His senior year was a bit of a step back but he still had a 70 PFF grade with 636 yards and 5 TDs.
pros: Great athlete, moves different than most other receivers. Has the speed to take the top off the defense. Can create separation with his suddenness. Can return play a lot or outside receiver. Solid ability to rise up and make contested catches.
cons: Drop off in 2022 going from 82 to 71 grade. 5’10 190, he’s a smaller WR. Dances a little too much when he catches it. Hands are only average, his catch radius is ok because he’s not great at catching the ball away from his body.
take: Reed was a star receiver for Michigan State, he was a versatile receiver with returning ability for them. He is a good athlete that can get open with his speed and agility. He’s not the biggest receiver though and he doesn’t have the best hands which will limit him from going really early in the draft. He can step in and make an impact on an NFL roster now.
WR Xavier Hutchinson Iowa St 75
info: 107 receptions 1,171 yards 6 TDs
pros: good production catching over 100 balls in 2022 with an 89.4 receiving grade. Good hands, only a 4.9% career drop rate. Good routes/releases, can get off press and create separation initially. Long limbed, 6’3 and can extend to make plays on the ball. Great ball skills, does a great job reacting to the throw and getting in position to make a catch.
cons: Not very fast, isn’t threatening the defense vertically. Not quick out of breaks, he wont shake any DBs and break away from them.
take: Hutchinson was a big part of Iowa States offense, when they needed a 1st down he was their guy. He is a reliable big framed receiver that can make plays on the ball. He’s lacking that next gear though, he wont run past anyone or make anyone fear his athleticism.
WR Tyler Scott Cincinnati 75
info: 55 receptions 904 yards 9 TD 73.1 RECV.
pros: True junior that is an elite athlete. Great deep threat, deep routes are very good. He has great acceleration speed and agility.
cons: Small receiver at 5’11 185. Hands are only ok, he wont be making any great catches over anyone. Not a strong receiver, will struggle with physicality.
take: Scott is a smaller receiver but he is a top tier athlete that will scare defenses. He’s not going to become your top WR that take over games but he’s so fast he’s a threat to score every play.
CB Terrell Smith Minnesota 74
info: 2 INT 4 PBU 31/53 341 yards 70.1 TACK 78.7 COV. 6’1 204 with 32 7/8 arms.
pros: Has the ideal size speed combo, good length and good testing numbers. Good physicality, good at getting hands on and tough to get away from. Solid tackler, strong aggressive corner.
cons: Was not very good for 4 years before a 5th year breakout. Not very smooth in and out of breaks, would like to see it more fluid. Not a sticky corner, WR can eaily fool him and get off him.
take: NA
CB Riley Moss Iowa 74
info: 8 INT 1 PBU 45 tackles 74.4 TACK 81 COV. 6’0 192 with 30 3/8 arms.
pros: White CB, you never see that. Good eyes in zone, see’s the field and play develop well. Solid ball skills, goes and attacks the ball.
cons: Not a big or long corner. Not the best athlete, wont jump off the screen. Gets stacked easily.
take: Moss should be a team that’s primarily zone coverage, he’s not the best athlete.
CB Mekhi Blackmon USC 74
info: 3 INT 8 PBU 30/63 286 yards 90.8 TACK 91.1 COV. 5’11 178 with 31 arms.
pros: Solid numbers at the combine. 90.6 PFF grade in 2022 at USC. Makes nice plays on the ball through receivers. Good quickness and can break underneath routes well.
cons: Very slight frame, wont re route receivers that well. Not the smoothest looking player, hips are a little tight.
take: NA
CB Darrell Luter South Alabama 74
info: 1 INT 6 PBU 33/65 491 yards 83.1 TACK 70.4 COV. 6’0 190 with 32 3/8 arms.
pros: Very good athlete, elite jumps and solid testing with good length. Smooth athlete, hips turn easily. Patient in man, will wait at the line and not get out of position.
cons: A little slow when planting the foot in the ground and going. On the lean side, needs to put on some mass.
take: NA
DL Gervon Dexter Florida 74
info: 25 pressures 2 sacks 36 tackles 70 RDEF 55.2 PRSH. 6'6 312 with 32 1/4 arms.
pros: True junior and a former 5 star, has potential to improve greatly. Good size at 6’6 312. Played over 600 snaps in 2022, he can play all game if needed. Good power to his game, can walk lineman back as well as hold his ground in the run game. Shows that he can put a pass rush move on the OL, may not be NFL level but he has a nice swim.
cons: Took a step back in 2022, his pass rush grade lowered below 60. Played a lot but also had plays where he looked tired and got no push. Plays very very high, needs to fire off the ball lower. Not a twitchy DL, he’s not going to wow any guard with a quick speed move.
take: Dexter is a prototypical 3 tech at 6’6 312 he can bull rush and hold up in the run game. He’s not there yet as a NFL starter, he plays high and isn’t advanced with his hands. If you give him time and coaching though he can turn into a very good starting DL.
DL Byron Young Alabama 74
info: 28 pressures 4 sacks 30 tackles 75.6 RDEF 74.6 PRSH. 6’3 297 with 34 arms.
pros: Great build, 6’3 300 with long arms. Powerful rusher, has a good bull rush and can collapse the pocket. Quick player, can win with quick swims and a good get off. Uses his hands well in the run game, extends to get OL off him and locate the ball.
cons: Would like to see him hold up stronger against the power run. Does too many spins when trying to get off blocks. Not a great athlete, struggles to move very well.
take: Young us a typical Alabama DL, a big strong guy that gets off the ball well and wins with power. He’s good in both the run and the pass game using his long arms to help him win and keep OL off balance. He’s just not the best athlete so the upside is limited a bit, he can still be very good but just not dominate.
EDGE Byron Young Tennessee 74
info: 42 pressures 9 sacks 21 tackles 56.9 RDEF 67.6 PRSH. 6’2 248 with 32 1/8 arms.
pros: Good athlete, gets off the ball well and moves well in space. 15 sacks in the last 2 years, good production. Has good bend and gives great effort around the edge.
cons: No length to him, he has 32 inch arms and is 6’2. Not many rush moves, his hands don’t help him win pass rushes. Not the best against the run, gets pushed around too much.
take: Young is a pass rush specialist that has racked up 15 sacks in 2 years. He’s a high motor player and has good bend with a violent rip to be a good pass rusher. He’s missing the attributes to make him a high level player like power and length but he’s a solid rusher.
EDGE KJ Henry Clemson 74
info: 53 pressures 5 sacks 31 tackles 78.8 RDEF 84 PRSH. 6’4 250 with 33 arms.
pros: Solid size at 6’4 250. Former 5 star recruit. Good get off and aggressive into the OL. Solid power, doesn’t get pushed around. Good at spilling run plays and taking on pullers.
cons: One year of good play as a 5th year at Clemson. Not great in coverage, doesn’t have good feel. Pass rushing is nearly all effort and clean up. Athleticism will be negated at the NFL level.
take: NA
EDGE Isaiah Mcguire Missouri 74
info: 35 pressures 7 sacks 29 tackles 74.3 RDEF 81.8 PRSH. 6’4 268 with 33 7/8 arms.
pros: Good size and length. Good power and pop to his game, can stand up blockers. Strong hands, will rip through to get off blocks.
cons: Power only player, not going to win with any speed. Uses hands, but not efficiently, doesn’t win with them. Loses his gap in the run game too much.
take: NA
LB Henry To’oto’o Alabama 74
info: 70 tackles 72.1 RDEF 59.8 TACK 61.4 PRSH 66.6 COV. 6'1 227 with 32 3/4 arms.
pros: Over 3000 career SEC snaps, he has seen a lot of high level football. Made a solid jump in play his final year at Bama. Fantastic football IQ, he knows what to do on every play and can anticipate plays coming. Good athlete that does a pretty good job in coverage. Can dip under OL and make plays behind the LoS.
cons: 3 career pass breakups, nearly no ball production in coverage. Never graded that well, highest was a 70 other than that he was in the 50’s. On the smaller side at under 230, he will have to bulk up a little bit more. Not the strongest, can get bullied by OL and big RBs. Sometimes can struggle locating the ball, he’s in a solid spot but cant figure out where to go from there.
take: To’oto’o is another very good Alabama LB that understands the game at a high level. He’s a solid athlete with so much experience that he wont be thrown off by the NFL game. He’s on the small side though and that shows up in his tape when he loses to guys with good power. He could become a solid starter but without the play strength it will be tough for him.
LB Dorian Williams Tulane 74
info: 97 tackles 69 RDEF 80.8 TACK 76 PRSH 87 COV. 6’1 228 with 33 ¾ arms.
pros: Good length with nearly 34 inch arms. Solid athlete, runs a 4.49 at 228 pounds. Tackle machine, 97 total tackles and 6 sacks. in 2022. Fluid in coverage, can move with anyone in coverage. Team captain. Can sift through traffic to get past blockers.
cons: Would like to see his weight go up, he’s in the 220’s. Not a strong run defender, doesn’t take on blocks well. Not strong, doesn’t knock RBs backward. Instincts are only average, he doesn’t see the game at a high level.
take: NA
LB Sirvocea Dennis Pitt 74
info: 59 tackles 92.1 RDEF 90.2 TACK 76.1 PRSH 77.5 COV. 6’1 226 with 32 7/8 arms.
pros: Great 2022 season, 90+ PFF grade. Good length, 6’1 and 33 inch arms. Great vertical and broad jump, 41.5 inch vert. Good at making tackles in space. Good at breaking on the QB and making a play in the backfield. Can shoot gaps well and end up in the backfield.
cons: Not the greatest sideline to sideline speed. Not going to be a thumper, wont stack and shed blocks well. Power football isn’t his strength.
take: NA
OG Jaxson Kirkland Washington 74
info: 3,304 snaps 73.2 RBLK 82.6 PBLK 9 pressures. 6’6 322 with 33 3/8 arms
pros: Has a good tackle build at guard and has played both. Very experienced and has graded solid for 4 straight years. Strong OL that can anchor and move people in the run game. Solid in pass pro, smooth that gets hands on and stays balanced.
cons: Older prospect that may not improve too much more. Not a great athlete, at tackle he can get exposed a little bit.
take: Kirkland is a big strong lineman that can play both guard and tackle. He is very experienced and has a great feel for the position. He may not be the best athlete but he’s good enough and can start right now.
OG Emil Ekiyor Alabama 74
info: 2,743 snaps 70.1 RBLK 79.9 PBLK 8 pressures. 6’2 317 with 33 5/8 arms.
pros: Solid athletic guard build at 6’2 317 with 33.5 inch arms. Experienced guard in the SEC with 3 very solid years of PFF grading. Good athlete that plays with good leverage. Good at picking up stunts and scanning for work.
cons: Doesn’t have the natural power to move people in the run game. Can get off balance from time to time by leaning too much.
take: Ekiyor is a starting NFL guard, when you turn on the tape you see a very solid guard that will get the job done. The reason he wont go as high is because the natural power isn’t quite there, he may struggle in gap schemes in the run game. He’s got a very good build with long arms for a guard and a good first step, I expect him to come in and start day 1.
OG Sidy Sow Eastern Michigan 74
info: 3,633 snaps 78.4 RBLK 69.5 PBLK 17 pressures. 6’5 330.
pros: Great size and experience. 3 straight solid years of grading. Great power in the run game, can move guys off the line. Uses hands well in the pass game, flashes hands and then strikes.
cons: Didn’t play many power 5 schools. Not the most agile lineman, not quick. Sometimes can get off balance and lose his base.
take: Sow will have a talent adjustment in the NFL but being that size and having his level of experience will help. He’s a strong guard that has played well and has the ability to improve. He can get a little quicker and with more coaching develop into an impactful guard.
OG Chandler Zavala NC St 74
info: 1,085 snaps 73.4 RBLK 86.5 PBLK 4 pressures. 6’3 322 with 33 arms.
pros: Great guard build, solid arm length and a thick build. Surprising lateral agility. Solid anchor and has good power.
cons: One year starter. Not the best athlete, he’s a waist bender that has ok feet.
take: Zavala looks like and NFL Guard. He’s a good pass protector with his long arms and solid agility. He’s not an overly physical player in the run game, he could be better there but he does enough. He should be able to start immediately and become a solid starter.
OT Zion Nelson Miami 74
info: 2,452 snaps 65 RBLK 85.3 PBLK 15 pressures.
pros: Was the starting LT for Miami as a true freshman in 2019. Improved greatly from his freshman year becoming a formidable tackle by his true junior year. Had a solid pass blocking game against Jermaine Johnson in 2021. Moves at an elite level for a LT, he’s so smooth and fast in pass pro.
cons: 2022 season was negated by a knee injury. Needs to add strength, the anchor wasn’t enough in 2021. Needs to work on hand placement to avoid defenders getting to his chest.
take: Nelson would have been benefited from a big time senior year which he was on track for. He already flashed his potential by showing with great movement skills and ability to get the job done in pass pro. All he needs to do is work on the anchor of his in pass pro because if he can do that we are looking at a top tier pass protector.
OT Carter Warren Pitt 74
info: 2,768  snaps 67.6 RBLK 76.6 PBLK 25 pressures. 6’5 323 with 35 arms.
pros: Perfect tackle size, 35 inch arms at 323. 4 year starter and a team captain. Solid athlete, can explode off the ball. Uses his hands well, gets his hands on him fast.
cons: He missed nearly all of 2022 with an injury. Pad level is extremely high, even in his stance. Doesn’t look like he has the leg strength you would want.
take: Warren had a very sad ending to his career, He had a season ending injury his final year as a team captain. He has the size, athleticism and experience, he’s just missing the strength and to fix his leverage.
OT Jaelyn Duncan Maryland 74
info: 2,631 career snaps 61.9 RBLK 67.6 PBLK 28 pressures.
pros: Solid size, athleticism and strength combo. Solid hand usage, like to go outside in pass pro but he’s strong enough to do it.
cons: On the thinner side at the senior bowl, 6'5 298. Never really dominated in his 5 years at Maryland. 3 worst games were by far the worst and against good competition. Some of the worst balance I’ve ever seen, constantly on the ground and lunging. Loves to hold, he was flagged over 10 times.
take: Duncan is 100% physical tools and almost no production currently. He’s not a total train wreck in the technique department but after 5 years with his ability you really want to see more than what he’s giving you. If he can figure it all out he could be a plus NFL starter.
OT McClendon Curtis Chattanooga 74
info: 1,891 snaps 80.3 RBLK 90.9 PBLK 7 pressures. 6’6 331 with 35 arms.
pros: Perfect OT build, 6’6 330 with 35 inch arms. Played both Guard and Tackle.
cons: Played at Chattanooga, the competition level was low. Mediocre athlete with poor balance. Bad hands, holdy and doesn’t fit his hands well.
take: Curtis is 100% a project, he has nearly no technique. He will be drafted on traits alone because he’s a specimen but the play isn’t there.
OT Nick Saldiveri Old Dominion 74
info: 2,416 snaps 61.5 RBLK 85.1 PBLK 18 pressures. 6’6 311 with 33 3/8 arms.
pros: Decent build at 6’6 311 with 33.5 inch arms. Pretty good athlete, can move well for the size.
cons: Strength is not there, wont move anyone in the run game. Got beat bad 1v1 at the senior bowl. Played against lower level competition.
take: Saldiveri will probably be a good backup in the NFL. He’s got good size and athleticism but he got exposed in pass pro at the senior bowl. He’s not very strong so he needs to add strength to be an NFL OL.
RB Kenny Mcintosh Georgia 74
info: 2022 stats: 151 carries 824 yards 10 TDs.
pros: 45 missed tackles forced on 151 carries. Very good out of the backfield, 92 and 86 PFF Rec grades in 2021 and 2022 with a career 75 receptions for 865 yards. Amazing hands, can track and pluck a ball out of the air down the field and also can run nice routes. Runs with good pad level even though he’s on the taller side. Pretty elusive, can run through contact and has a good feel for side stepping tackles.
cons: Never was the work horse back, always being the second guy or sharing the backfield. He doesn’t have the juice that you want in an RB, he isn’t great at accelerating or changing direction.
take: Mcintosh’s calling card is his receiving ability, he clearly has the talent to be a solid NFL RB but his work out of the backfield is what he’s special at. He’s lacking the short area quickness that you want to see in an RB but he does everything else at a high level.
RB Kendre Miller TCU 74
info: 224 carries 1,399 yards 17 TDs.
pros: Young prospect as a true junior, will be 20 when drafted. Ran for 1,400 yards and an 88.5 PFF grade in 2022. Solid size at 6’0 220. 70 missed tackles forced in 2022. He’s a jack of all trades, he can run past slower defenders and lower the shoulder to get extra yards. Good contact balance and has a good feel for making guys miss. Sets up blockers well with good patients and sees the blocks develop well before making his cut.
cons: Not much of a 3rd down back, low pass block grades and 16 receptions in 2022. One year of being the teams lead back and 6 fumbles in 361 attempts. Isn’t a top end athlete and doesn’t have overwhelming power. Can be a little indecisive at times, can get caught waiting for an opening rather than taking what he can get.
take: Miller was a key piece of TCU’s run to the national championship. He was a great runner for them with the size and ability to break big TD runs and get the extra yards when needed. He’s not the most explosive back but he’s already so good at such a young age he should be a contributing to an NFL team now and for many years.
RB Eric Gray Oklahoma 74
info: 212 carries 1,374 yards and 11 TDs.
pros: Rushing grade of 92.4 as a senior. Very elusive runner, good contact balance for size and bounces off DB’s. Can cut on a dime and completely throw off defenders angles. Has the speed and quickness to kill people in open space.
cons: Not a good pass blocker, struggled all 4 years. Didn’t run against many loaded boxes, Oklahoma’s offense was very spread out. Not a strong runner, won’t be running through many tackles. One year of being the starter and was 23 by the time he broke out.
take: Gray has some great highlights where he can make defenders look silly. He’s got great athleticism and moves very well in space. He’s not the most physically imposing back so he won’t be great all 3 downs but he can make plays in space that’s for sure.
RB Mohamed Ibrahim Minnesota 74
info: Ibrahim was a 3 star recruit coming out of Baltimore MD where he had a good career before committing to Minnesota. He redshirted in 2017 and in 2018 became the Minnesota Gophers 2nd leading rusher for a freshman behind Darrell Thompson. in 2019 for some reason he got less carries before having another 1000 yard season in 2020. He came back in 2021 ready to go absolutely gashing Ohio state for 160 and 2 TDs in 3 Quarters before going out for the season with an ankle injury. That led him to come back and only break Minnesota’s all time rushing record in his last bowl game against Syracuse.
pros: Production is great, 3 1,000 yard seasons and was consistent around 5.4 YPC. Over 2,200 yards after contact with 70 forced missed tackles. He’s a Damion Pierce light, absolute menace with the ball and not very fun to tackle. Strong back, easily runs secondary defenders over and pushes piles in short yards. Great contact balance, not an easy guy to bring down. Pretty good vision, will make you be gap discipline.
cons: Almost never was used in the pass game, 21 career receptions in 5 years. Older RB prospect, 5th year coming out. He is very slow changing direction and doesn’t have good speed.
take: Ibrahim is a great 2 down runner and would have been perfect in 1990. The game favors faster more explosive players now but that doesn’t mean theres no role for a throw back strong physical RB like him. He can be a great thunder to another backs lighting.
RB Chase Brown Illinois 74
info: 329 carries 1,632 yards 10 TDs
pros: Lead the nation in yards and was the bell cow for Illinois. Has very good speed for the position, hit 22.5 MPH in a game. Pretty good vision, lets block develop and can bust through the line.
cons: 5th year player who only broke out his last year. Didn’t lead the league in rushing without an absurd number of carries. He’s on the slimmer side for the position, doesn’t run through contact well.
take: Brown was Illinois offense last year after 4 longer years of waiting to break out. He’s got the great speed to make in impact in the NFL but the strength is a real concern. He should be able to contribute to a backfield immediately.
RB Sean Tucker Syracuse 74
info: Tucker was one of the top RBs coming out of Owings Mills MD where he was also a track star winning the 100 and 200 m as a junior. He got looks from a few schools like Wisconsin and Syracuse and chose to stay closer to home and commit the Orange. His opportunity came early while many opt outs and injuries caused him to be bumped up the depth chart. He ran for 626 yards that true freshman year and put his name in the spotlight of potential NFL RBs. He solidified that thought by playing great in 2021, he ran for 1,515 with 6.1 YPC and 12 TDs while breaking 66 missed tackles and 4.11 YPC after contact. He was an All American after that year and was on the Doak Walker award radar heading in to 2022. It was a little disappointing of a 2022 season but he still played well, accounting for much of Syracuse’s total yards he ran for 1062 yards with 11 TDs but only averaged 2.79 Yards after contact.
pros: Well-built RB with good speed, 5'10 210 and has plenty of breakaway runs, once he gets into space he’s gone. Produced on a Syracuse team that didn't have much talent, the OL was awful. Has good power to run up the middle and grind for yards. Flashes some good body control on receptions out of the backfield. Good in the open field, a nice side step to go along with his great speed.
cons: Not the best out of the backfield, 13.7 drop percentage for his career. Doesn’t have the short area quickness to make a guy miss in a phone booth and accelerate through a hole. Likes to bounce to the outside a lot, granted his OL did no favors.
take: Tucker was the best skill player from Syracuse in years, his OL did him no favors but he flashed his extreme talent anyway. He’s a solid size to go along with great long speed which teams are going to like. He will never be a top guy in the NFL (he’s not breaking tackles left and right) but he can definitely be a good RB for many years.
S Jason Taylor Oklahoma St 74
info: 80 tackles 6 INT 60.2 RDEF 68.5 TACK 76.9 COV. 6’0 204 with 32 arms.
pros: Great production in 2022, 80 tackles with 6 INT. Solid testing numbers, 4.5 with 43 inch vert. Great at playing the ball in the air. Good eyes and understands where to be.
cons: Missed too many tackles. Not the most fluid safety, he’s alright moving in space.
take: NA
S Jammie Robinson Florida St 74
info: 1 INT 65 tackles 80.1 RDEF 88 TACK 78 COV. 5’11 191 with 29 5/8 arms.
pros: Sure tackler, only a 7% miss rate. Wants to make every play, plays very hard. Good angles to take at routes and ball carriers.
cons: Not a big safety, he’s sub 6 foot with sub 30 inch arms. Light and not strong, wont knock any RBs backwards. Not a rangy safety and wont play to ball very well.
take: NA
S JL Skinner Boise St 74
info: 52 tackles 4 INT 65.1 RDEF 74.4 TACK 83.3 COV. 6’4 210 with 32 arms.
pros: Very good size, long and adequate strength. Willing tackler, will get in the pile to get the ball carrier down. Good ball skills, many INTs in his career. Solid acceleration when he see’s a play develop.
cons: Bad angles when coming up in run support. Not an agile athlete, tight hips and isn’t quick. On the thinner side so he would struggle in the box.
take: NA
TE Luke Schoonmaker Michigan 74
info: 35 receptions 418 yards 3 TD 78.7 RECV 55.7 RBLK.
pros: Good size at 6’5 250. Solid blocker, has some mass behind him and works hard. Decent athlete, can get vertical and create a little separation.
cons: Very old, will be 25 early in the season. Wasn’t good in contested catch situations. Wont add run after the catch.
take: Schoonmaker is already ready to play in the NFL, his size and strength are solid for the position. He’s a plus blocker that can threaten the defense down the seam. He doesn’t have much upside though, he’s an ok athlete that struggles catching contested targets and doesn’t break many tackles.
WR Puka Nacua BYU 74
info: 48 receptions 625 yards 5 TD 90.1 RECV.
pros: Solid size, 6’1 205. 2 striaght good years of PFF grades and finishing with a 90.1 RECV. Solid contested catch rate at 61.8%. Played snaps at RB, has RAC ability. Good at the top of routes at subtly getting separation to make a play on the ball. Solid athlete, can hit home runs after the catch. Tough competitive kid.
cons: Not good at getting off press at the line. The suddenness in routes isn’t there, he wont be a top level route runner.
take: Nacua wont be the shifty route runner that will show the QB a wide open target, but that is not his game. He’s a great RAC receiver that has good ball skills and physicality to make a play on the ball. He should step in and immediately contribute for whatever team drafts him and could possibly become a force in the league.
WR Parker Washington Penn St 74
info: 46 receptions 611 yards 2 TDs.
pros: Stocky build at 5’10 215 and a true junior. Best hands I've seen, 5% drop and a surprisingly high contested catch rate. Unreal ball skills, can catch a ball in any position and can catch away from his body. Can add YAC with his center of gravity and strong lower half.
cons: Never really was the alpha in the receiving core, best season came with Jahan Dotson as the number 1. Not that fast and shifty for the play style that would fit his build. Doesn’t create the separation with his routes that you would like from a 5’10 slot guy.
take: Washington is an interesting eval, he’s got a weird stocky build for the position and isn’t that top end athlete. But, he’s very good with the ball in his hands and can go pluck the ball out of the air if it’s within his range. He will be able to step in as a return man and if he gets craftier with his routes he could be a great slot.
WR Kayshon Boutte LSU 74
info: Boutte was a 5 star recruit out of New Iberia LA where he was an All State receiver and a highly sought after recruit. He chose to stay home and go to the National Champion LSU tigers, he was immediately thought of as their number 1 but he always seemed to fall short of the very high expectations. His career highs were 48 receptions, 735 yards and 9 TDs which are solid but not top WR numbers. His career came to an end in a very interesting end when he said he would return but some off field issues arose and he declared.
pros: 5 star recruit and a true junior. Solid build at 6 foot 200 and has good speed to go along with it.
cons: Has some off field concerns at LSU. Has drop issues, at 11% drop rate. Hate his effort on routes, he doesn’t work to get open and he’s lazy.
take: Boutte is a case of all the talent in the world but non of the effort. It makes me upset to watch such a physically talented WR play the way he does.
WR Rakim Jarrett Maryland 74
info: 40 receptions 471 yards 3 TD 62.3 RECV.
pros: Former 5 star recruit that is a true junior. Stayed loyal to Maryland over leaving for a big time program. Good athlete, has speed and agility so the potential is good.
cons: Never took over like a 5 star should at Maryland. 11.8% drop rate and 18.2% contested catch rate, scary numbers for his hands. Didn’t run a real good route his entire career, he was limited and didn’t run good routes. Looks like he doesn’t try on plays, jogs routes too much.
take: Jarrett has been a definite disappointment for Maryland. He was a high 5 star recruit and he never made a huge impact or justified that 5 star ranking. He’s a great athlete but his tape is meh, he hasn’t developed any receiver ability past HS it seems.
WR David Durden West Florida 74
info: 34 receptions 787 yars 10 TD. 6’1 204 with 30 3/8 arms and 9 ½ hands.
pros: Had a solid pro day, at 204 he ran a 4.46 jumped 37 inches and had a 4.21 shuttle and a 7 3 cone. Student of the game. Good game speed, can stack and create separation. Great movement skills, can change directions at a high level. Runs very nice routes.
cons: Transferred away from mercer to play at Western Carolina, not a high level. Ran mostly in the slot in college. Older prospect that is an unknown.
take: NA
CB Mekhi Garner LSU 73
info: 0 INT 4 PBU 24/54 416 yards 77.2 TACK 71.2 COV. 6’2 212 with 32 ¼ arms.
pros: Great size at 6’2 and over 200. Great in press, can squeeze receivers out of routes. Solid ability to sink his hips and stop. Great tackler, good size and physicality.
cons: Not the best athlete, a little slow out of breaks. Not agile, a shifty WR could separate easily. No INT in the last 2 years.
take: NA
CB Kyu Blu-Kelly Stanford 73
info: 0 INT 3 PBU 32 tackles 57.3 TACK 64.9 COV. 6’0 193 with 31 ¾ arms.
pros: Went to Stanford so a smart kid. Did a very good job vs Drake London in 2021. Smooth player that can accelerate and change direction well. Used to press coverage where he gets hands on. His dad played in the NFL as a DB. Started for 4 straight seasons.
cons: Not a strong corner, will get blocked easy and have a tough time making tackles. Long speed isn’t great, tough time making up ground. Doesn’t have the dog in him where he needs to make plays.
take: NA.
CB Trevius Hodges-Tomlinson TCU 73
info: 3 INT 10 PBU 28/81 365 yards 47 tackles 78.4 COV. 5’8 178 with 29 arms.
pros: Great athlete, low 4.4 with impressive jumps. Very sticky in man coverage, he stays attached to the receiver. He’s got the dawg in him, very aggressive.
cons: Beyond small, below a lot of thresholds. 14 penalties, way to grabby. Played exclusively outside but will have to play slot.
take: NA
DL Keondre Coburn Texas 73
info: 31 pressures 4 sacks 13 tackles 74.8 RDEF 79.3 PRSH. 6’1 344 with 31 ½ arms.
pros: Big strong nose tackle at 344 pounds. Broke out in 2022, added pass rush to his game. Holds up against double teams pretty well. Solid quickness, has quick hands and a solid first step.
cons: Very short arms, sub 32 inches. Not a good athlete, looks like he struggles to move past his first step.
take: Coburn is a solid run defender, using his 344 pounds to hold his ground in the run game. He adds a good first step and quick hands to make him a more disruptive player than most NTs. He’s just not the athlete and doesn’t have the length to go high in the draft.
DL Jalen Redmond Oklahoma 73
info: 28 pressures 4 sacks 74.8 RDEF 63.2 PRSH. 6’2 291 with 32 5/8 arms.
pros: 4 years of good grading ant both RDEF and PRSH. Great testing, explosive athlete. Fires off the ball well and is disruptive. Played NT so is used to holding doubles.
cons: Undersized, needs to add a little more mass. Played in a lot of stunts and didn’t play real DL too much.
take: NA
DL Scott Matlock Boise St 73
info: 28 pressures 3 sacks 78.3 RDEF 64.3 PRSH. 6’4 296 with 32 ¾ arms.
pros: Pretty good athlete for a DL. Plays at 100% all the time. Has a solid pass rush to his game, solid speed and decent power.
cons: Would like to see him be bigger or longer. Holding up to NFL strength will be an issue.
take: NA
EDGE Colby Wooden Auburn 73
info: 35 pressures 6 sacks 33 tackles 67.9 RDEF 71.8 PRSH. 6’4 273 with 33 ¾ arms.
pros: Good size for the edge, has the length and a solid size. Has the strength to play the run on the interior. Solid hands in the pass game, can get hands off him. High effort player, wants to make plays in the backfield. Seems to be a hard worker per coaches, wants to be great.
cons: For an edge he is not a good athlete, doesn’t have the speed or bend. Not great off the ball just average.
take: NA
EDGE Jose Ramirez Eastern Michigan 73
info: 50 pressures 10 sacks 38 tackles 80.1 RDEF 90.5 PRSH. 6’2 242 with 32 ¾ arms.
pros: Very good athlete with very fluid movement skills. Has a very good dip and rip move. Has some power to his rushes, can use a long arm well.
cons: Not a good size, 6’2 sub 33 inch arms and only 240. Didn’t play the best competition, beat up bad tackles. Unknown if he can stack blocks and set the edge.
take: Pass rush specialist.
EDGE Nick Herbig Wisconsin 73
info: 34 pressures 11 sacks 30 tackles. 75.9 RDEF 91.1 PRSH. 6’2 240 with 31 ¼ arms.
pros: Young player that has produced 2 straight years. Some of the best get off and dip and rip ability.
cons: No length with sub 32 inch arms and 6’2. Pass rush only, wont hold up against the run in the NFL.
take: Good pass rush specialist.
EDGE Nick Hampton Appalachian St 73
info: 26 pressures 9 sacks 18 tackles 74.5 RDEF 85.3 PRSH. 6’2 236 with 33 5/8 arms.
pros: Good college production, 3 straight 80+ pass rush grades. Moves so fluid on the field, can cover and chase down plays. Top tier pass rusher, can get off the ball and bend the edge well.
cons: Not a big edge, may be a pass rush specialist. May struggle holding an edge more of a move LB that can rush.
take: NA
LB Ivan Pace Cincinnati 73
info: 92 tackles 90.7 RDEF 78 TACK 93.3 PRSH 70.6 COV. 5’10 231 with 30 ¾ arms.
pros: Ridiculous 93 PFF grade in 2022. Amazing pass rusher, he had 12 sacks. Muscle hamster, he’s jacked and athletic. Has a nose for the ball and a killer instinct. Great at taking on blocks and evading them and finding his way to the ball.
cons: No length to his game, 30 inch arms and 5’10. Coverage wont be his strong suit. Not going to stack and shed well.
take: Pace is a dog, at the very worst he will be a special teams stud. He’s very short and can struggle because of that in coverage and stack and shedding. Besides that he’s great, he’s so strong, quick and aggressive he is what you want in a MLB.
LB Yasir Abdullah Louisville 73
info: 38 tackles 71.1 RDEF 66.2 TACK 90.8 PRSH 75.5 COV. 6’1 237 with 32 3/8 arms.
pros: Good size and solid length to go with 4.4 speed. Great pass rusher, 20 sacks over the last 2 years. Will stack an offensive lineman, he’s got some power to him.
cons: Misses too many tackles, career 13% miss rate. Played edge, he will be an off ball LB in the NFL if he plays. No experience at the position he will play in the NFL.
take: NA
OG Andrew Vorhees USC 73
info: 3,491 career snaps 82.5 RBLK 80.1 PBLK 15 pressures
pros: Good size, 6’6 325. Had a 90.1 grade in 2021. Decent play strength, can hold up to NFL power if needed.
cons: He came into college in 2017, he’s already 24. Took a step back in 2022 from a 90 to 81. Plays high and not always with good balance, needs to play lower and with more control. Not the best athlete, mediocre lateral quickness.
take: Vorhees is a old prospect that still needs some work. He’s got the size and strength to play but he didn’t dominate like a 6th year senior should. He can end up starting for a team at guard but he will need to continue to improve.
OG Atonio Mafi UCLA 73
info: 1,402 snaps 88.3 RBLK 70.9 PBLK 18 pressures. 6’3 338 with 32 5/8 arms.
pros: Solid size, thick build. Good run blocker, uses good leverage and power to move guys. He can run a bit, solid at pulling.
cons: One year starter. Not the best in pass pro, his feet are stuck in the ground too often and he gets ran around.
take: Mafi is a phone both star. He can drive people back and you wont get through him. He can’t play in a zone scheme and can struggle in pass pro because his lateral agility is mediocre. He could probably start immediately but needs to work on his athleticism.
OG Anthony Bradford LSU 73
info: 1,103 snaps 70 RBLK 51.7 PBLK 12 pressures. 6’4 340.
pros: Massive guard, he is very thick. Has started a game at LT. Has a very good anchor, can stop a bull rush easily. Moves well for his size.
cons: One year starter, not much experience. Seems to not be 100% on what he’s doing all the time. Not very agile, lets guys slip by him too often.
take: Bradford is a massive guard who’s game is power. He’s not a blob either, he can move well for that size. He’s just not experienced and lacks some agility.
OG Jon Gaines UCLA 73
info: 2,384 snaps 76.7 RBLK 77.4 PBLK 18 pressures. 6’3 300.
pros: Had a breakout 2022 where he graded pretty well. Versatile, he has snaps at all of the position. Good athlete, very fast off the ball.
cons: On the smaller side for a lineman. Lacks the power and length to anchor or create movement in the run game.
take: Gaines is a very athletic guard that works hard in the run game to create lanes. He’s on the smaller side though and he doesn’t have much power which will hurt his chances to stick around in the NFL.
OT Kadeem Telfort UAB 73
info: 1,883 snaps 72.9 RBLK 73.6 PBLK 10 pressures. 6’7 319 with 35 7/8 arms.
pros: Amazing build, 6’7 320 with 36 inch arms. Strong and athletic for his size, he moves surprising well.
cons: Legal trouble. Struggled against his one power 5 team. Looks a little unnatural, inefficient steps. May not have the best IQ now.
take: Telfort is a big project but the payoff could be huge. He moves very well for his size and has power to his game along with some solid hand usage already. He’s still raw with his feet and may not have a ton of experience but he could be a good starting OL.
OT Malaesala Aumavae-Laulu Oregon 73
info: 2,007 snaps 76 RBLK 77.8 PBLK 14 pressures. 6’5 322 with 33 7/8 arms.
pros: Thick good build. Solid in pass pro, smooth and can get hands on. Good power, can knock guys to the ground on double teams.
cons: Doesn’t do well with speed, can get ran right by. Not the best balance, bends at the waist and leans too much.
take: Aumavae-Laulu may need to move to guard, but if he does he make become a good NFL starter. He’s food in pass pro where he is smooth and uses his hands well and has good power in the run game. He struggles with the speed rushers that get him off balance.
RB Devon Achane Texas A&M 73
info: Achane was a top 4 star RB coming out of Missouri City TX and somehow chose Texas A&M over the power house of Syracuse. He immediatley got playing time in 2020 where he got 43 carries for 364 yards and a 91 PFF grade. By his junior year he became there top RB and ran the ball 196 times for 1,100 yards and 8 TDs with an 89.8 run grade.
pros: 3 straight 89.8+ PFF rush grades with a total of 2,349 yards at 6.4 YPC. Forced 51 missed tackes with 705 of his 1,100 yards after contact. Could be an explosive change of pace back, he was amazing when he was used sparingly rather then the work horse. Produced with terrible blocking in front of him, not may opportunities for him to get free yards. Great cuts, can stop and start on a dime. Stronger contact balance that you would assume for a 180 pound back. Uses a stiff arm pretty well, can surprise defenders with a quick stiff arm. He has angle breaking speed, can get to the edge of the defense with ease. Good vision on zone concepts, rarely hits the wrong hole and makes the most of what he has.
cons: A terrible pass protector, 27.2 pass block grade with a 10% pressure rate. Small back at 180 who struggles to run up the middle, 3.7 YPC there. Not as effective when he has to carry the bulk of the work in the backfield, efficiency numbers significantly dropped in his lone year as the guy. Don’t love him in a man scheme, a little to bounce happy there.
take: Teams always are looking for a “home run hitter” at RB and that’s exactly what Achane is. He’s such a good athlete he makes defenders look silly, his jump cuts and speed leave defenders in the dust and is dangerous every time he has the ball. He has the ability to be a work horse but he’s most effective as a change of pace back that will take advantage of a tired defense.
S Kaevon Merriweather Iowa 73
info: 42 tackles 3 INT 75.1 RDEF 70.5 TACK 89.3 COV. 6’0 205 with 31 7/8 arms.
pros: Iowa coaches loved him. Great eyes and instincts, see’s plays and attacks them. Good zone coverage defender, communicates and see’s routes well.
cons: Just an average size and athlete. Doesn’t have range to play center field. May have issues in man with his hips.
take: NA
S Marte Mapu Sacramento St 73
info: 63 tackles 2 INT 3 PBU 85.9 RDEF 79 TACK 77.2 COV. 6’3 221.
pros: Good athlete for a LB. Moves very well in coverage, fluid athlete. Loves to tackle, very physical in space. Good eyes, sees the game well.
cons: Has a Pec injury. Tweener, he has to make the transition to LB. Not going to be stack and shedding in the run game. Played at a low level of competition.
take: NA
TE Josh Whyle Cincinnati 73
info: 32 receptions 326 yards 3 TD 68.5 RECV 69.5 RBLK.
pros: Good size at 6’6 260. Had a great 2020 season, 92.9 RECV grade. Has the movement skills to run good routes and get down the seam. Pretty strong in the run game, if he gets his hands on he can move people.
cons: Doesn’t add much with the run after catch. Not the best blocker right now, loses leverage and balance too often.
take: Whyle has it all, he’s a good size with solid strength and athleticism. He can immediately come in and be a solid TE2 with TE1 upside.
TE Brevyn Spann-Ford Minnesota 73
info: 42 receptions 497 yards 2 TDs.
pros: Big TE at 6’7 270, he is a plus in the run game. Great length, can pass block with the length he has and extend to catch any ball.
cons: 5th year player that took 3 years for him to contribute. Not a plus athlete, never going to be a top receiving threat.
take: Spann-Ford is a big run blocking TE that has some receiving upside to his game. He’s not the extra OL like some TE’s are but he can easily step in to be the TE2 and make an impact.
WR AT Perry Wake Forest 73
info: 71 receptions 1,296 yards 15 TD 83 RECV.
pros: Great length, 6’3 195 with 33.75 inch arms. Back to back 1000 yard receiving seasons with 83 RECV grades. Good catch radius with his length and vertical. Comes back to attack the ball well. Solid release package, uses hands and shake well.
cons: Only average hands, 10% drop rate and a sub 50% contested catch. Sub par athlete, his agility isn’t very good. His routes need work, Wakes offense didn’t have him do much.
take: Perry is the prototypical X receiver, he’s a long receiver that can win on the sideline whether that be tracking the ball or coming back to it on a comeback. He was ultra productive and showed solid ball skills but he’s not a complete prospect. The athleticism is just ok and he dropped too many balls over the course of the year. He may be able to step in at X day 1 but I wouldn’t expect him to take over the league.
WR Justin Shorter Florida 73
info: 29 receptions 577 yards 2 TD 75.2 RECV.
pros: 6’4 224, great size. 5 star recruit, was the top receiver over Amon Ra, Jmar Chase and Jaylen Waddle. 20 YPC, he can be a big play threat. Good hands, career 5% drop and 0 drops in 2022. Was open all the time in the Tennessee game. Good ability to stack the receiver, can run past guys and track the ball.
cons: Former 5 star that has been a disappointment. Has struggled with his health and his weight, possibly eat his way to a TE. Didn’t force a missed tackle in 2022. Doesn’t have much quickness to his game, not going to shake DBs. Mediocre routes, needs to be a bit more savvy and find space. Doesn’t have the most natural hands, it gets tough when he has to extend away from his body.
take: Shorter had a disappointing college career but I have hope for his NFL career. He’s an elite size and athleticism combo that has flashed some great play over the last 3 years at Florida. If he can dedicate himself to learning the receiver position at the NFL level he could be a star.
WR Trey Palmer Nebraska 73
info: Palmer was a 4 star recruit coming out of Kentwood LA where he was a track star winning a state title with a 21.11 200 meter time. Palmer Didn't play much in his first 3 years at LSU so he transferred to Nebraska to be their number 1 guy. He was in fact, he caught 71 balls for 1043 yards and 9 TDs with an 83 grade and was named 2nd team all big 10.
pros: 1,000 yards in his one year as a featured guy. Elite speed, he’s a true deep threat.
cons: 6 foot 190, he’s on the small side. Hands are questionable, 13% drop rate and 39% contested catch rate. Not an explosive athlete, burst and agility are mediocre.
take: Palmer is a one trick pony, he’s a burner. His entire game is his elite speed. He will not be anything more than a deep threat though which doesn’t work in the NFL.
WR Bryce Ford-Wheaton West Virginia 73
info: 62 receptions 675 yards 7 TD 70.3 RECV.
pros: Great size, 6’3 222 with 33.5 inch arms. Strong, can fight through contact and make a catch through contact. Freaky testing numbers at the combine.
cons: Not great with the ball in his hands, doesn’t offer much RAC. Doesn’t run good routes, rounds them and doesn’t accelerate.
take: After a blazing hot start to the season with 20 receptions and 250 yards and 4 TD through 2 weeks Ford-Wheaton cooled off from there. He’s a big bodied receiver that can be a good red zone threat for a team.
C Juice Scruggs Penn St 72
info: 1,982 snaps 69.9 RBLK 73.6 PBLK 14 pressures. 6’3 308 with 33 3/8 arms.
pros: Solid center size at 6’3 308 with over 33 inch arms. Solid athlete, can move and get to the 2nd level. Smart player, picks up stunts well.
cons: Doesn’t have the best power, bigger DT won’t be moved off the ball.
take: Scruggs is a good smart center. He’s got the build of a high end center and the athleticism to  be a good zone blocking center. He may struggle with power though, he doesn’t create too much movement off the ball and may be susceptible to a bull rush.
CB Jaylon Jones Texas A&M 72
info: 0 INT 1 PBU 10/19 94 yards 60.9 TACK 72.3 COV. 6’2 200 with 30 ¾ arms.
pros: Solid size and athlete and a young player. 3 year starter that let up under 100 yards in 2023. Eyes are good, sees the routes and QB well to break on routes. Moves well, hips are fluid.
cons: Not the longest arms or the best straight line speed. Gets stacked too easily, can struggle on the sideline. Wont break on many passes to make a play on the ball. Allows too much separation.
take: NA
CB Starling Thomas UAB 72
info: 0 INT 9 PBU 22/59 257 yards 74 TACK 79.1 COV. 6’0 195 with 30 3/8 arms.
pros: Solid size with good speed, ran a 4.38. Leader of his team. Turns his head to find the ball well. Good in man coverage, uses eyes well and can run with them.
cons: Loses at the stem of the route too much, receivers separate too easy. Not sure about zone ability.
take: NA
CB Corey Mayfield UTSA 72
info: 3 INT 10 PBU 36/67 500 yards 72.4 TACK 77 COV. 5’10 190 with 30 7/8 arms.
pros: Good ball production in 2022, 3 INTs and 10 PBU. Solid testing, 4.49 4.30 and 7.06. Solid back to back PFF grades. Aggressive player that plays through contact and wants to make plays. Solid athlete, moves well and has makeup speed.
cons: On the smaller side with sub 31 inch arms and 5’10. Can be too greedy and play to underneath routes. Can lose sight of the field and let a WR run by him.
take: NA
DL Karl Brooks Bowling Green 72
info: 69 pressures 12 sacks 32 tackles 90.3 RDEF 92 PRSH. 6’3 303 with 32 ¼ arms.
pros: Ridiculous 93 DEF grade. Solid pass rusher, gives effort and swipes hands well.
cons: Not the best length, 32 inch arms. Way too many edge snaps on his tape, he’s certainly not athletic enough for that. No experience at the interior and needs a lot of work there to be NFL caliber. Not a good athlete even though he played on the edge.
take: Brooks is a pass rushing project in the NFL. At bowling green he played so much edge it looks like he doesn’t know how to play DL and it will take some coaching to get him there. In the meantime he can be subbed in during pass rush situations because he gives a lot of effort and uses his hands well in the pass game.
DL Jaquelin Roy LSU 72
info: 27 pressures 2 sacks 39 tackles 68.4 RDEF 70.6 PRSH. 6’4 315.
pros: Has a nice swim move to his game. Great size, he’s a hard dude to move. Solid athleticism, can get upfield well for a NT.
cons: Loses hos gap in the run game too easy. Doesn’t knock OL back and establish the LoS.
take: NA
EDGE Viliami Fehoko San Jose St 72
info: 66 pressures 12 sacks 35 tackles 87.4 RDEF 90.2 PRSH. 6’4 276 with 33 arms.
pros: Well built edge, strong at 276. Back to back 88+ pass rush grades. Refined pass rusher, has a spin double hand swipe and rip to win.
cons: Played a lot of lower level competition. Not the best athlete, doesn’t threaten the outside rush. Wish he showed more power in the run game.
take: NA
EDGE Robert Beal Georgia 72
info: 26 pressures 3 sacks 23 tackles 64.3 RDEF 65.9 PRSH. 6’4 247 with 34 5/8 arms.
pros: Good potential with his size and athleticism. High effort player that plays 100 mph all the time. Good counter moves, can quickly win to the inside.
cons: Couldn’t find a starting job until injuries hit in 2022. Doesn’t have the best pass rush moves, more of an athlete than a rusher. Not the strongest against the run, will have problems setting edges.
take: NA
EDGE Brenton Cox Florida 72
info: 21 pressures 2 sacks 18 tackles 66.1 RDEF 68.7 PRSH. 6’3 254 with 33 ¼ arms. Cox was a 5 star big time recruit comming out of Stockbridge GA where he could go wherever he wanted in college. Somehow he didn't accept Syracuses offer and he chose Ohio State before flipping his commitment to Georgia to play along side all the talent that they brought in on defense that year. As a true freshman at georgia he made good contributions with a 74 PFF grade. He transfered fro Georgia to Florida after seeing all the talent on the edges there and began to play for the Gators in 2020 and had his best season with 48 pressures and a 80 PFF grade. He was good for the Gators but a huge red flag happened halfway through the 2022 season where he was dismissed from the team for punching a Georgia RB and other undisclosed issues.
pros: 5 star recruit with flashes of why he was that caliber recruit. Very good athlete, quick off the ball and has quick hands. Has power to his game, can hold an edge and long arm Tackles. Has a really good pass rush repertoire.
cons: Off field concerns, suspended from the team and had to leave Georgia. Length isn’t great, can get OL hands on him a little too easy.
take: Cox would be a top 50 player if the off field issues were gone. He’s a great athlete with good power and quick hands, that allows him to rush the passer at a high level. If he gets into no more trouble Cox may become a top level edge rusher.
LB Anfernee Orji Vanderbilt 72
info: 81 tackles 76.7 RDEF 53.9 TACK 61.3 PRSH 60.1 COV. 6’1 230 with 32 arms.
pros: 2 year SEC starter and team captain with adequate size and solid testing numbers. Plays the run well, comes down hill and can scrape over the line. Pretty good off the edge, can bend and chase down the edge.
cons: Missed 15% of his career tackles. Not great in coverage, wont make plays on the ball.
take: NA
LB Mikel Jones Syracuse 72
info: Jones was a surprise commit to Syracuse after attending IMG academy and earning a high 3 star recruit and getting offers from many top SEC schools. He immediately played as a true freshman getting 4 starts and 38 tackles. He started for the remainder of his career getting 4 INTs in 2020 and 70 tackles in 2021 along with an All ACC first team selection.
pros: Good in coverage, finds receivers in space well and reads designed screens well. Good patients and athleticism to close in fast.
cons: Not a big linebacker, weak side only.
take: 
OG Nick Broker Ole Miss 72
info: 3,323 career snaps 62 RBLK 72.8 PBLK 19 pressures.
pros: Played both OG and OT. Solid enough athlete to pull and do anything you ask of him. Good technician, always engaging the defenders chest and trying to drive them. Works hard in the run game, will run his feet to stay on the block.
cons: 32 inch arms, not a very long player. Never graded above 70, was never a dominate OL. His strength is an issue, he fits defenders well but can’t move them and can struggle anchoring. High level defenders can toy with him, he’s just not a good NFL athlete.
take: Broeker plays hard and is solid with his technique. He has physical limitations that will hinder the level of his play to a high end back up to low end starter at best.
OG Jarrett Patterson Notre Dame 72
info: info: Patterson was a highly sought after recruit coming out of Mission Viejo in California. He choose to attend Notre Dame and put together a very nice career there. He was the starter his sophomore year and on for a dominate Notre Dame offensive line. His final year he was named a captain and acted as a leader for the team all year.
pros: 2 time Notre Dame team captain, he’s a leader with great experience. Great at picking up stunts and passing them off, very smooth in pass pro. Gives good effort in the run game and stays on his blocks.
cons: Short short arms, sub 32 inches. Took a step back in grading after switching to guards from center. Lacking the anchor/power to play high level guard, best position is center. Could work on his pad level, can let defenders get under him too often.
take: Patterson is a guy you want on your team, he’s a smart leader that has played a lot of football. He’s not going to wow you physically but he will be able to step in and not be overwhelmed by the NFL.
OT Asim Richards North Carolina 72
info: 2,522 snaps 53.1 RBLK 75.5 PBLK 20 pressures. 6’4 307 with 34 1/8 arms.
pros: 3 year starter with solid length. Solid hand usage, gets his hands on defenders well and will re fit. Has the OL mentality, will finish a block if he can.
cons: Plays incredibly high, he has no leverage. Sloppy feet, gets to narrow and moves a little slow. Bad run blocker, he cant move people in the run game.
take: Richards is a raw OT which is concerning because he is a 3 year starter. He has great length and enough athleticism and power to play but it doesn’t show often. He plays high and with bad feet, but even with those flaws he pass blocked pretty well meaning if a team can clean that up he can be a starting OT.
OT Jordan Mcfadden Clemson 72
info: 2,956 snaps 67 RBLK 78.7 PBLK 13 pressures. 6’2 295 with 34 arms.
pros: had 3 previous seasons of 80+ PFF grade. Has great length for his height, 6’2 with 34 inch arms. Has some nastiness to his game, will put a guy in the ground. Solid technique, solid feet and hands.
cons: Had his worst year in 2022 by 10 PFF grade. Sub 300 pounds, needs to add mass and maybe move to guard. Balance is mediocre, he gets thrown around too much.
take: Mcfadden had a very good college career at Clemson where he was battle tested. He played on both sides of the line and played well every year. He’s got the ability but there are too many reps he gets off balance that needs to get cleaned up.
OT Wanya Morris Oklahoma 72
info: 1,747 snaps 76.9 RBLK 73.9 PBLK 8 pressures. 6’5 317 with 35 5/8th arms.
pros: Nearly the perfect build at 6’5 317 with 35.5 inch arms.  Improved greatly from his freshman season. Former 5 star recruit. Decent strength and athleticism.
cons: Didn’t start for a while. Awful technique, his hand placement is all over the place. His feet are sloppy, bad sets and gets way too narrow. Bad balance.
take: Morris is a disappointment, the former 5 star built in a lab tackle never played that well. His first 3 years he struggled mightily before finding a bit of a groove in 2022. He has it all physically but his technique is awful, he has bad feet and balance which will take some time to work out.
RB Lew Nichols Central Michigan 72
info: 175 attempts 6 TD 69.5 RUN.
pros: Great 2021 season, 1,846 yards 16 TDs and a PFF grade of 84.8. Solid size at 5’11 222. Has excellent short area burst, can deliver a blow in 1 step. Good quickness and vision to find the hole.
cons: Massive drop off in 2022. Not very good out of the backfield. Lost a little speed in 2022 by gaining some weight.
take: Nichols was the Central Michigan offense in 2021, he put up impressive numbers. In 2022 he added some weight but kept his good feet a vision and added power. He’s a great RB build with good explosiveness but he doesn’t have the speed and pass catching ability that a number 1 back would want now a days. He should be a good RB2 in the league.
RB Deuce Vaughn Kansas St 72
info: Vaughn was born in Fayetteville AR and moved to play HS football in Round Rock TX. He accumulated 5,472 all purpose yards to go along with 50 TDs in his career there. He had offers from many SEC schools but chose K State over them where he played as a true freshman and was named the Big 12 freshman of the year after getting 1,221 all purpose yards. His next season in 2021 was great, he had over a 91 PFF grade while rushing for over 1,500 yards and was All big 12 1st team. In 2022 he had a similar statistical year to make his mark as one of the best backs Kansas State has ever had.
pros: He's been a work horse for Kansas State, 3000 yards and over 500 carries in the last 2 years. Forced 106 missed tackles in the last 2 years with 27 TDs. Doesn't fumble often, only 2 career fumbles on 646 carries. Very good out of the backfield with a career 117 receptions and 1,275 yards. Great change of direction and quickness to his game, makes people completely whiff at times. Has break away speed and wont be caught by any LBs. Not afraid of contact, wont dance away from it.
cons: He's beyond small, you wont find a smaller back in the league at 5'6 175. Under an average of 3 yards after contact. Awful pass blocker, 21.3 is his highest PFF grade. Not going to get extra yards through contact. Probably wont be able to pass block.
take: Everything about Vaughn has to have the disclaimer of he’s so small. It’s hard to succeed in the NFL at his size but he can find a nice role out of the backfield in spread situations especially.
RB Chris Rodriguez Kentucky 72
info: 175 carries 904 yards 6 TDs.
pros: 2 grades over 90 for rushing. A career 6.2 YPC with 3,642 yards. Big well built back at 5’11 224. Packs a punch on initial contact, can easily run over defenders. Runs angry, arm tackles wont stop him and he’s not a fun back to bring down.
cons: Suspended for an unknown reason to start the 2022 season. Older prospect, this is his 5th year in college. Never a plus receiver, essentially a running back only. Can want to get too north and south sometimes, running straight into lineman. Not much quickness to his game, won’t make people whiff in space.
take: Rodriguez is an old school runner that would be a great back in the 80’s. He’s powerful has solid speed and put up numbers through out his career. He’s got the off field red flags and isn’t much of a pass catcher but that shouldn’t prevent him from finding a home in the NFL.
S Daniel Scott Cal 72
info: 69 tackles 3 INTS 59.4 RDEF 59.2 TACK 69.4 COV. 6’1 208 with 30 ¼ arms.
pros: Great size and athleticism combo. Team captain. Moves well on the field, can flip hips and run.
cons: 6th year player that had a drop off in 2022. Not an instinctive player, takes him longer to see plays develop.
take: NA
S Brandon Joseph Notre Dame 72
info: 23 tackles 1 INT 62 RDEF 72.7 TACK 77.1 COV. 6’0 202 with 30 7/8 arms.
pros: Top safety recruit that was expected to be a top prospect in 2022. Heat seaking missile when coming downhill. 10 INTs in his career, he was a productive safety at NW.
cons: Mediocre testing numbers, not a good athlete. The range and acceleration isn’t very good.
take: NA
TE Tucker Kraft South Dakota St 72
info: 27 Receptions 348 yards 3 TDs.
pros: Perfect TE build at 6’5 255. Very good against FCS competition, easily shrugged off defenders. Solid hands and good catch radius.
cons: Got hurt week 1 against Iowa and missed 2 months. Played in the FCS against weaker competition. Drops may be a concern at 10% drop rate. Looked out of place at times blocking FBS talent. Not at plus athlete that will run by anyone.
take: Kraft was very good for South Dakota using his great size and strength to bully lower-level competition. It will be an adjustment to the NFL for sure but he has the ability to play in the league.
TE Cameron Latu Alabama 72
info: 30 receptions 376 yards 4 TD 60.6 RECV 50 RBLK.
pros: Solid size at 6’4 248. Was Alabamas starting TE. Solid blocker, works hard in the run game.
cons: Not a very good athlete, wont wow anyone. Didn’t grade out too well. Isn’t dynamic with the ball in his hands.
take: Latu is a very solid and was an big part of Alabama’s offense. He was solid in the pass game and run game. He just wont excite anyone with his athleticism and will be limited to a TE 2 at most.
WR Jake Bobo UCLA 72
info: 54 receptions 789 yards 7 TD 83.7 RECV.
pros: 6’4 215, he has great size. Very good hands, 5% career drop rate. Great feel for finding space in zone. Uses hands well to gain separation. Good body control, can catch a ball in any position.
cons: Not a great athlete, won’t be much of a deep threat. Not explosive with the ball in his hands, RAC is not a strong suit. 5th year player that had one good year.
take: Bobo is a very solid and steady receiver, he has amazing hands and good knowledge of how to get open. He’s a reliable big bodied receiver that is a QBs safety blanket. He’s not a big time threat to score every play though, with average athleticism he’s not a burner or a big time RAC threat.
WR CJ Johnson East Carolina 72
info: 60 receptions 933 yards 9 TD 76.5 RECV.
pros: Good size, 6’2 220. 3% drop rate in the last 2 years, good hands. Strong receiver, can run through contact and run after the catch. He’s a dog, will fight for yards. He can play the ball very well.
cons: Played for east Carolina, low level competition. Played a lot of slot and not many reps in press, it will be an adjustment.
take: Johnson was unstoppable for East Carolina, he’s a big strong receiver that can make plays. He’s not the best athlete but his game is physicality, he can attack the ball and run through contact. He should be a good depth piece initially and possibly develop into a good starter soon.
WR Jadon Haselwood Arkansas 72
info: Haselwood didn't have a hard time getting offers out of Fayetteville AR, he was the top WR prospect and a high 5 star. He committed to the power house OU where he played with QBs Jalen Hurts, Spencer Rattler and Caleb Williams. He never produced much at Oklahoma, he only had 650 total yards in 3 years and looked like a bust of a 5 star. He left OU when Lincoln Riley left and went back to his home state of Arkansas where he had 59 receptions for 700 yards and 3 TDs after recovering from an ACL tear in 2020.
pros: Good size at 6’2 213, ideal outside receiver. Natural hands catcher, attacks the ball and catches away from the body. Can really run after the catch, he’s a strong runner with a good feel for space. Physical receiver, can play through contact and use hands in routes well.
cons: Never got the play time and targets at Oklahoma a 5 star recruit should get. A lot of lazy routes where he’s drifting and that was a part of the offense. Not a sudden athlete, won’t be shaking any defenders and creating separation. Top speed isn’t great, he won’t threaten defensive backs deep. Total career production would be good for one year, it’s concerning he never could get more targets.
take: Haselwood was a top tier prospect and had high hopes when he went to Oklahoma as a freshman. His career didn’t go how he would like it though, never getting the targets he would want. He did show that he is a big physical receiver with good ball skills though which is perfect for an X receiver. He could get a chance to start at some point because of the size and physicality.
WR Joseph Ngata Clemson 72
info: 41 receptions 526 yards 2 TD 67.1 RECV.
pros: Great size at 6’2 220. Very good recruit that played immediately. Good ball skills, can catch away from his frame well. Strong, can run routes through contact and make run with the ball.
cons: Production was middling, never got over 550 yards. Missed a lit of games do to injury. His route running is average, needs to continue to work on finding space.
take: Ngata is a pretty good blend of size and athleticism but was held back by injury. He has plenty of upside with his ball skills and physical attributes but still needs to develop his routes. He should be taken to develop and hopefully become a good X receiver.
WR Demario Douglas Liberty 72
info: 70 receptions 980 yards 6 TD 86.2 RECV
pros: Was liberties top target and graded well. 5% drop rate, good hands. Unreal change of direction ability and feel to make people miss.
cons: 5’8 175, he’s very small. Not great at making plays away from his body, his catch radius is small. A lot of not real routes ran.
take: Douglas is this years Kadarius Toney. He’s much smaller and doesn’t have the receiving ability of an NFL receiver but he’s electric with the ball and moves so well. He at the least can return for a team and if he develops can be a dangerous WR.
WR Andrei Iosivas Princeton 72
info: 64 receptions 924 yards 7 TD 85.7 RECV.
pros: Good size, 6’3 212. Dominated low level competition. Solid hands, 4.5% drop rate in 2022. Looks like a good athlete against bad competition.
cons: 8.5 inch hands. He doesn’t have the most natural hands, catches on the body. He played against garbage FCS teams.
take: Iosivas has the look of an NFL receiver but he’s such a projection because of the competition he played against. Get him on a team and let him develop while he can contribute on special teams.
WR Dontay Demus Maryland 72
info: 22 receptions 233 yards 1 TD 56 RECV.
pros: Good size, 6’3 210. Was dominating in 2021 until he got hurt. Good speed to go with his size, he’s a deep threat. Good strength to get through defenders.
cons: Only 233 yards in his 5th year. Tore his ACL in 2021 and didn’t look the same after. Not a quick athlete, routes wouldn’t be called crisp.
take: Demus was a great prospect through week 5 of 2021. Unfortunately he tore his ACL after a blazing hot start. If he can get back to the 2021 form he can be a starting NFL receiver.
C Olusegun Oluwatimi Michigan 71
info: 3,479 snaps 83 RBLK 76.7 PBLK 9 pressures.
pros: Very experienced guard that has played for 3 schemes (Air Force, Virginia, Michigan). Had a 90 RBLK grade in 2021 at Virginia. Does a good job picking up blitzes and stunts, has seen a lot of fronts. Good athlete, can pull and log around the line as well as mirror defenders. Good in double teams, always gets a good push and can climb to a backer.
cons: Would like to see a bigger center at 6’3 307. He’s Not the strongest OL and he doesn’t play with good pad level. Isn’t a dog in the run game, likes to just do enough and get in the way, not drive the defender back.
take: Oluwatimi is a very experienced center with good enough strength and solid athleticism. He wont do much to wow you on tape but he has a good IQ and gets the job done nearly every time. He can most likely step in and play if you need to fill in an interior spot in the OL.
CB Rejzohn Wright Oregon St 71
info: 2 INT 6 PBU 25/53 302 yards 51.1 TACK 74.3 COV. 6’2 193 with 32 ½ arms.
pros: Solid length, 6’2 with 32 ½ arms. Solid long speed that can make up distance. Solid press, has good patience and length.
cons: Not a twitchy athlete, no sudden movements. Not very fluid, struggles to turn and run well. Gets grabby and holds on routes, 12 penalties in 2 years/
take: NA
CB Carrington Valentine Kentucky 71
info: 1 INT 6 PBU 36/65 502 yards 64 TACK 70 COV. 6’0 193 with 32 ¼ arms.
pros: Solid size with solid testing and an underclassman.
cons: Not a great athlete on the field, too much separation allowed.
take: NA
DL Tyler Lacy Oklahoma St 71
info: 17 pressures 3 sacks 14 tackles 87.4 RDEF 68.8 PRSH. 6’4 279 with 33 ¼ arms.
pros: Good against the run, can stack and shed tackles well. Moves well for a DT, can move quickly down the line to close in on a ball carrier. Solid hands, placement is good and strong.
cons: Poor athletic testing for a sub 280. Will play DL but is a little lighter. Complete projection to the DL, played on the edge. Will need to add strength to hold up in the interior.
take: NA
DL Brodric Martin Western Kentucky 71
info: 23 pressures 2 sacks 23 tackles. 6’5 330 with 35 inch arms.
pros: Has the perfect size, massive build with long arms. Eats up the middle of the defense, he’s a true nose guard. Has some pass rush to his game.
cons: Not the best get off, needs to be a 2 gap player. Hands are average, doesn’t get guys off his pads enough.
take: NA
EDGE DJ Johnson Oregon 71
info: 28 pressures 5 sacks 20 tackles 66.3 RDEF 72.3 PRSH. 6’4 260 with 33 ¼ arms.
pros: Solid size at 6’4 260. Great athlete, has amazing straight line speed off the ball. Worst case he can be a special teams player.
cons: Only one year of production in 5 seasons. Not a shifty player, very linear athlete. Not much bend to speak of.
take: Great athlete, can play special teams at least.
EDGE Eku Leota Auburn 71
info: 18 pressures 4 sacks 12 tackles 72.8 RDEF 83 PRSH. 6’3 252 with 33 ½ arms.
pros: Good speed off the ball and has a nice speed move to the edge. Solid strength, can hold up in the run game. Good change of direction to go back under blocks.
cons: Missed the second half of the season. Doesn’t have a trump card, he’s a good athlete but not great.
take: NA
LB Bumper Pool Arkansas 71
info: 91 tackles 73.6 RDEF 81.6 TACK 67.9 PRSH 68.4 COV. 6’2 232 with 31 ¾ arms.
pros: Team captain. Plays the run well, will come downhill. Good IQ, sees the game well.
cons: 2 down backer, struggles moving in coverage well.
take: NA
OG Jovaughn Gwyn South Carolina 71
info: 3,195 snaps 65.2 RBLK 76 PBLK 19 pressures. 6’3 300.
pros: 4 years starter in the SEC. Good athlete with good flexibility. Solid in pass pro, he is smart and uses his hands well.
cons: On the smaller side for an offensive lineman. Not a people mover, wont create vertical movement in the run game.
take: Gwyn is an experienced guard that is a plus athlete at the position. He is very smart and is a solid pass protector that can handle one on ones. He’s just not a plus run blocker because he lacks that power you look for.
OT Braeden Daniels Utah 71
info: 2,942 career snaps 65.6 RBLK 78.7 PBLK 15 pressures.
pros: Solid length, 33.5 inch arms and an 82.5 wing span. 2020/2021 88 and 89 PFF RBLK grades, graded well in 2021. Versatile, played LT LG and RT. He’s a good athlete that can mirror defenders and handle speed rushers. Good at keeping defenders away from him with his length.
cons: He’s very small at 6’4 297 he’s in the bottom 10% for weight. Took a step back in 2022 from an 84 to a 72 PFF grade when he moved to LT. Sloppy feet and inconsistent hands, will lower them and let guys in his chest and loses the hand fight a lot.
take: Daniels is a developmental tackle even though he has almost 3,000 career snaps. His feet need work as well as his sets and his hand fighting as well. The athlete is there though, he’s a solid lineman with good length he just needs coaching.
OT TJ Bass Oregon 71
info: 2,211 snaps 78.1 RBLK 73.4 PBLK 20 pressures. 6’4 320.
pros: Graded well back-to-back years as the starter. High IQ, see’s stunts well and plays with patience. Great hand usage, will always fight to re fit. Has a sloid anchor, you have to go around him.
cons: Lacks the length to play tackle, he gets guys on his chest too often. Not a plus athlete, struggles to get off the ball fast. Plays high through contact, won’t move people because of his leverage.
take: Bass has his physical limitations, he’s not very long or athletic so a move to guard may be needed. He’s a technician that doesn’t lose often and plays very hard which is a good combo.
OT Jake Witt Northern Michigan 71
info: 6’7 302 with 33 ½ arms.
pros: Great testing numbers, 4.89 40 4.62 shuttle and 7.44 3 cone.
cons: No film.
take: NA
QB Jaren Hall BYU 71
info: 3,162 yards 31 TD 6 INT 65.7% 82.4 PASS 72 RUN.
pros: 89 and 86 PFF grade in his 2 years starting at BYU. 52 TDs to 11 INTs in his career. Decent arm talent, can make throws on the run and has NFL arm strength. Good athlete, can get to the perimeter and escape trouble. Has some real high-level reps on his tape where he throws with the anticipation and velocity needed. Knows how to throw receivers open on the sideline with a back shoulder. Looks good in rhythm, has a solid base to him and quick feet to set and fire to his target.
cons: He will be 25 when he gets into the NFL, he took a mission trip before playing at BYU. Not the ideal size at 6’1 205, he’s on the small side. Doesn’t have the zip on the ball you would want from a project QB. Doesn’t step in his throws with pressure, scared of getting hit. Too many head scratching plays where he is just either way off accuracy wise or decision making. Get lazy sometime and drifts when he throws causing inaccurate passes.
take: Hall is a solid project QB a team should take a chance on. He’s already 25 but he’s got the arm talent and athleticism that is a hard to find together. He has moments where he looks like he could be in the top of the class so if he can be more consistent a team may find a late round gem.
RB Tiyon Evans Louisville 71
info: 83 carries 518 yards 6 TDs 76.7 RUN.
pros: 22 missed tackles forced on 83 attempts. Good strong muscular build. Explosive athlete, can burst through the line well and keep his feet going. Solid speed, has the break away speed in the 2nd level.
cons: fumbled 3 times in 83 attempts. Why did he only get 164 college carries, he’s better than that. Injured in 2022 and missed his chance to show out.
take: If you were to watch Evans in a game he starts you wouldn’t believe that he never broke 100 carries. He’s the perfect build with a muscular frame and strong legs. He also is an explosive athlete with some speed and contact balance. I wouldn’t be surprised if he cleans up his fumbles if he becomes an impactful RB.
RB Evan Hull Northwestern 71
info: 220 carries 914 yards 5 TDs.
pros: Student of the game, he has good vision with a solid feel for setting up defenders. Can produce out of the backfield, over 500 yards receiving. Good at running feet through contact, he will churn for extra yards.
cons: Poor pass blocking grades, 92% pass block rate. Not going to make people miss cleanly, will break a tackle but isn’t dangerous after that. Athleticism is lacking, the quickness and speed are barely NFL level.
take: Hull will not be impressing anyone with a highlight tape but he does a lot of things good enough to play in the NFL. He’s a back up through and through but he could be a nice 3rd back on a team.
S Ronnie Hickman Ohio St 71
info: 39 tackles 1 INTS 75.3 RDEF 62.4 TACK 88.9 COV. 6’1 203 with 33 arms.
pros: Good discipline, he’s in solid position and can make the plays. Smooth athlete, looks like a natural playing. Can play the run and deep safety.
cons: Doesn’t have the great instincts to jump on routes. A little thin, could struggle in the box.
take: NA
S Anthony Johnson Iowa St 71
info: 53 tackles 2 INT 2 PBU 68.1 RDEF 60.2 TACK 74.9 COV. 6’0 205 with 31 ¼ arms.
pros: Solid size and solid athlete. Has experience at both corner and safety, versatile. Team captain with over 3000 career snaps. Good in coverage, moves well and sees the game well.
cons: Very soft in the run game, not attacking downhill. Not a good tackler, not very physical.
take: NA
S Chamarri Conner Virginia Tech 71
info: 49 tackles 0 INT 57.3 RDEF 62.8 TACK 67.7 COV. 6’0 202 with 31 3/8 arms.
pros: Good athlete, 4.5 with 40 inch vert. 3,000 career snaps, a lot of solid experience. 2 time team captain.
cons: Not the best in the box, he can’t take on blocks. Doesn’t move as well on the field as his testing.
take: NA
TE Joel Wilson Central Michigan 71
info: 44 receptions 445 yards 6 TD 80.9 RECV 45.5 RBLK.
pros: 10.25 inch hands, massive hands. Didn’t drop a ball in 2022. Very good blocker, good in pass pro and gives good effort in run game. Can make some good catches away from his body, a big target.
cons: Didn’t do anything for his first 3 years. Not a great route runner, wont be separating well. Needs to block with better pad level. A tad undersized at 6'3 242.
take: Wilson is a solid reliable TE with the ability to block and catch passes. Wilson is solid in pass pro and trys hard in the run game but needs to work on his pad level in the league. As for pass catching, he wont be a vertical threat but his hands are very good and he is a big safe target to throw to. He could easily become a starter if he bulks up a little and works on his leverage.
TE Zack Kuntz Old Dominion 71
info: 12 receptions 144 yards 2 TD 67.3 RECV 67.5 RBLK.
pros: Former Penn State receiver, was a solid recruit. Had 73 receptions in 2021. Good athlete, tested well at the combine.
cons: Too long of a build at 6’8 245. Got hurt after week 5 in 2023. Soft run blocker, doesn’t do it at all.
take: Kuntz has good length and is a fine athlete but he’s not a good blocker at all. He’s soft in the run game and it will only be worse in the NFL. He will struggle to make a roster.
WR Grant DuBose Charlotte 71
info: 63 receptions 793 yards 9 TD 72.8 RECV.
pros: 6’2 205, he’s got solid size. Back to back solid seasons of 60+ and 750+. Good route runner, he’s very good out of the top of his break. Good release, can shake guys at the line.
cons: Played at Charlotte, not the best competition. Athleticism is not good, he can’t threaten deep.
take: Dubose is a very solid receiver that has played well for Charlotte. He’s such a good route runner, from the release to the stem of the route he is great. His issue is that he isn’t the level of athlete you would like to see. He could become a starting receiver but he needs to win without his athleticism.
WR Elijah Higgins Stanford 71
info: 59 receptions 704 yards 2 TD 64.8 RECV.
pros: Great size at 6’3 228 with 32 inch arms and 10.5 inch hands. Got more production every single year. Some of the best speed and acceleration at the senior bowl.
cons: Never dominated, his best year was 704 yards. For a guy his size he is only ok at contested catches, 43%. Not a sudden player, agility isn’t the best which hurts his routes. Not great off press which will throw off timing.
take: Higgins has the ideal size and speed a team is looking for, he is 6’3 230 and has good speed. He’s a developmental receiver though, his releases and routes are not there yet and his production doesn’t match someone that physically gifted. He should be a depth piece that can play special teams and if he develops he can be a great outside receiver.
WR Matt Landers Arkansas 71
info: 44 receptions 780 yards 7 TD 71.4 RECV.
pros: 6’4 200, good size and length. Surprising twitch for a guy his size, can shake guys. Good with the ball in his hands, he can make people miss.
cons: One year of producing after leaving Georgia. Not a great route runner, doesn’t set guys up well. Not a strong receiver, wont play through contact and make catches well.
take: Landers is a rare blend of length and agility. He isn’t the best route runner and his ball skills are average which isn’t ideal. Since you can’t teach that size and agility he should get a late round flyer to see if he can develop.
C Alex Forsyth Oregon 70
info: 1,983 snaps 70.3 RBLK 85.8 PBLK 1 pressure. 6’4 310.
pros: Only allowed 1 pressure in 2022. Solid athlete, can reach and get to the second level. Smart player, made calls for the Oregon OL.
cons: Not a powerful player, he wont knock anyone off the ball. May struggle anchoring in the NFL.
take: Forsyth was the anchor of the Oregon offensive line, he made all the calls and has a high IQ. He also is a pretty good athlete as well with the ability to move in space. He’s just lacking the power to make him a great prospect, he’s probably limited to a zone scheme.
C Corey Luciano Washington 70
info: 934 snaps 75.4 RBLK 85.3 PBLK 12 pressures. 6’3 307 with 32 3/8 arms.
pros: Adequate NFL size. Really good on the move, can reach and climb up to the second level.
cons: One year starter. Not the strongest center.
take: NA
CB Cameron Mitchell Northwestern 70
info: 1 INT 7 PBU 29/50 410 yards. 74.1 TACK 66.7 COV. 5’11 191 with 31 3/8 arms.
pros: Solid strength, can be relied on in the run game. Good athlete, tested pretty well. 3 years of starting with solid grades.
cons: Slow to break on routes when he sees it. Not very fluid, doesn’t swivel his hips fast.
take: NA
DL Jerrod Clark Costal Carolina 70
info: 28 pressures 4 sacks 22 tackles 74.9 RDEF 77 PRSH. 6’3 343 with 33 7/8 arms.
pros: Great build, he has great length and size at 340 pounds. Good anchor, can hold down the middle of a defense. Has a good bull rush.
cons: Slow off the ball, wont be much of a disruptive source. He put on 85 pounds in one year, it’s not all good weight for sure. Doesn’t have great hands, doesn’t extend and keep guys off him.
take: Clark is a big man that is hard to move and hard to stop. He’s 340 pounds (80 of it was gained in one year) so he’s a prototypical nose tackle, but he lost a lot of athleticism by doing that. He wont be a disruptive force from the middle but he can be a stout solid NT.
DL Cameron Young Mississippi St 70
info: 1 sack 18 pressures 69.1 RDEF 59.6 PRSH. 6’3 304 with 34 ½ arms.
pros: Good build, solid enough and long arms. Good at controlling 1v1 blocks with hands. Can hold up to doubles and keep his gap.
cons: Not much of an athlete. No pass rush to his game, not athletic enough.
take: NA
EDGE Mike Morris Michigan 70
info: 37 pressures 9 sacks 13 tackles 69.7 RDEF 86.6 PRSH. 6’5 275 with 33 1/2 arms.
pros: Young player with good size at 6’6 275. Powerful edge, he can set an edge and play a little bit inside. Has a bull rush and can’t be blocked with a TE or RB.
cons: Awful athlete for an edge, needs to become an interior DL. Only 725 career snaps, not very experienced. He will have a hard time against OT’s, power isn’t to that level and not an advanced rusher.
take: NA
EDGE Dylan Horton TCU 70
info: 48 pressures 10 sacks 31 tackles 74.6 RDEF 71.4 PRSH. 6’4 257 with 33 1/8 arms.
pros: Good power, can hold up to doubles. Good leverage, can put hands on guards and drive them back.
cons: Doesn’t have rush moves, just a power rusher. Not a good athlete, wont get the edge on any OT. No quickness to his game, counters and block shedding don’t happen fast.
take: NA
EDGE Ochaun Mathis Nebraska 70
info: 33 pressures 3 sacks 26 tackles 63.8 RDEG 77.6 PRSH. 6’5 250 with 35 ¼ arms.
pros: Great length, 35 inch arms and a good build. Has some nice pass rushes where he uses his length.
cons:  Not very strong, will have an issue trying to hold the edge. Not a very good athlete, he has no quickness to his game.
take: NA
EDGE Thomas Incoom Central Michigan 70
info: 43 pressures 11 sacks 39 tackles 87.6 RDEF 76.4 PRSH. 6’2 262 with 33 ¼ arms.
pros: 18 sacks over the last 2 seasons. High effort player with solid athleticism. Powerful in the run game, can hold his own.
cons: Not ideal length. Doesn’t have the next level burst to threaten speed in the NFL. Stays on blocks too long.
take: NA.
EDGE BJ Thompson Stephen F Austin 70
info: 30 pressures 5 sacks 15 tackles 61 RDEF 92.7 PRSH. 6’6 243 with 34 5/8 arms.
pros: Very long and a good athlete. Tested at an elite level.
cons: Very skinny, liability in the run game. Total project, has some moves but no power.
take: NA
LB Noah Sewell Oregon 70
info: 40 tackles 62.4 RDEF 70 TACK 73.5 PRSH 72.6 COV. 6'2 246 with 31 5/8 arms.
pros: Brother of Penei, athleticism runs in the family. 6’2 250, he’s got great size for the position. Immediately graded as a 70 for PFF in his true freshman 2020 season. Great at taking on blocks, can stand his ground and shed them easily. Solid pass rusher, has some edge moves and is a powerful blitzer. Strong athlete that plays hard, the tools are there for him to play in the NFL.
cons: Didn’t improve in PFF grade from 2020, stayed stagnant. Not the quickest LB, change of direction and acceleration are not his selling points. Doesn’t seem to have great instincts, he wont anticipate many plays and make the top end plays elite LBs make.
take: Sewell isn’t going to be a top pick like his brother but he’s a solid football player. He’s young and has great size with solid athleticism which teams will covet. He’s not the top end LB now because he doesn’t see the game the same way top end LBs do but if he gets there he’s a future pro bowl player.
LB Cam Jones Indiana 70
info: 37 tackles 89 RDEF 79.4 TACK 70 PRSH 56 COV. 6’1 226 with 31 ¼ arms.
pros: 3 time team captain. Good effort and recognition.
cons: Not a physical thumper in the run game. Missed many games his senior season.
take: NA
LB Micah Baskerville LSU 70
info: 69 tackles 74.2 RDEF 72.3 TACK 65.1 PRSH 64.2 COV. 6’1 2 221 with 31 ¼ arms
pros: Starter with over 2000 snaps in the SEC. Smart player, communicates to the defense pre snap. See’s the game well, reacts to plays fast.
cons: Doesn’t have ideal size in the low 220’s and not long. Doesn’t take blocks well, gets washed down the line easily. Strength and athleticism aren’t where they need to be to be a good NFL Backer.
take: NA
LB Ventrell Miller Florida 70
info: 64 tackles 74 RDEF 49.9 TACK 65.9 PRSH 56.6 COV. 6’0 232 with 32 ½ arms.
pros: Good at tacking on blockers and can stack and shed. Good IQ, sees the game well and reacts fast.
cons: Not a good athlete, has a tougher time changing direction. Liability in coverage, can’t match up.
take: NA
LB Jeremy Banks Tennessee 70
info: 40 tackles 0 INT 4 PBU 76.3 RDEF 65.4 TACK 64.8 PRSH 46.7 COV. 6’1 232 with 32 inch arms.
pros: Good size for the position and a good athletic profile. Good tackler, long and physical.
cons: Awful coverage grade. Doesn’t play in space that well, instincts aren’t there.
take: NA
OG Henry Bainivalu Washington 70
info: 2,233 snaps 65.9 RBLK 79.5 PBLK 13 pressures. 6’6 312 with 34 ¼ arms
pros: Has a good tackle build at guard. A lot of experience at RG. Solid athlete, can get to and play in space.
cons: Not the best strength, doesn’t move many guys. Can get beat bad by keeping his feet in the ground.
take: Bainivalu was a solid RG for Washington the last 3 years, he’s a good size and a solid athlete. He gets beat too badly too often to be a high draft pick, his strength and balance will limit him.
OT John Ojukwu Boise St 70
info: 3,588 snaps 69.6 RBLK 78.1 PBLK 14 pressures. 6’5 317 with 34 3/8 arms.
pros: Great build, long arms and good size. Improved every year. Has a solid anchor, can stop a bull rush if needed.
cons: Never played great in a lower level of competition than power 5. Foot work needs a lot of work. Plays with bad balance because a lack of technique.
take: Ojukwu looks like a great LT if you look at him pre game. Once the game starts you realize why he’s not a 1st round pick. He’s a project for sure, his balance is bad because his feet are bad, but if he learns he can be very good.
OT DJ Scaife Miami 70
info: 3,763 snaps 62.1 RBLK 80.5 PBLK 15 pressures. 6’3 321 with 33 5/8 arms.
pros: Good size at 320  with over 33 inch arms. 5 year starter with back to back solid seasons and a good freshman year. Good hands, can get on guys fast. Solid in pass pro, smooth and can mirror.
cons: Poor testing numbers. Lazy in the run game, needs to be more of a mauler.
take: NA.
QB Aidan O’Connell Purdue 70
info: 3,483 yards 22 TD 13 INT 63.7% 67.4 PASS 52 RUN.
pros: Solid size, 6’3 212. Had an incredible 2021, 90.0 PFF pass grade with a 7.8% BTT. Has decent zip on the ball, can fire it in to tight windows if needed.
cons: Dropped off in 2022, regressed back to pre 2021. His feet don’t set up to the target too much causing inaccurate passes. Makes some awful turnovers that are as bad as they get. Not much of an athlete, more like the statue QB of past.
take: O’Connell showed in 2021 that he could be an NFL starter with an unbelievable amount of big time throws. He is a solid build that has an NFL arm to go along with it. He did struggle with turnovers and bad accuracy at times which may limit his to be a career backup.
QB Jake Haener Fresno St 70
info: 2,900 yards 20 TD 3 INT 71.3% 86.2 PASS 70.2 RUN.
pros: Completed over 70 percent of his passes in 2022. Improved every year getting to an 87.9 PFF grade. Was very good in the senior bowl. Nice accuracy down the field especially on crossers. Good intangibles, coaches liked him and he’s tough.
cons: 6 foot 208, he’s not a big QB. 5th year senior that will be 24 and played at Fresno. Toesy when he throws, needs to work on that. Really bad under pressure throwing short routes, looks like he short arms it. Arm is middling for the NFL, not impressive velocity. Not much of an athlete, not going to add any thing in the run game.
take: Haener has backup written all over him, the physical ability is just not what you look for. He is accurate and smart though; he can run an offense as shown by the senior bowl. I can’t see him ever become a starter but a high end backup can be valuable.
RB SaRodorick Thompson Texas Tech 70
info: 138 attempts 682 yards 7 TDs 82.5 RUN.
pros: 5 years of solid production. Solid size and burst, 5’11 213 and has some shake to his game. He wants to get every yard he can, feet always moving to either make a defender miss or drive forward. Broke 42 tackles in 138 attempts in 2022.
cons: Never was the guys, highest yardage in a season is 763. Bone bruise at the end of 2022 in his ankle. Isn’t the fastest or the strongest back, will be a middling NFL athlete.
take: Thompson is a solid back that tics all the boxes, he’s big enough and athletic enough to play in the league. He runs hard and forces a lot of missed tackles and was top 20 in elusiveness rating. He was never the guy in college but he can certainly be a great 2 for a team.
RB Jordan Mims Fresno St 70
info: 260 carries 1,371 yards 18 TD 90.2 RUN.
pros: Hasn’t fumbled in 5 years, 500 straight carries with no fumbles. Good vision and patience, he finds the hole and sets blockers up well. Solid quickness, can cut well and make short area moves to find space.
cons: A tad undersized at 5’10 200. Old prospect, played his freshman year in 2017. Not much of a receiver, only 132 yards in 2022. Not the best tackle breaker, his size isn’t ideal for that. Not a top tier athlete, isn’t going to be showing off his speed and burst in the NFL.
take: Mims made some money by coming back to school, he racked up over 1000 yards and 18 TDs. He showed his ability to take advantage of his blocks and set them up to get every yard possible. Quickness is the physical attribute he will rely on and not strength or speed which isn’t ideal for a lead back. He is certainly good enough for the NFL and should make a roster.
RB Christopher Brooks BYU 70
info: 129 attempts 820 yards 6 TD 82.1 RUN.
pros: Never fumbled in his career. 6’1 235, he’s a hoss. Higher Elusiveness rating than Jahmyr Gibbs. Runs behind his pads, will fight for every yard.
cons: Never cracked 1000 yards and wasn’t the lead dog. Not many receiving opportunities. Not impressive cutting, high center of gravity.
take: Brooks is a tank of a power back, at 6 foot 235 he can push a pile at the goal line. He’s not going to do anything else but be a power back but he’s good at it.
RB Keaton Mitchell East Carolina 70
info: 201 carries 1,452 yards 14 TDs.
pros: Back to back 1,000 yard seasons with a PFF rush grade if 93.9. Forced 75 missed tackles in 2022 while rushing for 7.2 YPA. Good change of direction, low center of gravity makes cutting easy for him. Explosive athlete, can accelerate and run past defenders.
cons: Not a very good pass protector, he’s only 5’9 183. Level of competition is a concern. No strength to his game, never going to be a physically dominate RB.
take: Mitchell is an electric back with solid contact balance and good athleticism. His biggest knocks are his size and competition level which are real concerns. He should be able to be a returner or maybe even find himself as a change of pace back in the league.
S Demarcco Hellams Alabama 70
info: 84 tackle 1 INT 86.6 RDEF 84.2 TACK 66.4 COV. 6’1 203 with 31 arms.
pros: Good in the run game, fills his gap well and is a good tackler. See’s the game well, he is a solid safety.
cons: Not a great athlete, doesn’t move very well in space. Speed and change of direction hurt him in coverage.
take: NA
TE Noah Gindorff North Dakota St 70
info: 6 receptions 74 yards 1 TD.
pros: Big man at 6’6 268. Very good run blocker, has great power to his game. Solid possession receiver, has solid hands.
cons: Not a good athlete, not suddenness. Played against FCS competition. Career 524 yards, he wasn’t much of a receiver threat.
take: Gindorff is baby Michael Mayer, he’s a big strong blocker that can make the catches necessary. He’s not a very good athlete though, he will not be a plus receiver in the NFL. He could be a good TE2 for a team that excels in run blocking.
WR Dontayvion Wicks Virginia 70
info: 57 receptions 1,201 yards 9 TD 80.4 RECV.
pros: Good size at 6’2 212 and 32.75 inch arms and 10 inch hands. Had a 1,201 yard season in 2022 before the offense became a dumpster fire. Good patience in his releases. Good stop ability, can stop on a dime. Good underneath receiver, can run nice routes and find open holes in the zone.
cons: Massive drop off in 2022, 800 less receiving yards. Hands are a massive question, 23% drop rate in 2022. Not a high level athlete.
take: It may have just been the 2022 Virginia offense, but that year was terrible. He has an amazing 2021 season followed by the biggest disappointment in 2022. If he can return to pre 2022 form he will be a great value pick.
WR Ronnie Bell Michigan 70
info: Bell was an under recruited player out of Park Hill in Kansas City. He got an offer from Michigan and he jumped on it and it worked out for both sides. He appeared in 13 games as a true freshman and got 10 starts his sophomore year while being named Michigan’s Offensive Skill POY. his senior year was looking to be a big one after returning a punt 31 yards and scoring a 76 yard TD, unfortunately he tore his ACL in that game and it ended that season. He came back in 2021 and was named a team captain and caught 50 yards for 686 yards and 2 TDs.
pros: Played in both the slot and out wide. Michigan’s number 1 receiver. Solid routes, does some subtle things to get a bit of separation. NFL athlete, has the quickness and speed to be an NFL receiver.
cons: Awful contested catch rate at a career 20%. Torn ACL in 2021. Not the biggest receiver at 5’11 192. Didn’t see many press reps, may struggle with physicality. No trump card, doesn’t have great speed, strength or routes/production.
take: Bell is a very solid receiver, he was Michigans number one guy thanks to his solid overall ability. He runs solid routes and has the athleticism to add to the run after the catch. It’s tough to only see one top year of production and not be the ideal size though, he should be a good depth piece for a WR core.
WR Michael Jefferson Louisiana 70
info: 51 receptions 810 yards 7 TD 76.8 RECV.
pros: 6’4 202, he’s a tall receiver. Surprisingly quick for his size, has a nice release off the line. Good speed, can run past safeties. Was open a lot but his QB couldn’t hit him.
cons: Didn’t play in the power 5. Mostly a vertical player, not great underneath. Not very strong, he’s a little thin.
take: Jefferson is a really good receiver that played at a lower level of competition. He’s a real deep threat with his size and speed to threaten the defense. He should make a roster as a good back up and if he adds some strength he could end up being a great player.
WR Keylon Stokes Tulsa 70
info: 76 receptions 1,224 yards 8 TD 80.9 RECV.
pros: 2 1,000 yard season. Team captain. Good athlete, can get in and out of routes well.
cons: Played 6 years and was inconsistent. 5’10 198 he’s on the smaller side. 11% career drop percentage, too many drops. No catch radius. Slot only.
take: Stokes has a very good slot build, he’s a solid athlete with a stockier build so he can handle physicality. He played in a wide open offense in college so it will be different for him so he will need to run better routes and catch the ball better. He could end up being a nice slot option for a team.
WR Malik Heath Ole Miss 70
info: 52 receptions 834 yards 4 TD 74.1 RECV.
pros: Good size, 6’2 215. Good speed, can stack defenders vertically. Good body control, can work back to the ball.
cons: Only a vertical threat, ran hitches and go’s. One year of production.
take: Heaths size is a bit deceiving, he’s not a strong physical RAC receiver. He’s a vertical athlete that plays on the outside only right now. He has the traits to be good so he just needs to work on the rest of his game.
WR Jaray Jenkins LSU 70
info: 24 receptions 332 yards 5 TD 64.6 RECV.
pros: 6’1 200, solid size. Said to be a good locker room guy. Good ball skills, seems to stick to his hands. Good releases, can accelerate out of it.
cons: Never produced that much, his full career is a good year. Not a good athlete, he’s a very average athlete.
take: Jenkins never put up big numbers but he’s such a solid receiver. He plays the position like a pro, his releases are nice, he can catch everything and is a good locker room guy. His upside may not be the highest but he’s a good receiver.
WR Jalen Cropper Fresno St 70
info: 83 receptions 1,089 yards 5 TD 75 RECV.
pros: Back to back 80+ reception seasons. Solid drop rate, 6% in 2022. Good hands and body control. Good quickness, can stop and start very well.
cons: 5’11 171 with 29.75 inch arms and 8.5 inch hands, he’s a small receiver. Not a top end athlete like is needed for 171 pounds.
take: Cropper was a very good and productive receiver over the last two seasons. He has the ball skills and body control along with quickness to have a shot at being an NFL receiver. The issue is he’s 170 pounds and not overly athletic which would be needed at that size.
C Jacob Gall Baylor 69
info: 3,100 snaps 79 RBLK 78.3 PBLK 14 pressures. 6’2 296 with 31 1/8.
pros: Dominated at buffalo and played well at Baylor. Solid in the pass game and can reach well in the run game.
cons: Not the biggest or strongest center.
take: NA
C Grant Gibson NC St 69
info: 3,241 snaps 79.7 RBLK 77.3 PBLK 5 pressures. 6’1 307 with 31 ¾ arms.
pros: 4 year starter with 2 season of high level play 78 PFF grades. Strong hands that are like vice grips. Strong base, can anchor and move guys. Team captain.
cons: Not a big or long center, size is an issue. Poor at blocking in space. Lunges too much.
take: NA
C Jake Andrews Troy 69
info: 2,796 snaps 77.1 RBLK 56.5 PBLK 19 pressures. 6’3 319 with 32 ¼ arms
pros: Can play all 3 interior positions. Good hand usage, refits hands and good placement. Solid size, thick build that wont get run over.
cons: Doesn’t have any athleticism, his feet move very slow and it hurts in pass pro. He won’t move anyone off the ball, he doesn’t come off the ball well to drive NT back.
take: Andrews is a thick center that has played a lot of football in the interior OL. He’s a low ceiling guy because his athleticism and power are not NFL level but he’s played solid. He should be signed to see if he can be a good backup for the interior OL for a team.
CB Jay Ward LSU 69
info: 1 INT 2 PBU 27/41 283 yards 44.9 TACK 53.6 COV. 6’1 188 with 32 ½ arms.
pros: Solid size at 31 with over 32 inch arms. Special teams pro, he is tough and has 2 blocked kicks. Plays hards and plays with good movement skills.
cons: Wasn’t a full time player for LSU, nickel corner/safety. 7 penalties in 2022. Tough time tackling with his size.
take: NA
CB Alex Austin Oregon St 69
info: 2 INT 6 PBU 42/69 529 yards 65.8 TACK 71.8 COV. 6’1 195 with 31 7/8 arms.
pros: Good size and length. Good in zone coverage passing routes and covering concepts.
cons: Not the best athlete, doesn’t move very well.
take: NA
DL DJ Dale Alabama 69
info: 14 pressures 3 sacks 13 tackles 75.4 RDEF 79 PRSH. 6’1 302 with 32 ½ arms.
pros: Broke out in 2022, jumped from a 63 to 80 grade. Solid athlete with a high motor, fight to get past blocks. Solid run defending ability, has good leverage and hands to hold his gap.
cons: Not the longest DL, 6’1 and shorter arms. Was a part time player each year, never a starter. Needs to add a bit of mass to hold in the run game with the lack of length. Not much of a real pass rush, more of a high motor rush.
take: Dale is an undersized DL that wasn’t a starter at Alabama. He’s still a solid DL, he has good hand placement and plays hard to allow him to succeed in the SEC. He can be a solid rotational DL in the league.
EDGE Shaka Heyward Duke 69
info: 67 tackles 68 RDEF 79.1 TACK 63.1 PRSH 77 COV. 6’3 235 with 34 arms.
pros: Great size, 6’3 235 with long arms. Good tackler, long arms make it hand to get away. Solid athlete, moves smooth in space.
cons: Not a great instinctive player, he sits and waits a little too much. Not a thumper, wont stack offensive lineman.
take: NA
EDGE Ali Gaye LSU 69
info: 18 pressures 2 sacks 24 tackles 68 RDEF 61.8 PRSH. 6’6 263 with 33 5/8 arms.
pros: Solid size, has the build of an NFL EDGE. Powerful edge, can play the run well and take on pullers. Good at run stunts.
cons: Not a great athlete, no quickness to his game and is only ok off the ball. No pass rush plan, he runs right into lineman. No flexibility wont be able to get to the edge.
take: Gaye has the build to play edge in the NFL that’s for sure. He’s a big strong edge that can play the run well. His pass rushing needs a lot of work though, he’s a non flexible average athlete which is going to hurt his development.
EDGE Lonnie Phelps Kansas 69
info: 34 pressures 8 sacks 40 tackles 70 RDEF 83.1 PRSH. 6’2 244 with 32 3/8
pros: Tested well at combine 4.55 with 31 reps. Verry aggressive attacking blockers, refuses to lose the interaction. Good burst and strength, will deliver blows to the offense.
cons: Not long, 6’2 with 32 inch arms. Has no pass rush moves, doesn’t win with hands.
take: NA
EDGE Isaiah Land Florida A&M 69
info: 35 pressures 7 sacks 15 tackles 71.7 RDEF 79.7 PRSH. 6’4 236 with 32 1/2 arms.
pros: 19 sacks in 2021. Good athlete that dominated the level of competition he was at. Had good counters when rushing.
cons: Undersized EDGE that played at the FCS level. May be a pass rush only.
take: NA
LB Dee Winters TCU 69
info: 65 tackles 59.9 RDEF 62.6 TACK 61.2 PRSH 57.4 COV. 5’11 227 with 31 5/8 arms.
pros: Solid athlete that was the MLB on a top 4 team and a team captain. Solid at shooting gaps to make plays in the backfield. Good short area burst to close in on a tackle.
cons: Small build for a LB, sub 230 and under 5’11. Wont beat many blocks, gets eaten up by OL. Not very fluid in coverage.
take: NA
LB Mohamoud Diabate Utah 69
info: 38 tackles 69.8 RDEF 52.5 TACK 83.9 PRSH 42.4 COV. 6’4 229 with 32 1/8 arms.
pros: Good length and athleticism and young.
cons: Tough coverage grades. Play speed doesn’t match testing. Not good change of direction.
take: NA
LB Aubrey Miller Jackson St 69
info: 67 tackles 71 RDEF 62.5 TACK 71.2 PRSH 91.8 COV. 6’2 229 with 30 ½ arms.
pros: Played very well in coverage.
cons: short arms and a tad light. Played in the FCS.
take: NA
LB Seth Benson Iowa 69
info: 73 tackles 1 INT 86 RDEF 79.2 TACK 78 COV. 6’0 231 with 31 ½ arms.
pros: Good college grading and plays true LB. Plays the run well, see’s the run develop and attacks the blockers.
cons: Nothing special physically about him, average testing and size. Not very good in space, a little clunky movement skills.
take: NA
OG Spencer Anderson Maryland 69
info: 2,379 snaps 55.1 RBLK 79.8 PBLK 15 pressures. 6’5 305 with 32 ¾.
pros: Has solid athleticism to be able to reach DL and get to backers. Smooth in pass pro, doesn’t get too off balance.
cons: No special to his game, not high end at anything.
take: Anderson won’t pop off the screen when you watch him and that’s good and bad. He’s a solid run and pass blocker but he wont dominate anyone especially in the NFL. He can be a great NFL backup that you can win games with.
OG Tashawn Manning Kentucky 69
info: 1,878 snaps 68.6 RBLK 77.6 PBLK 11 pressures. 6’4 330.
pros: Big man, good guard build. Overcame cancer in 2016. Good power and anchor.
cons: Transferred from Auburn so he could start. Sloppy feet and hand usage. Not much of an athlete.
take: If you saw Mannings weight it would tell you all you need to know. He’s a pure gap scheme guy with the ability to move people and anchor in pass pro. He’s carrying some bad weight so he’s not the most fleet of foot. If he gets in better shape and cleans up his technique he could be a good guard.
OG Brandon Kipper Oregon St 69
info: 3,199 snaps 77 RBLK 67.8 PBLK 15 pressures. 6’5 318 with 33 5/8 arms.
pros: Solid size and a lot of experience. Fires off the ball very well.
cons: Only 16 bench reps. Not  great people mover.
take: NA
OT Richard Gouraige Florida 69
info: 2,941 snaps 65.7 RBLK 78.9 PBLK 14 pressures. 6’5 308 with 34 arms.
pros: Good build for a tackle, 6’5 310 with 34 inch arms. 4 years of starting experience that got better every year. Decent technique, feet are set well and throws hands well.
cons: Bad overall athlete, he bends at the waist and loses balance. Slow feet that has an issue trying to mirror edge rushers.
take: Gouraige is an experienced tackle with a good build and decent technique. That makes him sound like a sure fire player to draft but he is so slow and un athletic that he may never get to the point where he can play in the NFL.
OT Warren McClendon Georgia 69
info: 2,215 snaps 64.3 RBLK 82.1 PBLK 8 pressures. 6’4 190 with 34 arms.
pros: Decent length with 34 inch arms. Moves well for an offensive lineman. 3 year starter for the 2 time national championship Bull Dogs.
cons: Sub 300 pounds, he has a slight frame. Really rough technique, his feet and hands are ugly in pass pro. Bad balance, lunges way too often.
take: McClendon has accomplished a lot in his career with Georgia, helping anchor a stout national championship OL. He has the experience and PFF grades to give you hope, but his tape doesn’t match the grade. He’s rough with his technique and balance which will lead to no NFL success unless he fixes those issues.
OT Alex Palczewski Illinois 69
info: 4,390 snaps 79.8 RBLK 81.8 PBLK 11 pressures. 6’6 314 with 33 3/8 arm.
pros: Unreal amount of starting experience, he was a 6 year starter with over 4,000 snaps. Graded above 70 in his last 5 seasons. Solid feet, doesn’t lose his base easily.
cons: Older prospect, has played 6 seasons in college. Holds heavily, his hands will hug the defender in pass pro. Plays extremely high.
take: Palczewski has an absurd amount of snaps, over 400 in his career and understands a lot of football. He’s got good feet but the other physical parts of his game aren’t great. He holds every time he gets hands on and he plays ridiculously high which wont work.
OT Raiquon Oneal UCLA 69
info: 2,430 snaps 19 pressures 73.8 RBLK 77.6 PBLK. 6’4 305.
pros: Good athlete in the run game, can reach guys well. Solid anchor, good weight to him to stop bulls.
cons: Off balance way too much, needs to be better there. Bad hands, doesn’t control blocks.
take: NA
OT Ryan Swoboda UCF 69
info: 2,918 snaps 73.5 RBLK 82.6 PBLK 22 pressures. 6’9 309 with 34 5/8 arms.
pros: Solid testing number and length. Good in pass pro, smooth and solid hands.
cons: Very high cut tackle. Not a strong tackle, not a people mover.
take: NA
OT Cooper Hodges Appalachian St 69
info: 3,510 snaps 87.3 RBLK 78.4 PBLK 8 pressures. 6’4 304 with 33 inch arms.
pros: 4 years of good to great grading. Solid hand usage and movement skills.
cons: On the weaker side, struggles moving people and handling inside counters.
take: NA
QB Tanner Morgan Minnesota 69
info: 1,382 yards 9 TD 5 INT 66% 86.5 PASS 78 RUN.
pros: His final year he had a 90.4 PFF grade. Career 9,449 yards and 5 years with starts. Amazing feet, best I’ve seen in the class. Throws with stellar anticipation. Accurate and precise, can put the ball anywhere. Has some mobility to his game.
cons: Got benched his senior year, not sure why but he was. He’s not a big QB at 6 foot 205. Career more TWP than BTT. His arm is below NFL standards.
take: I’m putting my stamp of approval on Morgan, he has some of my favorite film to watch. His technique is outstanding and he understands the game and anticipates at a high level. If he had an NFL average arm he would be a first round pick. He has great backup written all over him and that can be very valuable.
QB Matthew McKay Elon 69
info: 2,710 yards 21 TD 4 INT 60.5% 87.2 PASS.
pros: Played at NC state before. Solid size and athlete combo, 6’4 212 and can run. Has effortless arm talent, a quick flick can be 55 yards.
cons: Only played well in the FCS. Accuracy underneath is questionable. His touch passes aren’t pretty. One read then scramble. Throws it toesy too much.
take: Mckay is a talented QB with a strong arm and effortless velocity. He’s also got size and athleticism to go with it. He’s not refined for sure, he’s got mechanical issues and isn’t a great processor. If he gets coached up he could play in the NFL.
QB Lindsey Scott Incarnate Word 69
info: 4,681 yards 59 TD 8 INT 70% 92 PASS.
pros: His stats are wild, unbelievably good. 3 straight years grading above 88.5. Has a solid arm and is good in the quick game. Good athlete, can scramble to buy time and run the ball.
cons: 5’11, he’s a very short QB. Has a tendency to throw behind the receiver. Played his worst game in the Playoffs against the best comp, not seeing open guys. Struggled mostly over the middle of the field.
take: Scott was incredibly productive in 2022, he was arguably the best QB in CFB. He’s a good athlete with a solid arm and flashes of great accuracy. He’s just too short and played in the FCS so he can’t get drafted high. He struggles over the middle like one would expect for a sub 6 foot QB but he plays a little like Russell Wilson.
QB Adrian Martinez Kansas St 69
info: 1,258 yards 6 TD 1 INT 65% 69 pass 87 run. 6’3 225.
pros: 5 year starter with 9000 career passing yards. Amazing runner, true long speed and a power run threat.
cons: Arm is questionable, strength and accuracy aren’t where they need to be. Not a real QB, all good throws aren’t in structure.
take: NA
QB Malik Cunningham Louisville 69
info: Cunningham was a 3 star recruit coming out of Park Crossing HS in Alabama where he drew intrest from a few top SEC teams befor deciding to go with Louisville. He redshirted in 2017 before getting 3 starts his red shirt freshman season in 2018 where he ran for more yards than he threw. He was the full time starter from 2019 on where he always put up some impressive numbers. between 2019 and 2021 he threw for 7,600 yards and 61 TDs and also added 2,500 rush yards as well. That 2021 season was truly impressive, he received a 91 PFF grade and passed for about 3000 yards and over 1000 rush yards. 2022 was supposed to be the year where he put himself in the top of the draft conversation but he fell short of that oly throwing for 1,567 yards and 8 TDs and 5 INTs.
pros: Running back like skills at the QB spot, on 108 attempts in 2021 he forced 51 missed tackles. Good at throwing on the run, pretty good when he escapes the pocket. Good base and throwing motion, does a good job in the pocket with his technique. Very shifty, can make LBs miss in space easily.
cons: Arm strength is mediocre, not going to look good on an NFL field. Pocket presence is not good, a lot of drifting and trying to create with his legs. Doesn't throw into windows well, not sure he trusts his arm.
take: Cunningham is a very good athlete and has put up a great season in college. But, he's a little inconsistent threw the air and doesn't have the arm to be a high end starter.
QB Clayton Tune Houston 69
info: 4,065 yards 40 TD 10 INT 67.1% 91.3 PASS 72.9 RUN.
pros: Decent size at 6’2 216. Back-to-back 91 PFF grades with a career 11,973 passing yards. Production is there, he played well in the AAC and lead Houston to a lot of wins. Has the ability to move in the pocket and get out of sacks.
cons: Played at Houston, not the highest level competition and he had a star receiver in Tank Dell. Doesn’t have that strong of an arm, really has to put a lot behind a pass to get zip.
take: Tune had a great college career with many highlights in the 5 years. He just lacks the NFL ability, his arm is ok and so is his athleticism. He may be able to compete for a backup spot but being a starter is a reach.
RB Khalan Laborn Marshall 69
info: 303 carries 1,535 yards 15 TD 84.4 RUN.
pros: Former 5 star with good size, 5’10 210. Good athlete, cuts hard and accelerates well. Runs very hard, trys to get every yard.
cons: Was dismissed from Florida State. Didn’t play for 2 years and only had one productive year. Bad vision, not patient and doesn’t see the blocks well. Not very balanced, doesn’t run through tackles well and can slip too much on cuts.
take: Laborn is a great athlete that runs hard every play. He showed against good competition he can’t run through tackles like you would like and his balance is mediocre. The former 5 star could make a roster though with his physical ability.
RB Jarveon Howard Alcorn St 69
info: 250 carries 1,239 yards 12 TD 77.1 RUN.
pros: 68 MTF in 2022. Got better every year and dominated the first year he got a shot. Runs hard with very good contact balance. Good burst, he explodes into contact and through the line.
cons: Couldn’t get on the field at Syracuse. Not a top tier athlete, he doesn’t have the great agility or top speed. Questionable vision, doesn’t look to set up blockers and give them time to set up.
take: Howard was a top back in the SWAC this year, getting 1,239 yards and 68 MTF. He’s a tackle breaker that runs angry and with good contact balance. He’s not the level of athlete to be drafted high or the vision to be an RB one, but he has a shot of making the roster as the 3rd back.
RB Ronnie Brown Shepherd 69
info: 219 carries 1863 yards 19 TDs. 5’10 192 with 30 1/8 arms and 8 ½ hands.
pros: Student of the game. Was a very productive work horse. Tested well running a 4.46 with a 4.00 shuttle and a 6.89 3 cone jumping 37 inches. Good speed and can cut and change directions well.
cons: Smaller back at 192. Played at a D2 school, massive talent drop off.
take: NA
S Trey Dean Florida 69
info: 63 tackles 0 INT 69.8 RDEF 66.8 TACK 63.7 COV. 6’2 200 31 ¾ arms.
pros: Good size, can play in the box and deep. Can guard TE’s in the slot. Can come down hill and tackle well.
cons: Tested poorly. Not much of a deep safety, range and instincts are unknown.
take: NA
S Jonathan Sutherland Penn St 69
info: 29 tackles 0 INT 68.8 RDEF 72.8 TACK 66.3 COV. 5’11 202 with 30 3/8 arms.
pros: Solid testing and size for special teams. Team captain.
cons: Not a good actual defender, 1 year of half starting.
take: NA
TE Brayden Willis Oklahoma 69
info: 39 receptions 503 yards 7 TD 63.6 RECV 71.7 RBLK.
pros: Very good with the ball in his hands, 14 MTF on 39 receptions. 500 yards in 2022, good production. Good athlete, he can block in space and be a plus vertical threat.
cons: Undersized, at 6’3 239 he doesn’t have the prototypical size. Questionable hands, a few too many drops. Played in a very spread heavy Oklahoma offense. Strength is below average, needs to add muscle to his frame.
take: Willis is an undersized athletic TE that was a good receiver for Oklahoma. He played in a very spread heavy offense so he will need to adjust to the NFL style of inline blocking. If he adds strength and can acclimate to play inline TE he could be a good NFL TE.
TE Davis Allen Clemson 69
info: 39 receptions 443 yards 5 TD 71 RECV 69 RBLK.
pros: Solid build at 6’5 246. Very solid hands, 1 drop in 2023 and a 91% contested catch rate.
cons: Weak in the run game, doesn’t have much strength to his game. Not a plus runner after the catch. Not the best athlete, doesn’t move well in space. Doesn’t separate in routes, not quick out of his breaks. Most of his receptions are just little flat routes.
take: Allen is an average TE with very good hands. He’s a little slim and that shows in his run game strength but he doesn’t have the athleticism to make him a dangerous receiving threat. He does check all the boxes to play TE in the NFL so he should get a shot to be TE3 somewhere.
TE Will Mallory Miami 69
info: 42 receptions 542 yards 3 TD 78 RECV 36.6 RBLK.
pros: Solid athlete, can stretch the field vertically.
cons: 6’4 239, he is undersized for a TE. Too many drops and doesn’t make contested catches. Bad run blocker, has no strength.
take: Mallory is a vertical threat with solid athleticism. The issue is he has little to no strength and can’t block. He also has questionable hands so he isn’t going to be a reliable TE.
WR Trea Shopshire UAB 69
info: 41 receptions 923 yards 6 TD 83.4 RECV.
pros: Improved each year and finished his career with a good season. Good in contested catch situations. Averaged a career 23 YPC. 6’3, he’s got good length. Burner, so fast.
cons: 195 pounds, he’s a slim receiver that struggles with physicality. Played at UAB against lower level competition. Not a good route runner, no suddenness.
take: Shopshire may run a 4.3, his strides are so long and he stretches a defense so much with his speed height and contested catch ability. He’s a deep threat only so he won’t become a number one ever, but if you want somone to run straight he is your guy.
WR Jason Brownlee Southern Miss 69
info: 52 receptions 819 yards 7 TD 77.3 RECV.
pros: Good size at 6’2 202. 5% drop rate, pretty good hands. Good body control and ball skills. Solid route runner, gets off the line well and does subtle things to stack and separate.
cons: Played at Southern Miss. Not a good athlete, the speed is alright and break out of his routes are ok.
take: Brownlee wont impress anyone physically. He is a long smooth athlete that can run nice routes and make a play on the ball. He should be able to add depth to a receiving core.
WR Elijah Cooks San Jose St 69
info: 70 receptions 1,086 yards 10 TD 83.6 RECV.
pros: Had 2 900+ yards seasons with a great 2022 season. Good contested catch guy, he has good ball skills and body control. 6’3 210 good size.
cons: Old prospect, has been playing since 2017. Not the best athlete, isn’t very quick.
take: Cooks was playing against some low level competition but he dominated them. In 2022 he showed off his contested catch ability and his excellent body control. The ability to make a play on the ball will be his calling card, if he can add some strength and continue making plays he will make it in the league.
WR Jalen Wayne South Alabama 69
info: 57 receptions 812 yards 9 TD 69.5 RECV.
pros: Good size, 6’1 211. Solid straight speed, can win down the field.
cons: 6th year player that had 1.5 solid seasons. Not much of an underneath receiver, he doesn’t have suddenness or good routes.
take: Wayne is a good sized athlete that threatens down the field. He became a full time WR later in college and it shows because his routes underneath need work. If he develops in practice at the NFL he could be a nice piece for a teams receiving core.
WR Mitchell Tinsley Penn St 69
info: 51 receptions 577 yards 5 TD 67.2 RECV.
pros: Dominated at western Kentucky, 1,400 yards. 4.8 career drop rate, solid hands. Good route runner, know what to do on every route.
cons: He’s an Average athlete, wont run past defenders. Not a physical receiver, he doesn’t play through contact well.
take: Tinsley screams good NFL backup, he doesn’t have the best catch radius, athleticism and size but he’s a solid player. He’s got reliable hands and good routes which makes him a trustworthy receiver.
WR Sam James West Virginia 69
info: 46 receptions 745 yards 6 TD 67.5 RECV. 6’0 176.
pros: Solid athlete, has the speed and shake to play in the NFL. Lead the team in receiving, pretty good at getting open with routes.
cons: Super thin receiver, should add some weight. 11% drop rate, needs better hands. His stop routes take too long, doesn’t sink his hips well.
take: NA
C Alan Ali TCU 68
info: 4,079 snaps 62.6 RBLK 69.6 PBLK 24 pressures. 6’4 300.
pros: 5 year starter with over 4000 snaps. Has taken snaps at all 5 positions on the OL. Smart player that can pick up stunts and get off his combo blocks.
cons: Doesn’t have the traits you want in the NFL, power and athleticism are mediocre. Feet aren’t fast, cant reach someone far away. Can get bull rushed too easy.
take: Ali is an experienced versatile lineman which has the makings of a good backup. He doesn’t have the physical ability you want in a prospect, he’s not an athlete and isn’t very strong but he is smart.
C Brett Neilon USC 68
info: 3,070 snaps 89.9 RBLK 90.5 PBLK 8 pressures. 6’2 286 with 30 ¾ arms.
pros: back to back great years of grading, 90.2 in 2022. Good at blocking in space, can latch on to backers. Good at cut off blocks.
cons: Too small, probably can’t play in the league. Achilles injury in his final game.
take: NA
C LaQuinston Sharp Mississippi St 68
info: 2,515 snaps 61.4 RBLK 77.8 PBLK. 6’2 302 with 31 ½ arms.
pros: Had a pretty good 2021 season. Good hand usage and has some solid reps with power.
cons: Poor testing numbers and on the small side. Anchor is average at bet and has poor foot speed.
take: NA
CB Myles Brooks Louisiana Tech 68
info: 3 INT 9 PBU 20/53 219 yards 48.8 TACK 77.1 COV. 6’1 201 with 30 ¾ arm.
pros: Good frame, 6 foot 200. Good at playing the ball.
cons: One year of FBS play. Struggles at tacking, 23% miss rate. Awful change of direction drills.
take: NA
EDGE Tavius Robinson Ole Miss 68
info: 40 pressures 8 sacks 17 tackles 61.9 RDEF 73.8 PRSH. 6’6 257 with 33 ¾ arms.
pros: Great length and size, plays with good separation. Has a solid speed to power move.
cons: Will get absolutely blown off the ball, not aggressive. No lateral mobility, very linear athlete. Doesn’t shed blocks well or have any pass rush moves.
take: NA
EDGE MJ Anderson Iowa St 68
info: 19 pressures 4 sacks 24 tackles 75.8 RDEF 72.8 PRSH. 6’3 270 with 33 ¾ arms.
pros: Stocky build, can hold the edge well and has solid length. Can hold his gap well with good hands and strength.
cons: Only started 5 games in his career. No pass rush moves, just a strong bull rush. Not a very good athlete doesn’t move well.
take: NA
EDGE Andre Jones Louisiana 68
info: 32 pressures 7 sacks 31 tackles 72.2 RDEF 76.7 PRSH. 6’5 248 with 34 ¼ arms.
pros: Good build for an edge. Good acceleration, can track down a ball carrier.
cons: 6th year player. Not the strongest player, can get moved and not set a hard edge.
take: NA
EDGE Tyrus Wheat Mississippi St 68
info: 38 pressures 8 sacks 31 tackles 70.4 RDEF 64.5 PRSH. 6’2 263 with 32 7/8.
pros: Played all over the place, versatile edge player that can drop into coverage. Solid size and athleticism combo. Can show off a solid bull rush.
cons: Not the best length. Not the best edge player, doesn’t set an edge hard. Not much of an actual pass rusher.
take: NA
EDGE Habakkuk Baldonado Pitt 68
info: 24 pressures 2 sacks 10 tackles 75.3 RDEF 69.6 PRSH. 6’4 251 with 33 arms.
pros: Had a good 2021 year with 11 sacks. Good hands, keep guys off of him and can shed.
cons: Not very strong, wont move any OL back to disrupt the play. Not a good athlete, wont fly off the ball.
take: NA
EDGE Ikenna Enechukwu Rice 68
info: 31 pressures 4 sacks 21 tackles 73.5 RDEF 75.6 PRSH. 6’4 264 with 33 5/8 arms.
pros: Good size. Solid strength and heavy hands.
cons: Only a linear athlete, not quickness to his game. Didn’t rush with a pass rush plan.
take: NA
EDGE Durell Nchami Maryland 68
info: 19 pressures 3 sacks 17 tackles. 6’4 260.
pros: Solid size. Strong edge setter. Stout in the run game, good power.
cons: Not an NFL athlete, cant turn the corner or run with anyone.
take: NA
LB Charlie Thomas Georgia Tech 68
info: 92 tackles 58.8 RDEF 75.8 TACK 75.6 PRSH 70.1 COV. 6’3 216 with 31 1/2 arms.
pros: Good athlete, great testing. Very good at tackling, good athlete and doesn’t miss many.
cons: Very light at 6’3. Can’t play inside backer at the next level.
take: NA
LB Amari Burney Florida 68
info: 65 tackles 2 INT 2 PBU 60.6 RDEF 74.7 TACK 87.4 PRSH 43 COV. 6’2 230 with 31 ¾ arms.
pros: Good athlete with solid size, 4.51 4.20 and 7. Experienced 5 year SEC player.
cons: Bad coverage grades and never graded that well. Poor in run defense, will get bullied in the box. Slow to react to plays.
take: NA
OG Marcus Minor Pitt 68
info: 2,783 snaps 74.4 RBLK 69.6 PBKK 18 pressures. 6’4 310 with 33 1/2 arms.
pros: Solid size and a lot of experience. Solid power, can hove guys in double teams.
cons: Couldn’t become a full time starter at Maryland. Poor mover, slow feet and sluggish in space.
take: NA
OG Jaylon Thomas SMU 68
info: 3,585 snaps 71.8 RBLK 89 PBLK 6 pressures. 6’3 304 with 31 7/8 arms.
pros: Runs fast, 4.95. Very versatile, started at all the positions. Smooth pass sets and good in space. Solid pass blocker overall.
cons: Poor agility numbers at pro day. On the small side at sub 310 and 32 inch arms. Lets guys get into his chest too much. Not a people mover.
take: NA
OG Samuel Jackson UCF 68
info: 3,630 yards 64.4 RBLK 82.5 PBLK 14 pressures. 6’5 323 with 33 ¼ arms.
pros: Great size, solid power and length.
cons: Rough movement skills.
take: NA
OG Chuck Filiaga Minnesota 68
info: 1,525 snaps 72.3 RBLK 75.1 PBLK 8 pressures. 6’6 321 with 34 ½ arms.
pros: Solid testing and good size.
cons: Big time waist bender.
take: NA
OG Josh Lugg Notre Dame 68
info: 2,497 snaps 71.7 RBLK 75.3 PBLK 12 pressures. 6’6 314 with 31 4/8 arms.
pros: Notre Dame OL.
cons: Bad 3 cone. Feet are bad, stationary on contact.
take: NA
OG Caleb Chandler Louisville 68
info: 3,404 snaps 88.9 RBLK 86 PBLK 11 pressures. 6’3 299.
pros: 87 PFF grade in 2021. Solid athlete and very experienced.
cons: Shoulder injury in 2022. Plays off balance.
take: NA
OT Ryan Hayes Michigan 68
info: 2,114 snaps 72.1 RBLK 76.9 PBLK 11 pressures. 6’6 305 with 32 ¾ arms
pros: Solid experience, played LT for Michigan over the last 2 years. Solid strength, can move people in the run game.
cons: Bad build, 6’6 305 with 32 inch arms, he’s tall with no length or size. Slow feet that can get beat with speed. Not flexible, a bit of a waist bender.
take: Hayes had a solid college career, being the 2 year starter at LT for Michigan and played pretty well. In the NFL he will struggle because of his physical limitations, he’s not long and not a plus athlete. He will fight to be a backup tackle in the league.
OT Dalton Wagner Arkansas 68
info: 2,788 snaps 76.6 RBLK 78.2 PBLK 21 pressures. 6’8 321 with 34 arms.
pros: Has solid power, can move guys when he gets hands on. Good size.
cons: Waist bender, has issues with balance and movement skills. Can’t handle any speed, his feet are slow.
take: Wagner is a big strong RT that was a solid player in the SEC. He’s not an athlete though, his feet are stuck in mud and he can’t handle speed.
OT Earl Bostick Kansas 68
info: 2,267 snaps 53.1 RBLK 72.4 PBLK 16 pressures. 6’6 311 with 33 5/8 arms.
pros: Solid tackle build. Solid athlete, can move in space and reach guys. Decent pad level in pass pro, can bend.
cons: Graded below a 60 in 2022 and 2021. No power at impact, will struggle anchoring and definitely in the run game.
take: Bostick has the size and athleticism to make it in the NFL, the tools are there. He struggled a little in college especially in the run game where he can’t create movement.
OT Quinton Barrow Grand Valley St 68
info: 6’5 322 with 34 ¼ arms.
pros: Great size.
cons: Played a lower level of competition. Not much film on him.
take: I couldn’t find much film on him but he’s got great size and should get a shot.
OT Silas Dzansi Virginia Tech 68
info: 2,275 snaps 63.6 RBLK 61.1 PBLK 23 pressures. 6’5 323 with 35 ½ inch arms.
pros: Great build for a tackle.
cons: Didn’t grade well.
take: NA
QB Chase Brice Appalachain St 68
info: 2,922 yards 27 TD 6 INT 74.9 PASS.
pros: Played for 3 teams in 5 years, he has experience. Good size, 6’2 237. Shows very good touch and accuracy down the field. Can play in and out of rhythm, good feet in the pocket and good arm talent off platform.
cons: Never played that well, his best years were as a backup at Clemson. Lack of college production and success.
take: Brice looked really good his last year at App State. He’s a Strong QB with some mobility and a solid arm. He can do everything you ask of him but he never really became the guy. His college career was him going from program to program and never being a top QB in the nation.
QB Dorian Thompson-Robinson UCLA 68
info: 3,159 yards 27 TD 10 INT 69.3% 68.6 PASS 73.7 RUN.
pros: Has over 10,000 career pass yards, has been playing for a while. Very good athlete, he can add to the run game. Good throwing on the run and off platform, he can make accurate throws with no base. Great pocket movement, very quick.
cons: 5th year senior that is 6’1 191. Longish inefficient release. Puts the ball in harms way too many times, doesn’t respect safeties range.
take: Thompson-Robinson is a very experienced QB with some eye opening tools. He has a solid arm to pair with great athleticism. He’s on the smaller side and struggled with decision making which is not a good combo, but he could be a very good backup.
QB Fred Payton Mercer 68
info: 3,037 yards 32 TD 8 INT 67% 93.1 PASS.
pros: 93.1 Pass grade and didn’t throw a pick through week 6. Very accurate, he knows where to put the ball to put it out of harms way. Solid movement skills to get out of the pocket.
cons: Not the strongest arm, needs to have a clean base to throw from. Off platform accuracy isn’t there, too inaccurate.
take: Payton is a nice surprise, he’s a very solid QB with ok size and athleticism but great accuracy and IQ. If his arm were up to NFL standards he would be a mid round pick but it’s just not NFL average.
QB Max Duggan TCU 68
info: Duggan was the Gatorade player of the year in Iowa and was the top QB in the state of Iowa in 2018. He had interest from a lot of big time programs like ND and OSU but chose to go to up and coming TCU to lead the horned frogs to new heights. He did just that, he has always battled through injuries but started all 4 years of his career and always played solid football. He improved his grade from a 67 to 79 to 76 all the way to 85.6 as a senior. That final year he lead TCU to its first College football playoff and was named a Heisman Finalist for his efforts. He threw for 3,320 yards 30 TDs and 4 INTs along with over 500 yards rushing.
pros: Very willing runner, not scared of contact or to make a play. He’s got grit, went through a lot of medical problems but still kept pushing through. Decent arm/size combination, he wont look out of place on an NFL field. Can throw well from multiple arm angles and is a playmaker.
cons: Wasn’t the week 1 starter, never was the guy coming into the season. Not as accurate as you would like, misses too many open throws. A lot of big 12 plays where he has a lot of time and cant find open receivers early. Doesn’t trust his arm enough, multiple NFL open throws he passes up.
take: Duggan is a great college QB that you cant help but root for. He’s got the grit you look for and can will a team to victory if needed. He’s not very accurate though and his physical ability isn’t much to fall back on if you want him to be a franchise guy. He can stick around the NFL a while as a high end back up, he’s a version of Taylor Heinike.
QB Tommy Devito Illinois 68
info: 2,643 yards 15 TD 4 INT 69.4% 81.6 PASS
pros: Played at Syracuse. Has over 10 inch hands. Played well as soon as he left cuse. Has decent arm talent, best looking passer at Cuse in a while. Has the athleticism to play on the move and scramble.
cons: 6’1 206, not ideal size. Got benched for Garrett Shrader. Scared of getting hit, breaks down when pressure is there.
take: Devito is a solid QB but he doesn’t do anything great. He’s a middle of the road athlete with average size and arm strength with one full year starting. He’s got the tools to play in the league but he’s never going to be a plus QB in the league.
QB Sean Clifford Penn St 68
info: 2,822 yards 24 TD 7 INT 64.4% 80.1 PASS.
pros: 4 year starter at a top program and got better over the years. Solid size with a good quick release. Has some mobility to his game.
cons: Never broke out and became a top QB in the nation. He is older than me, he will be 25 day 1 in the NFL. Accuracy is just fine and he doesn’t have great power on his throws.
take: Clifford is an accomplished QB with a lot of experience. He isn’t great in one area though, he’s a solid athlete with a decent arm but not what you want in the NFL. He may be able to stick around as a backup with his high character but talent wise he’s not there.
QB James Blackman Arkansas St 68
info: Blackman was a high 3 star recruit coming out of Belle Glade FL as a 6'5 165 pound project. He commited to Florida State to sit and learn behind returning starter Deondre Francois. That plan didn't happen though, Francois went down with an injury in 2017 when the seminols were 2-5 and Blackman came in and as a true freshman led them to 6-6 throwing for 58%, 2229 yards and 19 TDs with 11 INTs. He returned to the bench in 2018 but in the one game he got to play against NC State he made the most of it. He received an 88 grade with 420 Yards and 4 TDs. That earned him the staring spot in 2019 where he was named captain but it was a disapointing season where he had more tournover worthy plays than big time throws. He ws the opening starter in 2020 before a young Joran Travis took the job and didn't let it go resulting in Blackman transfering to Arkansas State. He played well at Arkanasas State where he had a combined 30 BTT and only 11 TWP.
pros: Tall 6’5 athlete that has nearly 10,000 career yards. Good arm, he can throw off platform and zip the ball in platform.
cons: He’s a twig, at 6’5 hes under 200. Not the best at reading a field, missing a lot of open receivers for jump balls or check downs. Accuracy is only ok, not putting the ball on the money much.
take: Blackman had a great start to his career at Florida State before injuries took that away from him and forced him to transfer. He’s a 6’5 athlete with a good arm and you can’t teach that. I would love him in camp to see if he can develop.
QB Austin Aune North Texas 68
info: 3,551 yards 33 TD 15 INT 56.3% 71.4 PASS.
pros: Solid stats his final year. Can put some zip on it, solid arm that could work in the NFL. Rolled out on over half his drops.
cons: 56% completion and 15 INT in 2022. Touch and accuracy are not where they need to be.
take: Aune has a good arm and is a decent athlete. He has issues with accuracy giving the ball to the other team but if he can fix that he can be an NFL QB.
QB Dylan McCaffrey Norther Colorado 68
info: 1,837 YARDS 11 TD 12 INT 59%^ 70 PASS 68 RUN. 6’5 220.
pros: Good size and recruit. Throws a pretty ball with a good base. Good mechanics in the pocket, protects the ball and can move.
cons: Couldn’t make it at Michigan and didn’t kill it at Norther Colorado.  Under pressure makes him look like a different QB.
take: NA
RB Percy Agyei-Obese James Madison 68
info: 159 attempts 905 yards 8 TD 80.0 RUN.
pros: Sick name. Never graded above 80 overall in 6 years. 6 foot 213, he’s a good size. Can do a little of everything, drop the shoulder, stiff arm, jump cut and run a little bit.
cons: 10 fumbles on 600 carries. Is already 24. Not an explosive athlete, cuts and acceleration are alright.
take: Agyei-Obese is an all around solid back. He’s a good size with decent athleticism and goo vision. He has no trump card to make him stick out in the NFL but he can run in the NFL.
RB Tavion Thomas Utah 68
info: 142 carries 676 yards 7 TDs.
pros: Back to back years of 85+ PFF rush grades and 28 TDs. Great size at 6’2 240, has the power back build. Always falling forward for extra yardage.
cons: 10 fumbles on 476 attempts. Took a step back in 2022, graded lower and rushed for 500 less yards. Not a good receiver out of the backfield, a career 50 receiving yards. Has no juice to his game, the speed and quickness are lacking.
take: Thomas is your prototypical big back that can play on short yardage plays. He’s not going to be a lead guy anywhere but can fill the power back role if needed.
RB Travis Dye USC 68
info: 146 attempts 889 yards 9 TD 82.6 RUN.
pros: A lot of experience, ran for nearly 4,000 yards in his career and had 734 as a true freshman. Was a leader of a resurgent USC team. Plays with no gloves, he’s a baller. Solid out of the backfield, willing to block and solid hands. Has pretty good acceleration and change of direction.
cons: 29 inch arms and 205 pounds, he’s small overall. 10 college fumbles in 666 attempts. Fractured his ankle in 2022. Not big fast or strong, that’s a bad combination. Doesn’t break many tackles.
take: Dye is a high character productive RB that played at top tier programs for the last 5 years. He is just not what an NFL RB looks like, he’s small and doesn’t have the blazing speed. He may find himself on the back of a roster but it will be tough.
RB Hunter Luepke North Dakota St 68
info: 97 attempts 628 yards 9 TD 81.8 RUN.
pros: had a 92 PFF grade in 2021, he was a do it all player. Big strong player that can do it all, lead block, run and catch. Has good feet for a FB, solid cuts and decent athlete.
cons: 2022 shoulder injury shortened his season. He’s a full back. He hasn’t blocked that much and has played a lower level of competition.
take: Luepke is a full back, most teams don’t have one and they are easy to find. He was a great runner in college and has receiving experience but again he’s a full back.
RB Xazavian Valladay Arizona St 68
info: 215 yards 1,192 yards 16 TD 86.4 RUN.
pros: 5 years of production and 4,465 career yards. Graded over 78 for last 4 years. Good zone runner, can press the line and cut well. Runs hard, will try to fall forward and get every yard.
cons: Never really dominated all 5 years, just solid production. 5’11 199, he’s on the smaller side. Not a string runner, arm tackles can get him and he wont run through contact well.
take: Valladay is an outside zone runner only, he isn’t meant for any other scheme. He has good vision and has the speed and cutting ability to be a good back in that system but that’s it. He’s small and not strong enough to run through contact so it will be difficult for him to stick on a roster.
RB Deshaun Fenwick Oregon St 68
info: 113 attempts 553 yards 7 TD 78.4 RUN.
pros: Good size at 6 foot 226. Consistent 70’s PFF grade. Runs very hard, fights for yards and wants to hit. Good at cutting and accelerating for a bigger back.
cons: Never broke 560 yards rushing in 5 years. Not a great athlete, wont be a burner. Can get too aggressive running instead of seeing blocks develop.
take: Fenwick is a solid back that runs at 100%. He can cut and run behind his pads well but he’s not a great athlete and he never produced much. He should battle for a 3rd RB spot.
RB Tucker Gregg Georgia St 68
info: 171 attempts 709 yards 12 TD 74.3 RUN.
pros: Solid build at 5’10 220. Good downhill runner, runs behind his pads and falls forward.
cons: Doesn’t make many guys miss, more of a straight forward runner.
take: Gregg doesn’t know how to not run someone over. He’s a one trick pony that is a no non sense runner that will pick up 1 more yard than you block for.
RB Isaiah Bowser UCF 68
info: 206 attempts 795 yards 16 TD 73.9 RUN.
pros: 6’1 225, good RB size. Strong runner, he runs behind his pads well. Solid vision, see’s what the offense is blocking. Decent at making the first guy miss at the line.
cons: Not a receiving threat, he had 14 receptions in 2022. Not a quick back, cuts and acceleration are lacking. Production was just ok, averaged a career 4.0 yards per carry. Pass pro is meh.
take: Bowser is a big back that runs with solid power. He is a short yardage guy that can serve a role for a team. He’s lacking the athleticism to be drafted but he can play in the NFL.
RB Nathaniel Peat Missouri 68
info: 101 attempts 443 yards 2 TD 72.3 RUN.
pros: Former Stanford player, probably smart. Runs hard and fights for yards. Good balance, runs through arm tackles. Decent cuts, low center of gravity.
cons: never ran over 450 yards in a season. Not fast, his acceleration and speed are mediocre. Not the best vision, can be too patient.
take: Peat is a former Stanford RB that runs very hard. He’s not a good athlete though so he will never be a starter but he could possibly be a nice 3rd RB.
RB Nasir Smith Central Connecticut St 68
info: 228 attempts 1,203 yards 13 TD 88.1 RUN.
pros: Good size at 5’10 220. Used to play for Auburn HS where he carried the worst team ever. Good burst and strength, will run through contact.
cons: Played against no names. Not the top end athlete, wont be sprinting away from anyone.
take: Smith has come a long way from Auburn HS in NY. He was the only good player on the team because of his good burst and hard running style. He’s not the best athlete though and didn’t play good competition so it will be interesting to see if he gets a shot.
RB Tyler Hoosman North Dakota 68
info: 175 attempts 1,020 yards 12 TD 89.2 RUN.
pros: Good vision and good patience. Good contact balance, doesn’t go down easy and has a good feel for avoiding defenders.
cons: Couldn’t be the starter at Norther Iowa. Played in the FCS against easy competition. Not a high end athlete, wont blow anyone away with speed.
take: Hoosman is a solid back but only had one good year. He see the field well and can avoid contact without being a top end athlete. He should get a shot at making a roster.
RB Jaleel McLaughlin Youngstown 68
info: 228 attempts 1,584 yards 13 TD 90.6 RUN.
pros: Back to back 1000+ years with 12+ TDs and nearly 7 YPC. 1 Fumble in 537 attempts. FCS All American that was ultra productive. Good vision and cutting ability, can get through a hole very well. Good athlete, speed and agility are there.
cons: Graded very poorly in pass blocking. 5’9 183 pounds, he’s extremely small.
take: McLaughlin was a very productive back at Youngstown over the last 2 years. He has very good athleticism and vision but he is just very small. He probably wont make a roster with that size but he’s worth a look.
RB Marcus Cooper Incarnate Word 68
info: 211 attempts 1,440 yards 11 TD 91.1 RUN.
pros: 91.1 RUN grade with nearly 7 YPC. Good speed and runs hard. Good vision and acceleration.
cons: 5’8 185, he’s a small back. No power, will get man handled. Dances too much in the backfield.
take: Cooper is another very small athletic productive FCS back. He should absolutely get a shot at the NFL but his size will limit him.
RB Brad Roberts Air Force 68
info: 344 attempts 1,723 yards 17 TD 87 RUN. 5’11 215.
pros: Back to back 1000+ yard seasons and only 2 career fumbles. Good vision and adequate speed to get to the second level.
cons: Not a fluid athlete, isn’t a tackle breaker. Played in a different offense at the full back position.
take: NA
S Brandon Hill Pitt 68
info: 50 tackles 0 INT 61.8 RDEF 69.1 TACK 69.9 COV. 5’10 193 with 30 ¾ arms.
pros: Very good athlete, fast and rangy. Can cover receivers in man with his athleticism. Comes downhill to tackle anyone.
cons: Size is a concern. Doesn’t seem like he is instinctive, nothing on his tape is him reading routes.
take: NA
S Rashad Torrence Florida 68
info: 65 tackles 0 INT 68.7 RDEF 77.6 TACK 76.1 COV. 6’0 193 32 arms.
pros: True Junior. Good in coverage seeing routes and breaking on them. Solid tackler, can clean up anything.
cons: Tested Poorly. For a deep safety his range and change of direction are troubling.
take: NA
TE Brenton Strange Penn St 68
info: 32 receptions 362 yards 5 TD 73.2 RECV 60.5 RBLK.
pros: Solid run after the catch. Has above average athleticism, can run vertically.
cons: Undersized at 6’3 246. Not the best blocker, he’s a little small and plays a little unbalanced.
take: Strange is a pretty good athlete for the TE position. His size is going to be a concern because his blocking at the next level will be an issue. Although he’s good with the ball in his hands, he will have a hard time getting on the field because of other aspects of his game.
TE Thomas Greaney Alabany 68
info: 51 receptions 700 yards 9 TD 86.1 RECV 62.4 RBLK.
pros: Good size at 6’5 255. Smooth route runner, does a nice job accelerating out of breaks. Pretty good hands, only one drop in 2022.
cons: Not aggressive in the run game, wont move anyone. Can’t pass block total liability.
take: Greaney looked out of place against Baylor in the run game. He can’t hold up to physicality in the box. He’s a solid receiver though, runs well and has good hands.
TE Payne Durham Purdue 68
info: 56 receptions 560 yards 8 TD 70.3 RECV 56.7 RBLK.
pros: Good size at 6’5 258 and 33 inch arms. Big strong blocker, can move people in the run game. Solid with the ball, he’s strong and can break tackles.
cons: Slow feet, will get ran around trying to block in space or on the line. Not a good route runner, he’s not quick at all. Mediocre athleticism.
take: Durham is a big strong TE that could be a solid 2rd string inline blocker for a team. He’s got the size but he’s not a good athlete. His lack of athleticism kills his ability to separate or block in space.
TE Kyle Patterson Air Force 68
info: 3 receptions 32 yards 0 TD 66.3 RECV 84.4 RBLK.
pros: Good size at 6’5 250. Great run blocker, very willing.
cons: Almost no receiving ability, has 18 career receptions.
take: Patterson is from a very run heavy offense where he had 3 total receptions 2022. He’s a total project but he could be a good blocker for a team.
TE Blake Whiteheart Wake Forest 68
info: 24 receptions 295 yards 3 TD 62.4 RECV 65.8 RBLK.
pros: Decent size at 6’4 249. Solid hands, didn’t drop a ball in 2022. Team captain. Solid possession receiver, can get open underneath and catch the ball.
cons: Not much production in his career. Doesn’t add plus run after catch. Strength and athleticism is below average, won’t move anyone in the run game or run by anyone.
take: Whiteheart is a solid TE with good hands and a solid senior year. He doesn’t offer much upside because his blocking and athleticism are below average but he’s good enough for a backup TE.
WR Antoine Green North Carolina 68
info: 38 receptions 745 yards 7 TD 76.7 RECV.
pros: Solid size at 6’2 200. Averaged 20 YPC in back to back years. He was a track star, has good athleticism. Good ball skills, can make plays on the ball.
cons: Routes are not good, he doesn’t get in or out of breaks fast. Creates little to no separation by himself. No release package.
take: Green isn’t a good receiver, his size and athleticism is good enough for the NFL but he hasn’t shown much on film. He isn’t good with his routes or releases and didn’t show many high level plays where he’s getting open.
WR Tre Tucker Cincinnati 68
info: 53 attempts 680 yards 3 TD 69.5 RECV.
pros: Speed for days, one of the fastest players in the draft. Worked the middle of the field well. Great overall athleticism, can shake dudes and accelerate quickly. Good return man
cons: He’s very small, at 5’9 187 he has 28 inch arms and 8.5 inch hands. Never had a season over 700 yards. Was a slot only player in college. Not natural hands, catching doesn’t look easy.
take: Tucker is a great athlete and can really stretch the defense. He’s just so undersized and played slot only that the NFL will be a big adjustment. He can be a gadget player that can return for a team.
WR Derius Davis TCU 68
info: 42 receptions 531 yards 5 TD 66.4 RECV.
pros: Good run after the catch, broke a tackle on 25% of his receptions. Great return man and gadget player. May run a 4.2 he can fly.
cons: 5’8 168 with 7.5 inch hands, he’s as small as it gets. Not an actual receiver.
take: Would you draft a return man only that can be a gadget player. If you would Davis is your guy, he’s a great athlete but so small that he’s not going to be a receiver.
WR Isaiah Winstead East Carolina 68
info: 88 receptions 1,085 yards 6 TD.
pros: 6’3 210, good size. 3% drop rate in 2022. Good hands, can make plays on the ball.
cons: One good year. Not a good athlete, speed and agility below average. Routes are not crisp.
take: Winstead was a productive receiver on a great east Carolina team. He has the size and ball skills to get a shot in the league, but his athleticism and routes aren’t where they need to be.
WR Zakhari Franklin UTSA 68
info: 93 receptions 1,128 yards 15 TD 77.7 RECV.
pros: Over 1000 yards back to back seasons. 5.8% career drop percentage, good hands.
cons: Slender build, 6’1 185. Doesn’t have much strength, will struggle with physicality. Rounds his routes.
take: Franklin is a slim framed not overly athletic receiver that was somehow very productive. He clearly is doing something right but it will be tough to translate to the NFL.
WR Nikko Remigio Fresno St 68
info: 64 receptions 700 yards 5 TD 77.8 RECV.
pros: Broke out at fresno state, solid year. 3% drop rate in 2022, good hands. Good agility, can cut and accelerate well.
cons: 5’9 183, he’s a small receiver. One good year over 5. Not a real receiver, he’s a guy you manufacture space for currently.
take: I’m not going to lie, I’ve watched 7 straight sub 5’10 185 guys and they all blend in. He’s quick and has good hands and can return so he could be useful for a team. He just is small and needed to play in space vs playing actual receiver.
WR Shaq Davis South Carolina St 68
info: 44 receptions 944 yards 11 TD 70.8 RECV.
pros: Amazing size, 6’5 217 with 34 inch arms. Great catch radius, he’s so long and can extend.
cons: Played against low level competition. MASSIVE DROP ISSUES, he loves to catch with his body and has a 20% drop rate. Not a good athlete, he doesn’t separate.
take: Davis was a top receiver in the FCS using his great size to dominate lesser competition. That’s his strengths though, he can’t catch well and isn’t a good athlete so it’s a tough sell for the NFL.
WR Keytaon Thompson Virginia 68
info: 53 receptions 579 yards 0 TD 72.9 RECV.
pros: Great size, 6’5 216. Former 4-star QB that could throw doe a team. Broke out in 2021 with 990 yards.
cons: Not a defined position, was more playmaker than any position. Dropped off in 2022 because the Virginia offense sucked. Doesn’t have the most natural hands, 12% drop rate. Weird strides, doesn’t eat up much ground.
take: Thompson is a very unique player, he was very productive but I’m not sure how. He runs very weird and isn’t that good of an athlete, but he is smart and knows how to find space. I like him but I don’t think he will make it.
WR Jacob Copeland Maryland 68
info: 26 receptions 376 yards 2 TD 71.3 RECV.
pros: Good athlete, has the speed and quickness that you want in a receiver.
cons: Didn’t start and didn’t get over 40 receptions in 5 years. Not a good route runner or good off the line.
take: Copeland is a pretty good athlete that was a disappointment in college. He never became that guy because his actual receiver skills never developed, like getting off press or running routes but the potential is there.
WR Kearis Jackson Georgia 68
info: 18 receptions 243 yards 0 TD 71 RECV.
pros: 6 foot 200 and a solid athlete. Not many drops.
cons: Barely used, over 5 years 69 receptions 963 yards 4 TD.
take: Jackson is a complete project, he didn’t actually start his entire career. He’s a solid athlete with solid size but he had 18 reception in 2022.
WR Jared Wayne Pitt 68
info: 60 receptions 1,062 yards 5 TD 82.2 RECV.
pros: 6’3 208, good size. Improved every year, became a featured part of the offense in 2022. Solid hands, good and reliable hands. Made plays without top tier traits, could be a guy that always surprises.
cons: Not a good athlete, the speed will not threaten anyone. Routes wont create much separation, his releases are ok and he doesn’t get out of his breaks well.
take: Wayne is a reliable solid receiver that flashes good routes. His hands are good and he’s a steady player but his athleticism will hinder him heavily. He should be signed to see if he can make it work as a good depth piece but its an uphill battle.
WR Josh Vann South Carolina 68
info: 18 receptions 296 yards 3 TD 63 RECV. 5’11 192 with 31 3/8 arms.
pros: Smooth route runner, solid out of the break and can bend his routes well.
cons: Was not a teams starter. Not a high end athlete, speed and quickness are middle of the pack.
take: NA
C Alama Uluave San Diego St 67
info: 2,345 snaps 60.4 RBLK 80.9 PBLK 11 pressures. 6’1 303 2ith 31 7/8 arms.
pros: Was an all mountain west 1st team player.
cons: On the smaller side. Sluggish non the field and weak.
take: NA
C Johnny Jordan Virginia Tech 67
info: 2,428 snaps 59.6 RBLK 72.7 PBLK 8 pressures. 6’1 300 with 31 3/8 arms.
pros: Played for VT.
cons: Didn’t grade well.
take: NA
DL Jaxon Player Tulsa 67
info: 9 pressures 1 sack 13 tackles 67.5 RDEF 60.8 RDEF. 5’11 285 with 31 arms.
pros: Good athlete, tested well and played well at Tulsa.
cons: Very undersized.
take: NA
EDGE Noah Taylor North Carolina 67
info: 21 pressures 3 sacks 23 tackles 62.2 RDEF 75.3 PRSH. 6’4 238 with 32 5/8 arms.
pros: UNC Coaching staff loved him. Gives good effort.
cons: Undersized edge that will hinder him in the NFL. Knee injury cut his season short. Not a powerful rusher or a skillful one.
take: NA
LB Drake Thomas NC St 67
info: 66 tackles 90.5 RDEF 64.6 TACK 77.5 PRSH 63.8 COV. 6’0 228 with 29 1/8 arms.
pros: Plays the run very well, super aggressive.
cons: Very undersized with very short arms. Misses too many tackles, career 17%.
take: NA
LB Dillon Doyle Baylor 67
info: 67 tackles 2 INT 1 PBU 80.4 RDEF 75.6 64.1 COV. 6’3 238 with 31 1/8 arms.
pros: Graded well in 2022 with good size. Gets to the right spot in the run game, not out of position much.
cons: Not a good athlete, struggles to beat people to a spot. A step slow reacting, speed will get him.
take: NA
OG Joey Fisher Shepherd 67
info: 6’4 295 32 inch arms.
pros: D2 all American first team.
cons: Undersized.
take: I can’t find shepherd film, he’s probably a big project.
OG Brent Laing Minnesota-Duluth 67
info: 6’3 298 with 32 1/4 arms.
pros: Was good against lower competition.
cons: Got smoked at the east west game. Doesn’t have much strength to anchor or move guys in the run game.
take: Laing played at a low level college and when he played in the east west bowl he got exposed. He doesn’t have the power or athleticism to succeed in the NFL tight now.
OG Tommy Brown Colorado 67
info: 950 snaps 52.2 RBLK 86.7 PBLK 7 pressures. 6’6 330.
pros: Former Alabama guy, good recruit and great size.
cons: No tape.
take: NA
OG Hagen Meservy Ohio 67
info: 2,926 yards 79.9 RBLK 82 PBLK 11 pressures. 6’4 313 with 31 ¾ arms.
pros: Solid grading in 2022.
cons: No tape.
take: NA
OG Axel Ruschmeyer Minnesota 67
info: 1,403 snaps 74.6 RBLK 75.9 PBLK 7 pressures. 6’4 295 with 31 1/8 arms.
pros: Solid PFF grading.
cons: Bad testing at sub 300.
take: NA
OG Loic Ngassam-Nya Wake Forest 67
info: 3,237 snaps 57 RBLK 80 PBLK 12 pressures. 6’3 302 with 32 7/8 arms.
pros: Decent size and smooth in pass pro.
cons: Not a strong guard and played in a fake offense.
take: NA
OT Colby Sorsdal William & Mary 67
info: 1,797 snaps 89.3 RBLK 83.7 PBLK 10 pressures. 6’6 301 with 32 ¾ arms.
pros: Great final year with an 89.9 PFF grade. Smooth in pass pros, good base to his game.
cons: Played at William and Mary. Leaves the inside move open too often. Plays too upright, will struggle with power.
take: Sorsdal will have a tough time in the NFL with power and length. He played well against easy competition but will have a tough time with the jump in talent.
OT Connor Galvin Baylor 67
info: 3,554 snaps 74.3 RBLK 77.1 PBLK 16 pressures. 6’6 293 with 32 1/8 arms.
pros: A lot of experience and solid grades. Smooth offensive lineman, he has solid technique and doesn’t look out of place.
cons: Got smoked in the east west shrine game. Bad build, he’s too lean with short arms. Plays way to high with not much bend. Doesn’t have power to his game, will get bulled and wont create movement.
take: Galvin is a very experienced OL that has played a lot of ball and it shows by the way he moves. He just lacks the power and build to be an NFL OL.
OT Kilian Zierer Auburn 67
info: 1,152 snaps 57.4 RBLK 71 PBLK 19 pressures. 6’7 304 with 34 1/8 arms.
pros: Solid tackle length. Solid athlete, can move well in space.
cons: One year starter, not much experience. Didn’t have a good season. Slow feet, balance is bad because of it. Not much power.
take: Zierer has the size and athleticism you look for, but he just didn’t play well. He has limited play strength and slow feet. He wont survive in the NFL with the strength and technique he plays with now.
OT Mason Brooks Ole Miss 67
info: 2,188 snaps 79.5 RBLK 86.3 PBLK 0 pressures. 6’5 309 with 33 ¾ arms.
pros: Solid size and played well when he got in.
cons: Couldn’t start at Ole Miss.
take: Brooks couldn’t crack the starting lineup. He’s got the size but he didn’t play in 2022.
OT Trevor Reid Louisville 67
info: 1,347 snaps 58.3 RBLK 71.7 PBLK 13 pressures. 6’4 297 with 34 ½.
pros: Good length and athleticism.
cons: Sloppy technique, hands and feet are not refined. No power, will get thrown around in run game. Sub 300 pounds.
take: Reid has the length and athleticism to make an NFL training camp but he will need to add mass and develop to stay in the NFL.
OT Alfred Edwards Utah St 67
info: 3,756 snaps 55.9 RBLK 84.7 PBLK 13 pressures. 6’7 327 with 34 ½ arms.
pros: Amazing size. Not terrible movement skills.
cons: Poor testing numbers. Big time leaner, not good balance or explosivness.
take: NA
OT Dakota Davis Syracuse 67
info: 2,524 snaps 59.8 RBLK 71.5 PBLK 21 pressures. 6’5 335.
pros: Syracuse.
cons: Not good.
take: NA
OT Dontae Bull Fresno St 67
info: 2,226 snaps 87.4 RBLK 64.2 PBLK 11 pressures. 6’6 322 with 34 ¼ arms.
pros: Good size.
cons: No film.
take: NA
OT Eric Douglas South Carolina 67
info: 2,540 55.3 RBLK 61.9 PBLK 18 pressures. 6’4 295 with 33 ½ arms.
pros: Good athlete, 7.4 3 cone.
cons: A little on the lighter and weak side. Not good grades the last 3 years.
take: NA
QB Holton Ahlers East Carolina 67
info: 3,699 yards 28 TD 5 INT 66.8% 82.6 PASS.
pros: A lot of experience, over 2000 drop backs and 13,866 yards. Good size, 6’3 237 he’s the prototypical build. Has an NFL can zip the ball in there and push it down the field. Can run a little bit, can run QB power.
cons: Never really dominated in his 5 years like you would like to see. Long slow release. Touch isn’t great, not accurate with touch throws. He’s a Lefty.
take: Ahlers is a big strong QB that has a solid arm. That’s enough to get you in the NFL but he also has a ton of experience that helps his prospects. He has the physical tools to play but he’s not refined, he needs to be more accurate and process better to be a solid NFL QB.
QB Tyson Bagent Shepherd 67
info: Played at a D2 school.
pros: Was good for a D2 QB, he won the D2 version of the Heisman. Has some solid escapability, has the quickness to move in the pocket well. Decent arm, can make NFL type throws.
cons: Not NFL ready right now, passes up a bunch of NFL open throws for check downs. Won’t be able to get away with the throws he makes on the move in the NFL. He’s not overly accurate, the precision isn’t there on his passes.
take: Bagent is a big time project, not many D2 guys even get a chance at the NFL. He has some ability but it will be an uphill climb for him to make a roster.
QB Todd Centeio James Madison 67
info: 2,682 yards 25 TD 5 INT 63.7% 87.8 PASS.
pros: Balled out in 2022 getting a 90.4 grade. Alright zip on the ball, not a noodle arm. A lot of experience in different offenses. Solid athlete, can move well and escape the pocket. Good feet in the pocket throws with a solid base.
cons: Old old, he’s been in college since 2017. Played for 3 teams and only was very good with one of them. He is short, max 6 foot. Got smoked in his one game in the power 5 4/15. Accuracy isn’t great, placement is ok and he misses too many throws.
take: Centio is a solid QB that played very well for James Madison last season. He’s a well built athlete that has a decent arm and a lot of experience. It took him 5 years to become that guy though and he still can struggle with accuracy so NFL starter is a reach. He should come in and compete for QB 3 in the NFL.
QB Tim Demorat Fordham 67
info: 4,885 yards 56 TDs 10 INT 64.8% 92.4 PASS
pros: Had an absolute absurd BTT at 10%. Big time performance in 2022, 92.5 PFF grade and over 50 TDs. Good size at 6’3 221.
cons: Only had one great year at Fordham. Arm strength is disappointing, no zip on the ball. Throwing to wide open players, not actually that accurate.
take: Demorat looks good until you watch him play. His stats are great as well as his measurables but the play is lacking. He got away with a lot of bad throws against bad competition and doesn’t make spectacular throws. He will have to battle for a practice squad spot.
QB Darren Grainger Georgia St 67
info: 2,428 yards 18 TD 7 INT 58.5% 73.5 PASS.
pros: Tall 6’4 athletic QB. He’s got a great arm, can sling it down the field.
cons: Not an efficient passer, a release isn’t that quick and isn’t a fast decision maker. Not accurate, low end of college passers.
take: Grainger is a tall strong armed athletic QB. Everything else needs a lot of work and it’s probably too much to work on to make the NFL.
QB Kyle Vantrease Georgia Southern 67
info: 4,270 yards 25 TD 16 INT 61.6% 70.4 PASS.
pros: Played a lot of football, 1,300 career drop backs. Solid at attacking down the field, he has solid touch deep.
cons: Arm isn’t that good, not much power. Not much of a runner. Going to be 25, has been playing since 2017.
take: Vantrease is a solid QB that ran the Georgia State offense well last year. He had a lot of opportunities to throw in the offense and he made some nice throws down the field. He just isn’t physically impressive, his size, athleticism and arm are all slightly below average so it will be tough for him to stick in the league.
QB Logan Bonner Utah St 67
info: 739 yards 6 TD 8 INT 56% 61.3 PASS 45.9 RUN.
pros: Solid thick build, well filled out. Good base to his game, never gets heel clicky. Solid accuracy, pretty good ball placement.
cons: Got hurt in his final year, didn’t back up his 2021 season. The offense sucked, no NFL reads.
take: NA
RB Camerun Peoples Appalachian St 67
info: 100 carries 592 yards 5 TDs.
pros: 6’2 225, good size. Good combination of size and speed for special teams.
cons: 5th year RB with only 592 yards his 5th year. Runs way too upright. No quicks to his game, not an explosive athlete.
take: Peoples had a solid RB career at Appalachian State where he ran for 2,800 yards. He’s not a good enough runner to be a guy in the NFL but his size and speed give a little hope to him making an NFL roster.
RB Deneric Prince Tulsa 67
info: 127 attempts 734 yards 5 TD 72.8 RUN.
pros: Solid size at 6 foot 217. Used in the pass game a good amount. Somehow makes people miss.
cons: Never had a breakout year at Tulsa, the most yards he has ever had was 734. Is not explosive, cuts and acceleration are meh. Tall and runs high.
take: Prince was solid for tulsa, he had a few good games but nothing to write home about. He’s a solid RB that can play in the NFL but he can’t be an NFL starter.
RB Emari Demercado TCU 67
info: 121 attempts 681 yards 6 TD 77.5 RUN.
pros: 1 fumble in over 300 career attempts. 5’11 210, he’s a good build. Solid athlete, can get skinny and accelerate through the line.
cons: Was never the starter, and never ran for over 700 yards. Only really played for his last 2 years. Not much of a receiver, only 13 reception in 2022. Can’t run through contact, he’s got no power.
take: Demercado took a while to see the field, he’s not the strongest runner. He’s got some ability to accelerate through the line but he’s not going to be a reliable NFL back.
RB Hassan Hall Georgia Tech 67
info: 116 attempts 522 yards 1 TD 76.9 RUN.
pros: caught 28 balls in 2022, showed he can catch. Has pretty good speed and will run his feet.
cons: 6 foot sub 200, he’s a skinny back. Not a strong runner and his balance is questionable.
take: Hall is a solid speed back that has some nice runs in his tape but not enough of them.  He’s a slim build that will struggle with NFL physicality.
RB Jamyest Williams Georgia St 67
info: 85 attempts 459 yards 2 TD 76.4 RUN
pros: Quick and Fast. Sets up blocks well, good patience.
cons: 5’9 185, he’s very small. Played nobodies. No power to his game, gets taken down easy.
take: Williams was the lightning to Tucker Greggs thunder. They formed a good RB duo at Georgia State but his size will limit if he can play in the NFL.
RB Ellis Merriweather Massachusetts 67
info: 152 carries 611 yards 3 TD 67.9 RUN.
pros: Great size at 6’1 225. 2-time team captain. Solid 2021 campaign, 1,130 yards. Big back that will fall forward.
cons: Dropped off from 2021, way less efficient. Not much of a receiver, 7 receptions in 2022. Got killed against all the power 5 opponents. Not a tackle breaker, 20 TF on 152 attempts. Runs high and loses leverage.
take: Merriweather is a good sized back that was a staple of UMASS’s offense. He fights for extra yards and has solid power but that’s all his game is. Quickness, tackle breaking and speed aren’t there so it will be tough for him to play in the NFL. He has a shot to make a roster especially with his size but it’s a long shot.
RB Jacob Saylors East Tennessee 67
info: 227 carries 1,318 yards 15 TD 79.5 RUN.
pros: Tackle breaking machine, 67 MTF. Solid short area quickness, nice spin and quick cut. Killed Wofford.
cons: Not a good athlete. Smaller back that played at a lower competition level.
take: I want to see Saylors on an NFL field to see if he can replicate his college runs. He’s a tackle break at the FCS level but he’s an average athlete that’s undersized which is not a good thing for the NFL.
RB Marques DeShields Rhode Island 67
info: 184 attempts 1,173 yards 12 TD 79.9 RUN.
pros: 5 out of last 6 games over 100 yards. Solid speed, can break a long TD. Low center of gravity, can cut well.
cons: Didn’t even open the season as the starter. Dances a lot in the backfield to get nowhere. Not the biggest, 5’9 200.
take: DeShields played pretty well against his only FBS opponent and took over the offense at Rhode Island. He is an undersized back with some speed and agility and the production to go with it. The NFL will be a massive adjustment but he should get a training camp chance.
RB Ulonzo Gilliam UC Davis 67
info: 200 attempts 1,192 yards 13 TD 81 RUN.
pros: 5 years of production with 3 900+ seasons. Hasn’t fumbled in 2 years. 2 time team captain and All Big sky 1st team. 90 receptions over the last 2 years. Runs with good patience and is a solid athlete, see’s the play develop and has the quickness to hit the hole.
cons: 5’9 189 pounds, he’s a small back. Not strong and good at breaking tackles, he wont be creating on his own.
take: Gilliam is a good FCS back that produce for 5 years. He’s small but has good vision and athleticism but he’s just small. It will be a tough ask for him to make a team.
RB Carlos Washington Southeastern Louisiana 67
info: 148 attempts 725 yards 82.9 RUN.
pros: Good size, 5’11 220. He runs hard and with good power.
cons: Never ran over 800 yards. Not agile, his lateral agility and burst are only ok.
take: Washington didn’t have the most impressive college career playing at a low end school and not being a 1000 yard runner. He’s not the most athletic but he has a great build and runs hard. He has a chance to make it in the league.
RB Deonta McMahon McNeese 67
info: 190 attempts 1,415 yards 12 TD 90.4 RUN.
pros: 7.4 YPC, that’s an insane YPC. Good quickness and vision, can run between the tackles at his size.
cons: 5’9 185, he’s a small back. Not much strength. Not the blazing fast speed a 185 pounder needs.
take: McMahon was a dynamic RB for McNeese but he’s just small. You can see his quickness and agility are very good but the speed needs to be a different level at that size.
RB Trey Sneed Fordham 67
info: 198 attempts 1,140 yards 5 TD 91.5 RUN.
pros: 91.5 RUN grade with 58 MTF. Solid size, 5’11 215. Good ability to break tackles, solid contact balance.
cons: Has been playing since 2016 and didn’t play well until he was 25. Doesn’t have great power or athleticism.
take: Sneed has a great season 91.5 RUN grade and over 1,140 yards. He’s a solid back that does most things you would like an RB to do but he’s not special. He was a freshman in 2016 and just had his breakout season.
RB Jarek Broussard Michigan St 67
info: 63 attempts 298 yards 3 TD 81.3 RUN.
pros: Good vision, sets up blocks well and finds open lanes. Good acceleration on his cuts.
cons: Small back, 5’9 185 he isn’t going to run through contact. Not much receiving experience where he would have to thrive. Overall production isn’t there.
take: NA
RB Trelon Smith UTSA 67
info: 54 attempts 190 yards 2 TD 70.6 RUN.
pros: Good patience. Very good agility, cuts are violent.
cons: Small back at 5’9 185. Ends up on the ground too easy, whether that be just getting tripped up or slipping.
take: NA
RB Kairee Robinson San Jose St 67
info: 156 attempts 756 yards 10 TD 90.6 RUN. 5’8 200.
pros: Good build, low center of gravity and a solid frame.
cons: Only 2 career fumbles. Not much of a receiving threat. Not a violent runner that can break tackles. Speed isn’t there.
take: NA
RB Brenden Brady UTSA 67
info: 154 attempts 698 yards 9 TD.
pros: 2 career fumbles. Compact runner, can run through arm tackles.
cons: One year starter without a 700+ yard season. Not a quick player, wont accelerate on his cuts.
take: NA
RB Owen Wright Monmouth 67
info: 73 carries 297 yards 16 TDs 1 FUM 73 RUN 62.4 RECV. 5’9 214 with 30 ¼ arms and 10 hands.
pros: Solid build for the position, dense.
cons: Barely touched the ball, not a starter at Monmouth.
take: NA
S Joe Foucha LSU 67
info: 30 tackles 1 INT 3 PBU 73.8 RDEF 64.4 TACK 56.6 COV. 5’10 198 with 30 1/8 arms.
pros: Plays with high effort, all over the field and going 100 mph.
cons: Not a big or athletic safety.  Can’t handle man with good players of 1 on 1 blocks.
take: NA
TE Leonard Taylor Cincinnati 67
info: 18 receptions 170 yards 2 TD 59.1 RECV 54.1 RBLK.
pros: Good size at 6’5 248. Solid athlete with good RAC.
cons: Bad hands, 9% drop rate which is a concern for TE’s. Almost no production. Graded poorly. Bad run blocker, super weak at the point of attack.
take: Taylor played bad, there is no other way to say it. He’s an awful blocker that didn’t produce in the receiving game. He has a shot at the NFL because of his size and athleticism, but he has a long way to go.
TE Travis Vokolek Nebraska 67
info: 20 receptions 240 yards 2 TD 63.4 RECV 65.7 RBLK.
pros: Good size at 6’6 259. Decent strength, solid run blocker.
cons: Little production in college, 656 yards in 5 years. Old player, has been in college since 2017. Not a good athlete, wont separate on routes or stretch a defense.
take: Vokolek is a big strong tight end that looks the part. He isn’t a plus athlete or receiver so he wouldn’t add much to a passing game. He could be a 3rd TE if a team needs a big strong backup TE.
TE Daniel Barker Michigan St 67
info: 21 receptions 239 yards 2 TD 69.2 RECV 62.1 RBLK.
pros: Smooth route runner, can get himself open.
cons: 6’3 240, he is undersized. Bad hands, 11.5% drop rate and 40 contested catch rate.
take: Barker is an average college TE which isn’t a good sign for the NFL. He’s a smooth player that you can move around but the size, strength and speed combo isn’t good.
WR Jadakis Bonds Hampton 67
info: 51 receptions 863 yards 10 TD.
pros: Good size at 6’3 205. Was a solid deep threat, good at tracking the ball.
cons: Played at Hampton. 12% drop rate, his hands aren’t that good. Probably not a good athlete, only looked good at the FBS level.
take: Bonds is a good sized receiver with 3 solid years at Hampton. He’s very good at tracking the ball over his shoulder and dominated lesser competition. He is in for a big adjustment in the NFL though, his routes are at an FCS level and his hands are questionable which is not a good combo.
WR Kazmeir Allen UCLA 67
info: 49 receptions 400 yards 2 TD 72.9 RECV.
pros: 4 career drops, his hands aren’t bad. Pretty good athlete, has some speed and change of direction ability.
cons: 5’8 176 and 29 inch arms, he’s small. No catch radius, need to put it on him. Purely a gimic player.
take: Allen is a playmaker only, he can make guys miss in space and out run people. He just isn’t a receiver so he wont be useful to a receiving core.
WR Jalen Brooks South Carolina 67
info: 33 receptions 499 yards 1 TD 62.4 RECV.
pros: Solid size at 6’1 205. Fixed his drop rate from 2020.
cons: Never really produced, only 499 receiving yards in 2022. Not a great athlete, not shake or great speed to his game. Routes are ok, nothing special.
take: Brooks is an ok WR, he’s definitely not special though. He isn’t a plus athlete, route runner or have plus ball skills. He may get a chance in the league but he probably wont make a roster.
WR Malik Knowles Kansas St 67
info: 46 receptions 675 yards 2 TD 73.1 RECV.
pros: Solid size, 6’2 200. 1 drop in 2022. Smooth player that adjust to the ball well.
cons: Didn’t produce that much, max 675 in a season. Takes a long time to stop. Not a good athlete, speed is average.
take: Knowles is a long receiver with solid ability to make a play on the ball. He’s just not a good athlete, no twitch and average speed so his separation is not good.
WR Kris Thorton James Madison 67
info: 60 receptions 1,011 yards 7 TD 86.5 RECV.
pros: Back to back 1,000 yard seasons. Good speed and reliable hands. Will cant through contact.
cons: Played against low level competition. 5’8 180, very small. Slot only, can’t play on the outside.
take: Thorton is a productive slot that had 2 very good seasons to end his college career. He’s got the speed and hands but he’s small and not dynamic with the ball. To be that size and make it in the league he needs to be a playmaker.
WR Joshua Tomas Georgetown 67
info: 102 receptions 1,237 yards 11 TD 89.9 RECV.
pros: Good smooth athlete that runs good routes. 89.9 RECV grade, was very good for them.
cons: Small receiever, listed at 5’10 190 but smaller. Played against FCS. Slot only.
take: Tomas is a great FCS slot receiver but the NFL may be too big of a jump for him.
WR Duece Watts Tulane 67
info: 33 receptions 652 yards 8 TD 69.8 RECV. 6’2 200.
pros: 20 YPC, certified deep threat. Good build, has solid length.
cons: Hands are bad, drop problems. Not a route runner, no twitch to his game.
take: NA
C Nick Weber FAU 66
info: 3,712 snaps 61.1 RBLK 85.2 PBLK 8 pressures. 6’3 300 with 32 5/8 arms.
pros: Good pass blocker.
cons: Awful testing numbers. No film
take: NA
C Brad Cecil USF 66
info: 3,447 snaps 58.6 RBLK 80.8 PBLK 3 pressures. 6’3 294 wuth 31 5/8 arms.
pros: NA.
cons: On the smaller side. No film.
take: NA
DL PJ Mustipher Penn St 66
info: 4 pressures 1 sack 22 tackles 58.3 RDEF 56.9 PRSH. 6’4 320 with 32 ¾ arms.
pros: Was a leader for Penn St, 2 time team captain.
cons: Bad athlete, bad testing numbers. Slow off the ball, never will get to a guys pads first. No pass rushing, not athletic enough to bend around anyone.
take: NA
EDGE Caleb Murphy Ferris St 66
info: 6’3 254 with 32 ¾ arms.
pros: Probably was good.
cons: Not the best length for the edge position. Played at Ferris State.
take: Didn’t watch.
OG Jerome Carvin Tennessee 66
info: 2,817 snaps 52.2 RBLK 56 PBLK 12 pressures. 6’4 308 with 33 3/8 arms.
pros: 42 game starter with experience at all 3 interior positions. Solid technique, hands are usually good.
cons: Bad athlete, so slow off the ball. The power isn’t there, he can’t anchor.
take: Carvin is an experienced guard with a lot of SEC experience. He’s just an awful athlete and can’t play in the NFL.
OG Des Holmes Arizona St 66
info: 1,077 snaps 75.6 RBLK 71.2 PBLK 18 pressures. 6’5 307 with 32 3/8 arms.
pros: Position versatile, can play tackle and guard.
cons: Not the biggest guard, has only average size. Poor at recognizing stunts. Doesn’t use hands well.
take: NA
OG Chris Murray Oklahoma 66
info: 3,484 snaps 62.2 RBLK 79.8 PBLK 11 pressures. 6’2 294 with 30 ½ arms.
pros: Played at some high level programs and was solid.
cons: Awful testing. Small and short arms.
take: NA
OT Luke Haggard Indiana 66
info: 1,940 snaps 59.4 RBLK 72.8 PBLK 20 pressures. 6’6 297 with 33 1/8 arms.
pros: Has ok length and athleticism.
cons: On the leaner side at sub 300. Plays extremely high, almost fully straight up.
take: Haggard isn’t good, he plays high and has no mass behind him.
OT Mark Evans Arkansas-Pinebluff 66
info: 1,894 snaps 63 RBLK 64.4 PBLK 19 pressures. 6’2 293 with 32 3/8 arms.
pros: Good athlete that is a 4 year starter. Gives good effort in the run game.
cons: He’s too small.
take: Evans is too small to play, he’s 6’2 293 with 32 inch arms, he wont make it.
OT Theo Benedet British Columbia 66
info: 6’5 303 with 32 arms.
pros: He has played football.
cons: No length and no film.
take: No film, but no length.
OT Jarrett Horst Michigan St 66
info: 427 snaps 88.5 RBLK 72.5 PBLK 7 pressures. 6’5 298 with 33 ¼ arms.
pros: Solid build and a great run blocking grade.
cons: Wasn’t a starter to open his senior season. Not a very good athlete, feet are slow.
take: NA
QB Trae Self Stephen F Austin 66
info: 2,556 yards 19 TD 4 INT 60.1% 81.1 PASS.
pros: Good runner and 6’4 200. 3 year starter that improved every year. OK arm, wont be that bad in the NFL.
cons: Career 60% completion percentage, not accurate.
take: Self is a tall athletic QB that has a solid arm but only played in the FCS. He has some good throws on tape but he’s not the most accurate which will make it tough for him if he gets a shot.
RB Dedrick Parson Hawaii 66
info: 187 attempts 830 yards 11 TD 83.2 RUSH.
pros: Solid grading at 88  and 83 in the last 2 years. Good build at 5’8 205. Good quick burst and cuts.
cons: Under 5 yards a carry and 3 fumbles in 2022. Power isn’t there, in the run game he can get tossed around and isn’t great in the pass game.
take: Parsons is a compact RB with solid quickness and burst. He’s small though and wont hold up great on an NFL field do to lack of speed and power. He will be a long shot to make it.
RB Ronald Awatt UTEP 66
info: 163 attempts 734 yards 2 TD 69.8 RUN
pros: Decent athlete, can run well for 6 foot 205. Has some agility to him, can cut and hit a hole.
cons: 6 receptions in 2022, not a receiving back. Not much of a tackle breaker, 26 MTF in 163 attempts.
take: Awatt was a solid 2 year starter for UTEP but physically he’s not very strong and can’t run through tackles well. He may make a training camp roster but it will be tough to make a 53.
RB Narii Gaither Gardener-Webb 66
info: 153 attempts 976 yards 7 TD 77.4 RUN.
pros: Back to back over 900 yard seasons. Good athlete, has some speed to his game as well as agility.
cons: Got injured on one run at costal Carolina. Listed at 180 which is small.
take: Gaither is a smaller speed and agility back that played well for 2 years for Gardener Webb. He’s small though and hasn’t seen real competition so it’s an uphill climb for his NFL chances.
RB Jacob Chisholm Dayton 66
info: 232 attempts 1,040 yards 13 TD 82 RUN.
pros: 3 straight 1000 yard seasons and hasn’t fumbled in the last 2 years. Consistent runner, same yards and MTF back to back years. Team captain 2 straight years. Solid receiving option, 600 yards and 9 TDs over last 2 years and had a 91.4 grade. Solid vision and quickness to hit the open hole.
cons: FCS RB, played against non-competitive competition. 5’9 191 pounds, small back. Not strong, will not run over anyone or be good through contact.
take: Chisholm is a small productive back that was good in the FCS. He’s has some solid quickness and vision but he’s just very small.
RB Julien Gums Nicholls 66
info: 196 attempts 873 yards 4 TD 83.8 RUN.
pros: Nichols all time leading rusher. Great size at 5’10 230.
cons: Not a receiving threat with only 10 catches in 2022. Never ran for over 900 yards and had a sub 5 YPC in 2022. Not a good athlete, not quick or fast.
take: Gums was a solid back for Nicholls and is a strong runner. He isn’t athletic though and probably can’t make the NFL.
RB Todd Sibley Albany 66
info: 152 attempts 986 yards 10 TD 85.2 RUN.
pros: Former Pitt RB, has FBS experience. Ran 6.5 YPC in 2022 and an 85 RUN grade. 5’9 220, solid RB build.
cons: Couldn’t make in in the FBS. 12 career receptions, not good. Not an athlete, can’t win a foot race or make quick moves.
take: Sibley is a well built RB that played pretty well in the FCS. He just isn’t a good athlete and could handle the FBS so the NFL is a stretch.
RB Alex Fontenot Colorado 66
info: 66 attempts 311 yards 2 TD 79.8 RUN. 6’0 200.
pros: Had a breakout sophomore year with 873 yards.
cons: Only ran for 311 yards his senior year. Cuts are slow, doesn’t have the juice to run zone. Not an aggressive runner, wont run through anyone.
take: NA
S Tykee Smith Georgia 66
info: 23 tackles 0 INT 1 PBU 71.2 RDEF 64.8 TACK 70.7 COV. 5’10 198.
pros: graded fine and played for Georgia.
cons: Didn’t play much. Undersized.
take: NA
TE Princeton Fant Tennessee 66
info: 22 receptions 241 yards 3 TD 60 RECV 50.5 RBLK.
pros: He’s a big receiver, solid athlete.
cons: Undersized, at 6’1 238 he doesn’t have the prototypical size. Not the best hands.
take: Fant is too small to play NFL TE 6’1 isn’t tall enough and he’s not a good enough athlete to make up for it.
WR Dallas Daniels Jackson St 66
info: 65 receptions 685 yards 6 TD 62.4 RECV.
pros: Forced 21 missed tackles on 65 receptions. Good with the ball in his hands, can make plays in space. Good quickness, can cut and stop on a dime.
cons: Small receiver at 5’10 176. Played against low level competition. Doesn’t actually run routes now, a lot of college routes. Not physical, wont be able to play through contact.
take: Daniels is a small athletic receiver with the ability to make a play when he gets the ball. He didn’t play against the top competition and wasn’t in a real offense so he is a major projection. He should make a training camp roster but that’s most likely it.
OG Grant Miller Baylor 65
info: 2,726 snaps 73.2 RBLK 67.8 PBLK 16 pressures. 6’3 306 with 33 arms.
pros: Solid experience.
cons: Slow feet and off balance.
take: NA
OT Jacky Chen Pace 65
info: 6’5 302 with 33 ¾ arms.
pros: Decent Build.
cons: Havent watched.
take: No take.
OT Alec Jackson Auburn 65
info: 1,012 snaps 45.5 RBLK 54.2 PBLK. 6’4 321.
pros: Solid size.
cons: Not good.
take: NA
QB Ben Bryant Cincinnati 65
info: 2,744 yards 21 TD 7 INT 61.1% 84 PASS
pros: Solid size at 6’3 220. Never had a below 73 PFF grade.
cons: Only 2 years starting because of Desmond Ridder. Doesn’t have the arm strength to make tight window throws or the anticipation. Weird release, a funny arm action.
take: Bryant isn’t an NFL QB, he is too sloppy and doesn’t anticipate well enough. He’s probably not going to make a team.
QB Carter Bradley South Alabama 65
info: 3,335 yards 28 TD 12 INT 64.2% 76 PASS.
pros: Solid final year with 3000+ yards and 24 BTT. 6’3 212 isn’t a bad size.
cons: Couldn’t start for 4 years at Toledo.
take: Didn’t watch him but the resume isn’t that impressive.
QB Nkosi Perry FAU 65
info: 2,710 yards 25 TD 5 INT 58% 80.9 PASS.
pros: 6’4 athlete tha has 8000 career passing yards.
cons: He’s a twig, 6’4 and under 200. Sub 60 completion percentage, he’s not accurate. His arm is alright at best, not much zip.
take: Perry is 6’4 and a solid athlete. That’s all the good there is though, he’s not accurate and has a meh arm. He’s not going to make it.
QB Reece Udinski Richmond 65
info: 3,614 yards 29 TD 5 INT 72.5% 89.5 PASS.
pros: 6’4 220 and graded well in 2022. Accurate in the short game, doesn’t put the ball in harms way much.
cons: 4 unproductive years before breaking out. Not mobile, wont add anything with his legs. Arm is only ok, wont look good in the NFL. Doesn’t push the ball down the field.
take: Udinski looks great on paper, 6’4 220 with a 90.1 PFF grade. The tape isn’t that impressive though, he doesn’t push the ball down the field and isn’t physically gifted.
QB Myles Brennan LSU 65
info: Bench.
pros: Solid 4 star recruit and played at LSU.
cons: Quit football.
take: NA
QB Charlie Brewer Liberty 65
info: 52 yards 0 TD 1 INT 61.5% 65.2 PASS 54.7 RUN.
pros: in 2018 he had a 90 PFF pass grade. Not horrible in the quick game.
cons: Worst transfer decision of all time. Couldn’t start at liberty. One great year and declined from there. Doesn’t have a strong arm.
take: NA
QB Jarret Doege Troy 65
info: 3,055 yards 19 TD 12 INT 64% 69 PASS 59 RUN.
pros: Was solid at west viginia.
cons: Didn’t watch
take: NA
QB Tate Martell UNLV 65
info: NA.
pros: Top QB recruit.
cons: Never actually played.
take: NA
RB Tia Taua Nevada 65
info: 214 attempts 920 yards 11 TD 78.5 RUN.
pros: Didn’t fumble in the last 2 years. 5 straight years of being the number 1 back and 4000 career yards. Solid build at 5’9 215 pounds.
cons: Played at Nevada. 4.7 YPC in his career. Not an athlete, speed acceleration and power aren’t there.
take: Taua is a solid back that gets what you block for him. He’s not big strong or fast so I don’t think he will make a roster.
RB Jalen Holston Virginia Tech 65
info: 90 attempts 321 yards 5 TDs 67.9 RUN.
pros: He went to Virginia Tech. Solid size at 5’11 210.
cons: 6th year senior that has a career total od 1,200 yards. Sub 4 YPC.
take: Holston barely played, he’s a solid size and is an ok back. He’s not quick at all though and may not get a shot at the NFL.
RB Shaun Shivers Indiana 65
info: 144 attempts 587 yards 6 TD 72.2 RUN.
pros: Former SEC back behind Tank Bigsby. Spark plug of a runner, runs angry.
cons: 5’7 180, too small. Waited 5 years to become a starter and maxed out at 587 yards.
take: Shivers is a very small back that probably wont make it in the NFL. He runs hard as hell though and has had some success against power 5 teams.
RB Dom Williams Norther Iowa 65
info: 129 attempts 711 yards 9 TD 78.7 RUN.
pros: Team captain as a senior. 5’10 200 decent build.
cons: Couldn’t get playing time at Kansas. Never broke and 80 PFF grade.
take: Didn’t watch but a team captain.
RB Aaron Dawson Valparaiso 65
info: 221 attempts 1,203 yards 10 TD 73.8 RUN.
pros: Over 1000 yards in 2022. 5’10 220, he’s a solid build.
cons: Only one year of production and was in college in 2017.
take: I didn’t watch him, he’s old and only had one solid year. But, he’s got the size and ran for over 1000 yards in 2022.
RB TD Ayo-Durojaiye Villanova 65
info: 127 attempts 674 yards 2 TD 80.5 RUN.
pros: Sick name.
cons: Didn’t watch and wasn’t the full time starter.
take: He’s got the name but probably not the game.
RB Peter Oliver Holy Cross 65
info: 176 attempts 1,044 yards 8 TD 85.7 RUN.
pros: Good size, 6 foot 220 pounds. Improved every year ending in a 1k season.
cons: 2 career receptions, no experience. Played at Holy Cross, the competition was bad. Not an athlete.
take: Oliver is a strong runner that was good for Holy Cross at the end of the year. He is not an NFL athlete though so his chances of making a roster are slim.
QB Chris Reynolds Charlotte 64
info: 2,525 yards 22 TD 11 INT 63.6% 80.6 PASS.
pros: 5 year starter with over 10,000 pass yards. He runs the offense well and was a former walk on.
cons: Small QB, sub 6 foot and 200 pounds. Does not have an NFL arm. Inaccurate when he puts zip on the ball.
take: Reynolds did good for himself, from a walk on to the passing record leader at Charlotte he played well his entire college career. He just doesn’t have the size or arm to play in the NFL.
QB Chase Cunningham Middle Tennessee 64
info: 3,151 yards 21 TD 10 INT 66% 65.6 PASS 53.2 RUN.
pros: Decent athlete with a decent arm.
cons: Small, under 6 foot and 190.
take: NA
QB Judd Erikson San Diego 64
info: 2,265 yards 19 TD 7 INT 58% 75 PASS 60 RUN.
pros: Good size and didn’t stink.
cons: Didn’t watch
take: NA
QB Matt Mcdonald Bowling Green 64
info: 2,654 yards 22 TD 9 INT 64.4% 71 PASS 66 RUN.
pros: NA
cons: Didn’t watch
take: NA
QB Parker McNeil Louisiana Tech 64
info: 1,914 yards 18 TD 8 INT 62% 73 PASS 34 RUN.
pros: Great Size.
cons: Didn’t watch
take: NA
RB Daetrich Harrington Appalachain St 64
info: 82 attempts 389 yards 4 TD.
pros: Had a year in 2022 with over 100 caries. Has a good forced missed tackle rate. Improved PFF grade each year.
cons: Has been playing since 2017 and he still wasn’t the teams starter.
take: Didn’t watch but you need to produce more than he did in 6 years to make the league.
RB Tazhawn Henry Houston 64
info: 87 attempts 364 yards 3 TD 67.3 RUN.
pros: 4 straight years of solid grading. Quick and fast.
cons: 5’9 180 pounds, he’s too small to play. Fumbled 4 times in 2022. Missed time in 2022 with an injury.
take: Henry is too small to play in the NFL but had a solid college career. He is quick to the line but has no power to his game and will not be good in the NFL.
RB Elijah Dotson Norther Colorado 64
info: 204 attempts 935 yards 6 TD 67.6 RUN.
pros: Solid change of direction, cuts are crisp.
cons: Played in the FCS but wasn’t top of the line.
take: Didn’t watch much, seems like a decent athlete but you need to dominate FCS to play in the NFL.
RB Devonte Lee Nevada 64
info: 67 attempts 228 yards 5 TD 66.8 RUN. 5’9 230.
pros: NA
cons: NA
take: NA
QB Matt McDonald Bowling Green 63
info: 2,654 yards 22 TD 9 INT 61% 71.7 PASS
pros: Ok last year.
cons: Didn’t watch, more TWP than BTT.
take: I didn’t watch but he doesn’t look good.
QB Chase Cunningham Middle Tennessee 63
info: 3,151 yards 21 TD 10 INT 66.3% 65.6 PASS.
pros: Alright last year.
cons: 5’11 190 and only started 2 years.
take: I didn’t watch, probably not good.
QB Charlie Dean Harvard 63
info: 2,125 yards 18 TD 7 INT 59% 79 PASS 43 RUN.
pros: Went to Harvard.
cons: Didn’t watch
take: NA
QB Jalen Fowler NC A&T 63
info: 1,839 yards 15 TD 6 INT 62% 73 PASS 46 RUN.
pros: Good size.
cons: Didn’t watch
take: NA
RB Johnnie Lang Arkansas St 63
info: 117 attempts 419 yards 3 TD 74.2 RUN.
pros: Stater over former Ohio State RB at Arkansas St. Quick and fast.
cons: 5’8 180, he’s too small for the NFL with not enough production.
take: Lang is a small back that is quick and fast. He didn’t produce enough to have the NFL consider him.
RB Jordan Byrd San Diego St 63
info: 101 attempts 388 yards 3 TD 69.6 RUN.
pros: Played 5 years and finally became a starter. Probably quick and fast.
cons: 5’9 170 and only one year of over 300 yards.
take: I didn’t watch but he’s too small and barley started in 5 years.
QB Cade Brister Lindenwood 62
info: 2,813 yards 24 TD 9 INT 64.4% 75.9 PASS 81.4 RUN.
pros: NA
cons: Didn’t watch
take: NA
RB Cameron Montgomery Rice 62
info: 93 attempts 561 yards 0 TD 76 RUN.
pros: Not many.
cons: 5’5 160.
take: Didn’t watch but hes too small.
